["The Earth and its Lithosphere", "The Atmosphere: Life as we know it on the Earth is entirely dependent on the tenuous layer of gas that clings to the surface of the globe, adding about 1% to its diameter and an insignificant amount to its total mass. And yet the atmosphere serves as the earth\u2019s window and protective shield, as a medium for the transport of heat and water, and as source and sink for exchange of carbon, oxygen, and nitrogen with the biosphere.", "The Biosphere: The biosphere comprises the various regions near the earth\u2019s surface that contain and are dynamically affected by the metabolic activity of the approximately 1.5 million animal species and 0.5 million plant species that are presently known and are still being discovered at a rate of about 10,000 per year. The biosphere is the youngest of the dynamical systems of the earth, having had its genesis about 2 billion years ago.", "The Hydrosphere: Water is the most abundant substance at the earth\u2019s surface. Almost all of it is in the oceans, which cover 70% of the surface area of the earth. However, the amounts of water present in the atmosphere and on land (as surface runoff, lakes and streams) is great enough to make it a significant agent in transporting substances between the lithosphere and the oceans.", "Front Matter", "1: Key Elements of Green Chemistry: Green chemistry is a burgeoning field of heighted chemical consciousness that saw its inception in ~1990 through efforts spearheaded by Paul Anastas and John Warner. Indeed, the twentieth century was a magnificently fertile time for the course of human achievement that embodied the class-modified catchy jingle of DuPont: \"Better living through chemistry.\"", "2: Life-Cycle Analysis", "3: Hazards: This chapter focuses our attention on the essential importance of green chemistry: the need to address in a safe and satisfactory way hazards. Hazards are ubiquitous relative to our experiences as human beings. There are not localized to mills, factories, waste dumps, and hockey arenas (please note feeble attempt at humor). As a species, we often attempt to downplay their role in governing our behavior, but no human enterprise is free of such an exemption. In this key third chapter, we begin to ", "4: Alternative Solvents: This chapter focuses our attention on the pre-eminence of alternative solvents. The topics covered include the following: Auxiliary substances, Transition state, Michael Reaction, Ball Milling ,Graft Polymerization, Supercritical Fluids We attempt to ensure that their significance to the field of green chemistry is well elucidated because of their universal nature in chemistry, biology, and engineering.", "5: Alternative Reagants: This chapter focuses our attention on the pre-eminence of alternative reagents that supplant petroleum-derived reagents. The general GC principles covered in this chapter are 2 (low or no toxic substance synthesis), 7 (sustainable feedstocks), and 10 (biodegradability). The topics covered include: Reagents, Ion-exchange resin, combinatorial chemistry, cyclodextrins, patenteral delivery. As we indicated for the solvents, we again attempt to ensure\u00a0 their significance.", "6: Reaction Types, Design, and Efficiency: This chapter focuses our attention on the greenest types of reactions relevant to this course and how and why they are germane for us. The topics covered include: Rearrangement, Resonance, Canonical structures, Yield, and Specificity. We will focus on a variety of reactions whose character is in line with the first two GC principles (prevent waste and maximize incorporation of all materials in final product).", "Back Matter", "", "Composition and structure of the Earth", "Formation and evolution of the Earth", "Origin of the chemical elements", "The Earth's crust", "1.1: Structure and Composition of the Atmosphere", "1.2: Origin and Evolution of the Atmosphere", "3.1: Chemistry and Energetics of the Life Process", "3.2: Biogeochemical Evolution", "3.3: Gaia - Bioregulation of the Environment", "1.1: Water, Water Everywhere...", "Chemical budgets of oceanic elements", "Chemistry and geochemistry of the oceans", "The hydrosphere and the oceans", "TitlePage", "InfoPage", "Table of Contents", "1.1: Introduction to Green Chemistry", "1.2: Green Chemistry Concepts", "1.3: Case Study", "1.4: Conclusions and Review", "2.1: Introduction to Life Cycles", "2.2: LCA/LCIA Concepts", "2.3: Conclusions and Review", "3.1: Introduction to Hazards of Chemistry", "3.2: Hazard Concepts", "3.3: Case Study - Badger Army Ammunition Plant", "3.4: Green Technologies for Safer Chemical Production", "3.5: Conclusions and Review Questions", "4.1: Introduction to Solvents", "4.2: Solvent Concepts", "4.3: Solvent Alternatives", "4.4: Conclusions and Review", "5.1: Introduction to Reagants", "5.2: Reagant Concepts", "5.3: Specific Replacements", "5.4: Conclusions and Review", "6.1: Introduction to Reactions", "6.2: Reaction Concepts", "6.3: Reaction Design Concepts", "6.4: Conclusions and Review", "Index", "The Earth formed by accretion of solid and particulate material that remained after the much more massive amounts of hydrogen and helium present in the original protoplanets had been dispersed out of the solar system. Gradually, the heat produced by decay of radioactive elements brought about partial melting of the silicate rocks; these lower density molten materials migrated upward, leaving the more dense, iron-containing minerals below. This process, which took about 2 million years, was the first of the three stages into which the chemical evolution of the earth is usually divided:", "The above listing should not be taken too literally; all three kinds of processes have probably proceeded simultaneously, and over a number of cycles. Since the earth is losing approximately four times as much heat as is generated by radioactive decay, the principal driving force of primary and secondary differentiation has gradually slowed down. Partial melting of the upper mantle brought about further fractionation as silicon-containing materials of low density migrated outward to form a crust. In its early stages the stronger granitic rocks had not yet appeared, and the crust was mechanically weak. Upwelling flows of lava would break the surface, and the weight of the solidified lava would cause the crust to subside. In some places, magma would solidify underground, forming low-density rock (batholiths) that would eventually rise by buoyancy and push up overlying crust. These mountain-building periods probably occurred in 6-8 major episodes, each lasting about 800 million years.", "At the same time, outgassing of solids released large amounts of HCl, CO, CO2, H2S, CH4 , SO2 , and SO3 into the primitive atmosphere. Large amounts of water were present in the primeval rocks in the form of hydrates, which were broken down as the result of the heating. Eventually when the outer crust cooled enough to permit condensation of the water vapor as rain, a new stage of chemical evolution began. The rain was initially highly acidic, equivalent to about 1M HCl; this reacted readily with the basic rocks having high contents of K, Na, Mg, and Ca, leaching them away and forming what would eventually evolve into the oceans. The partial dissolution of the rocks also resulted in large amounts of sediments, which played their own role in the transformation of the earth\u2019s surface.", "Within the crust, the lighter materials, being in isostatic equilibrium with the upper mantle, floated higher, and gradually became the nuclei of continents, which grew by accumulating similar material around their boundaries. This picture of continental development is supported by isotopic ratio studies which indicate that the nucleus of the North American continent, the Canadian Shield, is over 2.5 billion years old, while the peripheral parts are less than 0.6 billion years of age.", "The more traditional geochemical view of primary differentiation begins with the assumption that the core of the earth is in a chemically reduced state, while the metallic elements constituting the mantle are almost entirely oxidized to their lower free energy cationic forms. Oxygen and sulfur acted as the major electron acceptors in this process, but the abundance of these elements was insufficient to oxidize much of the nickel or iron.", "Iron itself is believed to have played a crucial role in the primary differentiation of other metals and of oxidized metallic elements that iron is able to reduce. As the dense molten iron migrated in toward the core, it dissolved (formed a liquid alloy with) any other metals with which it came in contact, and it reduced (donated electrons to) those metallic cations that are less \u201cactive\u201d metals than iron under these conditions. The resulting metal would then mix with more of the migrating liquid iron, and be carried along with it into the core.", "Accordingly, elements whose reduction potentials are more positive than iron (i.e., are lower-free energy electron sinks) are called siderophiles; these elements have a low abundance in the crust and upper mantle. The other two important classes of solid-forming elements are lithophile and chalcophile (see below.) These generally have more negative reduction potentials than iron, and are distinguished mainly by their relative affinity for oxygen or sulfur. The chalcophiles, of which Cu, Cd, and Sb are examples, tend to form larger, more polarizable ions which can associate with the sulfide ion. The lithophiles comprise those elements such as K, Al, Mn, and Si, which have smaller ions and which combine preferentially with oxygen. This broad classification is reflected in the dominant forms in which many of these elements occur in nature.", "The differential distribution of the elements within one of the main regions of the earth has been studied in detail only in that portion that is accessible, namely the upper crust. It is clear that fractional crystallization from the cooling magma has played an important role. The relative temperatures at which minerals crystallize is determined in large part by their lattice energies, which are in turn related to ionic sizes and charges. Minerals with small, highly charged ions will have higher melting points and should crystallize first. Thus the sodium-containing feldspar albite (NaAlSi2O8) is found nearer the surface than is its calcium analog anorthite (CaAlSi2O8). The less abundant elements often do not form minerals of their own, but may replace the ion of a more abundant mineral in its crystal lattice. This is known as isomorphous replacement, and it naturally depends on the relative ionic radii. Some ion pairs that undergo isomorphous replacement in minerals are K+ and Ba2+, Si4+ and Ge4+.", "The Phase Rule can be invoked to explain in a very rough way the differentiation of the elements into distinct solid phases.", "P = C + 2 \u2013 F", "Taking the degrees of freedom as 2 (fixed temperature and pressure), the six major elemental components (O, Si, Al, Fe, Mg and Na) can form up to six phases. Actually, more than 99% of igneous rocks comprise seven principal mineral phases. These are: the silica minerals, feldspars, feldspathoids, olivine, pyroxenes, amphiboles and micas.", "The differential deposition of minerals is also influenced by the temperature-composition phase relations as exemplified by the ordinary two-component phase diagram. If the mineral that is rich in one component and which first crystallizes out is also more dense, then the richer ore will occur near the bottom of the deposit, while a more mixed ore (approaching the eutectic) will remain near the top.", "Whether an element is concentrated in the crust or elsewhere depends on its chemical behavior and on the physical properties of its stable compounds. Geochemists have found it convenient to establish the following general classifications:", "The structure and composition of the outer part of the lithosphere has been profoundly affected by interactions with the atmosphere over one-quarter of the surface area of the earth, and with the hydrosphere over the remaining area. Further modification of the outermost parts of the crust has occurred as the result of the activities of living organisms. These changes have transformed much of the outermost parts of the crust into an unconsolidated surface region called the regolith. Further weathering and translocation of soluble substances often results in a sequence of horizons consisting of sediments, soils, or evaporites.", "Chemically, the earth\u2019s crust consists of about 80 elements distributed in approximately 2000 compounds or minerals, many of which are of variable composition. Over 99% of the mass of the crustal material is made up of only eight of these elements, however:", "The crust has its origin in the upwelling convection currents that bring mantle material near to the surface at the mid-ocean ridges. The reduced pressure causes it to melt into magma. The magma may solidify before it reaches the surface, forming basalt, or it may energe from the surface in a volcanic eruption. The oceanic crust consists mostly of the simpler silicate minerals, which are said to be basicor mafic. The more evolved, silicon-rich rocks found in the continental crust are known as acidic or sialic.", "Oceanic crust is continually being extruded from regions of the plastic mantle that intrude upward to just beneath the ocean\u2019s floor at the mid-ocean ridges. A corresponding amount of this crust is being returned to the lithosphere at subduction zones off the West coasts of the Americas, and in the process pushing up the mountain ranges that lie along these coasts. The subducted oceanic crust is reheated and combined with sedimentary material to undergo partial remelting and reworking; this is believed by some to be the origin of granite. Subduction proceeds at a rate of a few cm per year, and the complete cycle time is on the order of a few hundred million years.", "The continental and oceanic crusts. This schematic cross section runs in a west-to-east direction, from just of the West coast of South America on the left to the African continent on the right. Oceanic crust is shown in black, with with continental crust in red.", "Both oceanic and contintental crusts float on the more dense upper lithosphere, and gradually shift their positions as they push against each other, and in response to the slow convective motions in the medium that supports them. The continental crust is thicker than the oceanic crust, but it is also less dense, which allows it to float higher (and thus to differentiate continents from oceans.) The lower density also prevents it from being subducted. Recycling can occur indirectly as continental material erodes and is deposited as sediments on the ocean floor, but this is a much slower process and one that takes billions instead of millions of years. Some of the very oldest rocks, found in Greenland and Labrador, have been dated at 3.9 billion years, and thus approach the age of the Earth itself.", "When magma crystallizes it forms igneous rock, the major component of the Earth\u2019s crust. The crystallization is a complex process which is not entirely understood, due largely to the lack of sufficient thermodynamic data on the various components at high temperatures and pressures. It is known that the different components of magma have differing melting points and densities, and that the phase behavior of multicomponent systems based on some of these substances is quite complex, involving binary and ternary eutectics, solid solutions, the presence of dissolved water (under pressure), and incongruent melting. One consequence of this complexity is that the composition of the magma will change as crystallization takes place; different substances will crystallize at various stages, and the resulting solids may migrate toward the top or bottom of the region if their densities differ greatly from that of the magma", "It is well known that larger crystals form when a melt cools more slowly. This principle affords a simple distinction between the coarser-grained plutonic rocks, which are believed to have been formed by gradual cooling of magma pockets within the crust, and the fine-grained volcanic rocks such as basalt. Under the influence of heat and pressure, particularly at plate boundaries, solid crustal material may undergo partial or complete remelting, followed by cooling and transformation into metamorphic rocks such as gneiss, micas, quartzite, and possibly granites.", "Granite was once thought to be an igneous rock, originating from the crystallization of a particular kind of magma. The association of granitic rocks with mountainous regions, and the similarity of their compositions in widely scattered regions, lends credence to the more recent hypothesis that granitic rocks are of metamorphic origin.", "Another class of rock is sedimentary rock, formed from the consolidation of material produced by weathering and other chemical, and biological processes. Sedimentary rocks cover about three-quarters of the land area of the earth; 80% are shales, 15% sandstones and 5% limestones.", "The chemical composition of rocks tends to be complex and variable, and can only be specified in a precise way at the structural level. The traditional way of expressing rock compositions is in terms of the mass percent of the oxides of the elements present in the rock.", "oxide", "common name", "fresh rock", "weathered rock", "Table 2: Chemical composition of a typical rock\n(quartz-feldspar-biotite gneiss)", "The figures are in percent by weight.", "This does not mean that these oxidess, or the structural units they represent, are actually present as such in a rock. In the chemical analysis of rocks, oxygen is generally not determined separately. When it is, however, it is found in an amount that would be expected to combine stoichiometrically with the other elements present. Thus the composition of albite can be written as either NaAlSi3O8 or Na2O\u00b7Al2O3\u00b76SiO2 . Some rocks contain varying ratios of certain elements. For example olivine, which can be considered a solid solution of Mg2SiO4 and Fe2SiO4, can be represented by (Mg,Fe)2SiO4; this implies that the ratio of metal to silica is constant, and that magnesium is ordinarily present in greater amount than iron.", "The major structural elements of rock (both in the crust and in the mantle) are the silicate minerals, built from silicon atoms surrounded tetrahedrally by four oxygens. The simplest of these consist just of SiO44\u2013 tetrahedra interspersed with positive ions to achieve electroneutrality; olivine, (Mg,Fe)2SiO4 is a well known example. More commonly, the silicate groups polymerize by sharing one or more oxygen atoms at adjacent tetrahedral corners. Depending on the number of joined corners per silicate unit, this can lead to the formation of a wide variety of chains (pyroxenes, amphiboles) and sheets (micas), culminating in the complete tetrahedral polymerization that produces quartz, SiO2.", "Higher degrees of polymerization are associated with higher ratios of Si to O, smaller quantities of positive ions, and higher melting points. Thus when magma cools, the first silicates to crystallize are the olivines, followed by chain and sheet minerals having progressively higher degrees of polymerization and smaller fractions of cations of metals such as Fe and Mg.", "Although some elements are distributed fairly uniformly throughout the crust, others occur at greatly enhanced concentrations in localized areas. There are two general processes that result in these localized excesses, which are called ores when their extraction and refining is economically feasible", "The first of these relates to how well a metallic ion can fit into the silicate lattice structure. Ions having the right charge and size can readily enter this structure, displacing the more common ions of Fe, Al and Mg. Such ions (of which Ga3+ is an example) are readily soluble in other minerals and thus are widely disributed and do not concentrate into ores. Other ions may be too large (Cs and La), too small (Li, Be, B) or too highly charged (Nb, Ta, W) to be accommodated in silicate mineral structures; these elements tend to remain in the magma as it solidifies, finally forming solid minerals only in the last stages of cooling.", "The other major source of ores is hydrothermal formation. Magma contains some water itself, and additional water from the surface is able to reach the heated rock near magma chambers. At the very high temperatures and pressures that prevail in these regions, the water can dissolve many compounds such as sulfides which are normally considered highly insoluble. When these superheated solutions rise to the surface the solids are re-deposited, often in highly concentrated form. Ores of Cu, Sn, W, and possibly some iron ores, as well as some native metals such as gold, are believed to be formed in this way.", "Hydrothermal vents known as \u201cblack smokers\u201d have been observed at sites of sea-floor spreading; the \u201csmoke\u201d consists of metallic sulfides which precipitate in the cold seawater. The veins of pyrites (FeS2) and similar sulfide minerals that are often observed in rock formations are the result of hydrothermal solutions that once penetrated cracks and fissures in the rock.", "The hydrothermal vent photographed here emits both black and white \"smoke\".", "The weathering of rocks at the earth\u2019s surface is a complex process involving both physical and chemical changes. The latter tend in principle to be rather simple kinds of reactions involving dissolution, reaction with carbon dioxide, hydrolysis, hydration, and oxidation. The difficulty in studying them and in arriving at a quantitative description is that these reactions occur very slowly and may never reach an equilibrium state. A comparison of the two rightmost columns in Table 2 on page 14 provides some illustration of the overall effect of these changes, although it must be emphasized that these are relative composition data, and thus cannot show how much of a given component has been lost. In general, sodium, calcium and magnesium seem to be lost more rapidly than potassium and silicon, while iron and aluminum decrease very slowly. Individual rates are of course dependent on the particular structural units containing the element, and also vary somewhat with grain size and condition of the surface.", "Water is undoubtedly the most important weathering agent. Not only does it act as a solvent for ionic dissolution products, but it also brings other active agents such as carbon dioxide and oxygen into intimate contact with the rock material. As water percolates into the outermost layers of the crust, it extends the zone of weathering beneath the surface; the effects of this are quite noticeable in a number of buried sedimentary materials such as Paleozoic sandstones, which tend to be depleted of all but the most resistant minerals. Dissolution, the simplest of all the weathering processes, usually results in ionic species, some of which may react with water to yield acidic or alkaline solutions. Dissolution of silica, however, results in the neutral species H4SiO4. Reactions involving hydration and dehydration are very common, and since the free energy changes tend to be small, these reactions can usually take place in either direction under slightly different conditions. Thus gypsum and anhydrite are interconvertable at observable rates under common environmental conditions:", "CaSO4\u00b72H2O -> CaSO4 + 2 H2O", "In many cases, however, the reaction products are not very well characterized, thermodynamic data is lacking, and the reactions proceed so slowly that they are not entirely understood. For example, both hydrous and anhydrous iron oxides can be found in similar geologic environments, but the little is known about the interconversion process, represented approximately as", "Fe2O3 + H2O -> 2 FeOOH", "Solid carbonates tend to dissolve in acidic solutions, including those produced when atmospheric carbon dioxide dissolves in water. Thus the major surface limestone deposits (largely CaCO3, with some admixture of MgCO3) tend to be highly eroded in non-arid regions, and the local groundwater may have Ca2+ as high as 0.1-0.2M. Thermodynamics can unambiguously predict the most stable oxidation state of a metal ion under given conditions of pH and oxidant concentration. The mechanisms tend to be very uncertain, however. For one thing, both the reactant and product can often exist in various states of hydration, and the dissolved species (which probably undergo the actual oxidation) often consist of polycations and complexed species.", "Compounds of Fe(II), for example, will always tend to oxidize to Fe(III) in the presence of air; the various oxides of iron are responsible for the bright colors seen in many geological formations, and in certain soils. Some of the net reactions that probably occur are", "Fe2SiO4 + 1/2 O2 + H2O -> Fe2O3 + H2SiO4", "2 FeCO3 + 1/2 O2 -> Fe2O3 + 2 H2CO3", "An environmental side effect of the first process is the release of hydrated silica. Also, where both starting materials are present, the carbonic acid produced in the second reaction is believed to promote the dissolution of ferrous silicate, creating a source of Fe(II) ions that can be rapidly oxidized:", "Fe2SiO4 + 4 H2CO3 -> 2 Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + H4SiO4", "Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + 1/2 O2 -> Fe2O3 + 4 H2CO3", "The oxidation of sulfides can produce strongly acidic solutions:", "2 FeS2 + 15/2 O2 + 4 H2O -> Fe2O3 + 2 SO42\u2013 + 8 H+", "The effects of this can be seen in formations containing outcrops of pyrite veins, where the surrounding rocks are heavily stained with yellow and brown Fe(III) oxides, and the groundwater tends to be highly acidic. This process is mediated by microorganisms, and is an important source of acid pollution associated with mines and mine tailings.", "The various components of rocks weather at different rates. The more basic components such as CaO and MgO tend to disappear first, especially if in contact with groundwaters containing high CO2 concentrations. For rocks in general, the first reaction is usually hydration, followed by hydrolysis which can be summarized by", "4 KAlSi3O8(s) + 22 H2O -> Al4Si4O10(OH)8(s) + 8 H4SiO4(aq) + 4 K+ + 4 OH\u2013", "in which other Group 1 or 2 cations might replace potassium. The product Al4Si4O10(OH)8 is kaolinite, a form of clay (see below).", "In general, the rocks which crystallized first from the magma (the Ca-feldspars and olivines) weather more rapidly than do the lower-melting rocks.", "Clays are the solid end products of the weathering of rocks. They are basically composed of alternating sheets of \u201cSiO2\u201d and \u201cAlO6\u201d units in ratios of 1:1 (kaolinite), 2:1 (montmorillonite and vermiculite) and 2:2 (chlorite). In between the sheets, and holding them together by hydrogen bonding are water molecules. Also present are cations such as K+, Ca2+ and Mg2+ which act to neutralize the negative charges of the oxide ions.", "Structure of a clay, showing two layers of the stacked sheets of kaolinite.", "The major agents of physical weathering of exposed rocks are rapid changes in temperature (promoting fracture by differential expansion), the abrasive action of windborne material and glacier movement, and especially by the penetration of water into cracks and its subsequent freezing. The expansion of water on freezing can exert a pressure of 150 kg cm\u20132, whereas the tensile strength of a typical rock is around 120 kg cm\u20132 . The roots of some plants are able to penetrate rock quite effectively, producing comparable expansive pressures in subsurface rocks.", "Soils are a product of the interaction of water, air, and living organisms with exposed rocks or sediments at the earth\u2019s surface. A typical soil contains about 45% inorganic solids and 5% organic solids by volume. Water and air each make up about 20-30%.", "A simple way of classifying soils is based on the relative quantities of clay, silt and sand in the solid component. For ordinary agricultural purposes, loams are considered the most ideal soil type.", "The primary inorganic components of soils consist of sand and silt particles that come directly from the parent rocks. This fraction is dominated by quartz and feldspars (aluminosilicates). Secondary components are formed by chemical changes within the soil itself, or in sediments from which the soil derived. These are most commonly clays, but may also include calcite, gypsum, and sulfide minerals such as pyrites; the latter are formed by bacterial action under reducing conditions in the presence of organic matter.", "The clays have an especially important effect on both the physical properties of the soil, and on its ability to store plant nutrients, including trace nutrients such as Mo and Mn. These properties are due to the high ion-exchange capacity of clays. The more highly charged cations such as Al3+ and Fe3+ tend to be more strongly absorbed within the inter-sheet regions than do Mg2+ or K+. As plants withdraw these latter cations from the soil water, more are released by the clay components, which thus act as nutrient reservoirs.", "The ion-exchange properties of clays also help to maintain the pH balance of soils, through the exchange of H+ and cations such as Ca2+. The soil pH, in turn, strongly affects the solubility of nutrient cations, and thus their availability to plants. For example, the uptake of phosphorus (in the form of H2PO42\u2013 , is only efficient within the rather narrow pH range between 6 and 7. Below 6, dihydrogen phosphates of Fe and Al are precipitated, while insoluble Ca3(PO4)2 forms at higher pH\u2019s.", "Part of the organic matter of soil consists of organisms (mainly bacteria and fungi) and roots and root hairs. The remainder is largely in the form of fulvic and humic acids. These substances of indefinite composition are classified on the basis of their solubility behavior; fulvic acids remain in solution at pH 2, but humic acids, having molecular weights of 20,000 to 100,000, are precipitated. Both are flexible polyelectrolytes that interact strongly with their own kind and with inorganic ions.", "Associated with the fulvic and humic fractions are a wide variety smaller molecules such as alkanes, amino acids, amino sugars, sulfur and phosphorus derivatives of sugars, etc. Part of the organic carbon in a fertile soil is recycled in 1-2 years; plant residues, which are the major source of soil organic matter, have a half-life of days to months. Once carbon gets incorporated into humic substances, it is locked into a much slower recycling process; the turnover times of fulvic acids are a hundred years or more, while those for fulvic acids are around a thousand years. For this reason, humic substances are the major reservoir of organic carbon in soil. Organic matter, particularly polysaccharides, binds strongly to the cation components of clay colloids; the two together act as cementing agents and strongly influence the consistency and structure of the soil.", "Soil water is held by capillary action and adsorption with varying degrees of tenacity. This water binding strength is traditionally expressed in terms of the pressure, or \u201ctension\u201d that would be required to force the water out of the soil. The tension of capillary water varies over a wide range of 0.1-32 atm; only in the lower half of this range will it be available to plants, which can exert an osmotic pressure of up to about 15 atm. Water in excess of the capillary capacity fills larger voids and is called gravitational water. Its presence in surface soils corresponds to a flooded condition that inhibits plant growth by reducing soil aeration.", "The gas phase within soil pores generally has a CO2 content of 5-50 times that of the atmosphere due to the action of organisms. O2 tends to be depleted to roughly the extent that CO2 is present in excess. Under conditions of poor aeration (i.e., exchange with the atmosphere), considerable quantities of N2O, NO, H2, CH4, C2H4, and H2S may also be present.", "Life as we know it on the Earth is entirely dependent on the tenuous layer of gas that clings to the surface of the globe, adding about 1% to its diameter and an insignificant amount to its total mass. And yet the atmosphere serves as the earth\u2019s window and protective shield, as a medium for the transport of heat and water, and as source and sink for exchange of carbon, oxygen, and nitrogen with the biosphere. The atmosphere acts as a compressible fluid tied to the earth by gravitation; as a receptor of solar energy and a thermal reservoir, it constitutes the working fluid of a heat engine that transports and redistributes matter and energy over the entire globe. The atmosphere is also a major temporary repository of a number of chemical elements that move in a cyclic manner between the hydrosphere, atmosphere, and the upper lithosphere. Finally, the atmosphere is a site for a large variety of complex photochemically initiated reactions involving both natural and anthropogenic substances.", "The biosphere comprises the various regions near the earth\u2019s surface that contain and are dynamically affected by the metabolic activity of the approximately 1.5 million animal species and 0.5 million plant species that are presently known and are still being discovered at a rate of about 10,000 per year. The biosphere is the youngest of the dynamical systems of the earth, having had its genesis about 2 billion years ago. It is also the one that has most profoundly affected the other major environmental systems, particularly the atmosphere and the hydrosphere.", "Water is the most abundant substance at the earth\u2019s surface. Almost all of it is in the oceans, which cover 70% of the surface area of the earth. However, the amounts of water present in the atmosphere and on land (as surface runoff, lakes and streams) is great enough to make it a significant agent in transporting substances between the lithosphere and the oceans. Water interacts with both the atmosphere and the lithosphere, acquiring solutes from each, and thus provides the major chemical link between these two realms. The various transformations undergone by water through the different stages of the hydrologic cycle act to transport both dissolved and particulate substances between different geographic locations.", "In a very general sense, solvents are a class of chemical compounds that allow chemistry to occur. The concept of a solvent has significant ramifications because they serve as the matrix, medium, or carrier for solutes. They are necessary in a number of processes, reactions, and systems. We tend to think of a substance like \u201cwater\u201d as a universal solvent because it is so useful in so many disciplines. Water cleans up everything, allows biochemical reactions to occur, is used in paints, coatings, and films, allows cooking to occur (or else everything would catch fire), and provides lubrication and ease of movement for a great many devices.", "The Earth formed by accretion of solid and particulate material that remained after the much more massive amounts of hydrogen and helium present in the original protoplanets had been dispersed out of the solar system. Gradually, the heat produced by decay of radioactive elements brought about partial melting of the silicate rocks; these lower density molten materials migrated upward, leaving the more dense, iron-containing minerals below. This process, which took about 2 million years, was the first of the three stages into which the chemical evolution of the earth is usually divided:", "The above listing should not be taken too literally; all three kinds of processes have probably proceeded simultaneously, and over a number of cycles. Since the earth is losing approximately four times as much heat as is generated by radioactive decay, the principal driving force of primary and secondary differentiation has gradually slowed down. Partial melting of the upper mantle brought about further fractionation as silicon-containing materials of low density migrated outward to form a crust. In its early stages the stronger granitic rocks had not yet appeared, and the crust was mechanically weak. Upwelling flows of lava would break the surface, and the weight of the solidified lava would cause the crust to subside. In some places, magma would solidify underground, forming low-density rock (batholiths) that would eventually rise by buoyancy and push up overlying crust. These mountain-building periods probably occurred in 6-8 major episodes, each lasting about 800 million years.", "At the same time, outgassing of solids released large amounts of HCl, CO, CO2, H2S, CH4 , SO2 , and SO3 into the primitive atmosphere. Large amounts of water were present in the primeval rocks in the form of hydrates, which were broken down as the result of the heating. Eventually when the outer crust cooled enough to permit condensation of the water vapor as rain, a new stage of chemical evolution began. The rain was initially highly acidic, equivalent to about 1M HCl; this reacted readily with the basic rocks having high contents of K, Na, Mg, and Ca, leaching them away and forming what would eventually evolve into the oceans. The partial dissolution of the rocks also resulted in large amounts of sediments, which played their own role in the transformation of the earth\u2019s surface.", "Within the crust, the lighter materials, being in isostatic equilibrium with the upper mantle, floated higher, and gradually became the nuclei of continents, which grew by accumulating similar material around their boundaries. This picture of continental development is supported by isotopic ratio studies which indicate that the nucleus of the North American continent, the Canadian Shield, is over 2.5 billion years old, while the peripheral parts are less than 0.6 billion years of age.", "The more traditional geochemical view of primary differentiation begins with the assumption that the core of the earth is in a chemically reduced state, while the metallic elements constituting the mantle are almost entirely oxidized to their lower free energy cationic forms. Oxygen and sulfur acted as the major electron acceptors in this process, but the abundance of these elements was insufficient to oxidize much of the nickel or iron.", "Iron itself is believed to have played a crucial role in the primary differentiation of other metals and of oxidized metallic elements that iron is able to reduce. As the dense molten iron migrated in toward the core, it dissolved (formed a liquid alloy with) any other metals with which it came in contact, and it reduced (donated electrons to) those metallic cations that are less \u201cactive\u201d metals than iron under these conditions. The resulting metal would then mix with more of the migrating liquid iron, and be carried along with it into the core.", "Accordingly, elements whose reduction potentials are more positive than iron (i.e., are lower-free energy electron sinks) are called siderophiles; these elements have a low abundance in the crust and upper mantle. The other two important classes of solid-forming elements are lithophile and chalcophile (see below.) These generally have more negative reduction potentials than iron, and are distinguished mainly by their relative affinity for oxygen or sulfur. The chalcophiles, of which Cu, Cd, and Sb are examples, tend to form larger, more polarizable ions which can associate with the sulfide ion. The lithophiles comprise those elements such as K, Al, Mn, and Si, which have smaller ions and which combine preferentially with oxygen. This broad classification is reflected in the dominant forms in which many of these elements occur in nature.", "The differential distribution of the elements within one of the main regions of the earth has been studied in detail only in that portion that is accessible, namely the upper crust. It is clear that fractional crystallization from the cooling magma has played an important role. The relative temperatures at which minerals crystallize is determined in large part by their lattice energies, which are in turn related to ionic sizes and charges. Minerals with small, highly charged ions will have higher melting points and should crystallize first. Thus the sodium-containing feldspar albite (NaAlSi2O8) is found nearer the surface than is its calcium analog anorthite (CaAlSi2O8). The less abundant elements often do not form minerals of their own, but may replace the ion of a more abundant mineral in its crystal lattice. This is known as isomorphous replacement, and it naturally depends on the relative ionic radii. Some ion pairs that undergo isomorphous replacement in minerals are K+ and Ba2+, Si4+ and Ge4+.", "The Phase Rule can be invoked to explain in a very rough way the differentiation of the elements into distinct solid phases.", "P = C + 2 \u2013 F", "Taking the degrees of freedom as 2 (fixed temperature and pressure), the six major elemental components (O, Si, Al, Fe, Mg and Na) can form up to six phases. Actually, more than 99% of igneous rocks comprise seven principal mineral phases. These are: the silica minerals, feldspars, feldspathoids, olivine, pyroxenes, amphiboles and micas.", "The differential deposition of minerals is also influenced by the temperature-composition phase relations as exemplified by the ordinary two-component phase diagram. If the mineral that is rich in one component and which first crystallizes out is also more dense, then the richer ore will occur near the bottom of the deposit, while a more mixed ore (approaching the eutectic) will remain near the top.", "Whether an element is concentrated in the crust or elsewhere depends on its chemical behavior and on the physical properties of its stable compounds. Geochemists have found it convenient to establish the following general classifications:", "The structure and composition of the outer part of the lithosphere has been profoundly affected by interactions with the atmosphere over one-quarter of the surface area of the earth, and with the hydrosphere over the remaining area. Further modification of the outermost parts of the crust has occurred as the result of the activities of living organisms. These changes have transformed much of the outermost parts of the crust into an unconsolidated surface region called the regolith. Further weathering and translocation of soluble substances often results in a sequence of horizons consisting of sediments, soils, or evaporites.", "Chemically, the earth\u2019s crust consists of about 80 elements distributed in approximately 2000 compounds or minerals, many of which are of variable composition. Over 99% of the mass of the crustal material is made up of only eight of these elements, however:", "The crust has its origin in the upwelling convection currents that bring mantle material near to the surface at the mid-ocean ridges. The reduced pressure causes it to melt into magma. The magma may solidify before it reaches the surface, forming basalt, or it may energe from the surface in a volcanic eruption. The oceanic crust consists mostly of the simpler silicate minerals, which are said to be basicor mafic. The more evolved, silicon-rich rocks found in the continental crust are known as acidic or sialic.", "Oceanic crust is continually being extruded from regions of the plastic mantle that intrude upward to just beneath the ocean\u2019s floor at the mid-ocean ridges. A corresponding amount of this crust is being returned to the lithosphere at subduction zones off the West coasts of the Americas, and in the process pushing up the mountain ranges that lie along these coasts. The subducted oceanic crust is reheated and combined with sedimentary material to undergo partial remelting and reworking; this is believed by some to be the origin of granite. Subduction proceeds at a rate of a few cm per year, and the complete cycle time is on the order of a few hundred million years.", "The continental and oceanic crusts. This schematic cross section runs in a west-to-east direction, from just of the West coast of South America on the left to the African continent on the right. Oceanic crust is shown in black, with with continental crust in red.", "Both oceanic and contintental crusts float on the more dense upper lithosphere, and gradually shift their positions as they push against each other, and in response to the slow convective motions in the medium that supports them. The continental crust is thicker than the oceanic crust, but it is also less dense, which allows it to float higher (and thus to differentiate continents from oceans.) The lower density also prevents it from being subducted. Recycling can occur indirectly as continental material erodes and is deposited as sediments on the ocean floor, but this is a much slower process and one that takes billions instead of millions of years. Some of the very oldest rocks, found in Greenland and Labrador, have been dated at 3.9 billion years, and thus approach the age of the Earth itself.", "When magma crystallizes it forms igneous rock, the major component of the Earth\u2019s crust. The crystallization is a complex process which is not entirely understood, due largely to the lack of sufficient thermodynamic data on the various components at high temperatures and pressures. It is known that the different components of magma have differing melting points and densities, and that the phase behavior of multicomponent systems based on some of these substances is quite complex, involving binary and ternary eutectics, solid solutions, the presence of dissolved water (under pressure), and incongruent melting. One consequence of this complexity is that the composition of the magma will change as crystallization takes place; different substances will crystallize at various stages, and the resulting solids may migrate toward the top or bottom of the region if their densities differ greatly from that of the magma", "It is well known that larger crystals form when a melt cools more slowly. This principle affords a simple distinction between the coarser-grained plutonic rocks, which are believed to have been formed by gradual cooling of magma pockets within the crust, and the fine-grained volcanic rocks such as basalt. Under the influence of heat and pressure, particularly at plate boundaries, solid crustal material may undergo partial or complete remelting, followed by cooling and transformation into metamorphic rocks such as gneiss, micas, quartzite, and possibly granites.", "Granite was once thought to be an igneous rock, originating from the crystallization of a particular kind of magma. The association of granitic rocks with mountainous regions, and the similarity of their compositions in widely scattered regions, lends credence to the more recent hypothesis that granitic rocks are of metamorphic origin.", "Another class of rock is sedimentary rock, formed from the consolidation of material produced by weathering and other chemical, and biological processes. Sedimentary rocks cover about three-quarters of the land area of the earth; 80% are shales, 15% sandstones and 5% limestones.", "The chemical composition of rocks tends to be complex and variable, and can only be specified in a precise way at the structural level. The traditional way of expressing rock compositions is in terms of the mass percent of the oxides of the elements present in the rock.", "oxide", "common name", "fresh rock", "weathered rock", "Table 2: Chemical composition of a typical rock\n(quartz-feldspar-biotite gneiss)", "The figures are in percent by weight.", "This does not mean that these oxidess, or the structural units they represent, are actually present as such in a rock. In the chemical analysis of rocks, oxygen is generally not determined separately. When it is, however, it is found in an amount that would be expected to combine stoichiometrically with the other elements present. Thus the composition of albite can be written as either NaAlSi3O8 or Na2O\u00b7Al2O3\u00b76SiO2 . Some rocks contain varying ratios of certain elements. For example olivine, which can be considered a solid solution of Mg2SiO4 and Fe2SiO4, can be represented by (Mg,Fe)2SiO4; this implies that the ratio of metal to silica is constant, and that magnesium is ordinarily present in greater amount than iron.", "The major structural elements of rock (both in the crust and in the mantle) are the silicate minerals, built from silicon atoms surrounded tetrahedrally by four oxygens. The simplest of these consist just of SiO44\u2013 tetrahedra interspersed with positive ions to achieve electroneutrality; olivine, (Mg,Fe)2SiO4 is a well known example. More commonly, the silicate groups polymerize by sharing one or more oxygen atoms at adjacent tetrahedral corners. Depending on the number of joined corners per silicate unit, this can lead to the formation of a wide variety of chains (pyroxenes, amphiboles) and sheets (micas), culminating in the complete tetrahedral polymerization that produces quartz, SiO2.", "Higher degrees of polymerization are associated with higher ratios of Si to O, smaller quantities of positive ions, and higher melting points. Thus when magma cools, the first silicates to crystallize are the olivines, followed by chain and sheet minerals having progressively higher degrees of polymerization and smaller fractions of cations of metals such as Fe and Mg.", "Although some elements are distributed fairly uniformly throughout the crust, others occur at greatly enhanced concentrations in localized areas. There are two general processes that result in these localized excesses, which are called ores when their extraction and refining is economically feasible", "The first of these relates to how well a metallic ion can fit into the silicate lattice structure. Ions having the right charge and size can readily enter this structure, displacing the more common ions of Fe, Al and Mg. Such ions (of which Ga3+ is an example) are readily soluble in other minerals and thus are widely disributed and do not concentrate into ores. Other ions may be too large (Cs and La), too small (Li, Be, B) or too highly charged (Nb, Ta, W) to be accommodated in silicate mineral structures; these elements tend to remain in the magma as it solidifies, finally forming solid minerals only in the last stages of cooling.", "The other major source of ores is hydrothermal formation. Magma contains some water itself, and additional water from the surface is able to reach the heated rock near magma chambers. At the very high temperatures and pressures that prevail in these regions, the water can dissolve many compounds such as sulfides which are normally considered highly insoluble. When these superheated solutions rise to the surface the solids are re-deposited, often in highly concentrated form. Ores of Cu, Sn, W, and possibly some iron ores, as well as some native metals such as gold, are believed to be formed in this way.", "Hydrothermal vents known as \u201cblack smokers\u201d have been observed at sites of sea-floor spreading; the \u201csmoke\u201d consists of metallic sulfides which precipitate in the cold seawater. The veins of pyrites (FeS2) and similar sulfide minerals that are often observed in rock formations are the result of hydrothermal solutions that once penetrated cracks and fissures in the rock.", "The hydrothermal vent photographed here emits both black and white \"smoke\".", "The weathering of rocks at the earth\u2019s surface is a complex process involving both physical and chemical changes. The latter tend in principle to be rather simple kinds of reactions involving dissolution, reaction with carbon dioxide, hydrolysis, hydration, and oxidation. The difficulty in studying them and in arriving at a quantitative description is that these reactions occur very slowly and may never reach an equilibrium state. A comparison of the two rightmost columns in Table 2 on page 14 provides some illustration of the overall effect of these changes, although it must be emphasized that these are relative composition data, and thus cannot show how much of a given component has been lost. In general, sodium, calcium and magnesium seem to be lost more rapidly than potassium and silicon, while iron and aluminum decrease very slowly. Individual rates are of course dependent on the particular structural units containing the element, and also vary somewhat with grain size and condition of the surface.", "Water is undoubtedly the most important weathering agent. Not only does it act as a solvent for ionic dissolution products, but it also brings other active agents such as carbon dioxide and oxygen into intimate contact with the rock material. As water percolates into the outermost layers of the crust, it extends the zone of weathering beneath the surface; the effects of this are quite noticeable in a number of buried sedimentary materials such as Paleozoic sandstones, which tend to be depleted of all but the most resistant minerals. Dissolution, the simplest of all the weathering processes, usually results in ionic species, some of which may react with water to yield acidic or alkaline solutions. Dissolution of silica, however, results in the neutral species H4SiO4. Reactions involving hydration and dehydration are very common, and since the free energy changes tend to be small, these reactions can usually take place in either direction under slightly different conditions. Thus gypsum and anhydrite are interconvertable at observable rates under common environmental conditions:", "CaSO4\u00b72H2O -> CaSO4 + 2 H2O", "In many cases, however, the reaction products are not very well characterized, thermodynamic data is lacking, and the reactions proceed so slowly that they are not entirely understood. For example, both hydrous and anhydrous iron oxides can be found in similar geologic environments, but the little is known about the interconversion process, represented approximately as", "Fe2O3 + H2O -> 2 FeOOH", "Solid carbonates tend to dissolve in acidic solutions, including those produced when atmospheric carbon dioxide dissolves in water. Thus the major surface limestone deposits (largely CaCO3, with some admixture of MgCO3) tend to be highly eroded in non-arid regions, and the local groundwater may have Ca2+ as high as 0.1-0.2M. Thermodynamics can unambiguously predict the most stable oxidation state of a metal ion under given conditions of pH and oxidant concentration. The mechanisms tend to be very uncertain, however. For one thing, both the reactant and product can often exist in various states of hydration, and the dissolved species (which probably undergo the actual oxidation) often consist of polycations and complexed species.", "Compounds of Fe(II), for example, will always tend to oxidize to Fe(III) in the presence of air; the various oxides of iron are responsible for the bright colors seen in many geological formations, and in certain soils. Some of the net reactions that probably occur are", "Fe2SiO4 + 1/2 O2 + H2O -> Fe2O3 + H2SiO4", "2 FeCO3 + 1/2 O2 -> Fe2O3 + 2 H2CO3", "An environmental side effect of the first process is the release of hydrated silica. Also, where both starting materials are present, the carbonic acid produced in the second reaction is believed to promote the dissolution of ferrous silicate, creating a source of Fe(II) ions that can be rapidly oxidized:", "Fe2SiO4 + 4 H2CO3 -> 2 Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + H4SiO4", "Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + 1/2 O2 -> Fe2O3 + 4 H2CO3", "The oxidation of sulfides can produce strongly acidic solutions:", "2 FeS2 + 15/2 O2 + 4 H2O -> Fe2O3 + 2 SO42\u2013 + 8 H+", "The effects of this can be seen in formations containing outcrops of pyrite veins, where the surrounding rocks are heavily stained with yellow and brown Fe(III) oxides, and the groundwater tends to be highly acidic. This process is mediated by microorganisms, and is an important source of acid pollution associated with mines and mine tailings.", "The various components of rocks weather at different rates. The more basic components such as CaO and MgO tend to disappear first, especially if in contact with groundwaters containing high CO2 concentrations. For rocks in general, the first reaction is usually hydration, followed by hydrolysis which can be summarized by", "4 KAlSi3O8(s) + 22 H2O -> Al4Si4O10(OH)8(s) + 8 H4SiO4(aq) + 4 K+ + 4 OH\u2013", "in which other Group 1 or 2 cations might replace potassium. The product Al4Si4O10(OH)8 is kaolinite, a form of clay (see below).", "In general, the rocks which crystallized first from the magma (the Ca-feldspars and olivines) weather more rapidly than do the lower-melting rocks.", "Clays are the solid end products of the weathering of rocks. They are basically composed of alternating sheets of \u201cSiO2\u201d and \u201cAlO6\u201d units in ratios of 1:1 (kaolinite), 2:1 (montmorillonite and vermiculite) and 2:2 (chlorite). In between the sheets, and holding them together by hydrogen bonding are water molecules. Also present are cations such as K+, Ca2+ and Mg2+ which act to neutralize the negative charges of the oxide ions.", "Structure of a clay, showing two layers of the stacked sheets of kaolinite.", "The major agents of physical weathering of exposed rocks are rapid changes in temperature (promoting fracture by differential expansion), the abrasive action of windborne material and glacier movement, and especially by the penetration of water into cracks and its subsequent freezing. The expansion of water on freezing can exert a pressure of 150 kg cm\u20132, whereas the tensile strength of a typical rock is around 120 kg cm\u20132 . The roots of some plants are able to penetrate rock quite effectively, producing comparable expansive pressures in subsurface rocks.", "Soils are a product of the interaction of water, air, and living organisms with exposed rocks or sediments at the earth\u2019s surface. A typical soil contains about 45% inorganic solids and 5% organic solids by volume. Water and air each make up about 20-30%.", "A simple way of classifying soils is based on the relative quantities of clay, silt and sand in the solid component. For ordinary agricultural purposes, loams are considered the most ideal soil type.", "The primary inorganic components of soils consist of sand and silt particles that come directly from the parent rocks. This fraction is dominated by quartz and feldspars (aluminosilicates). Secondary components are formed by chemical changes within the soil itself, or in sediments from which the soil derived. These are most commonly clays, but may also include calcite, gypsum, and sulfide minerals such as pyrites; the latter are formed by bacterial action under reducing conditions in the presence of organic matter.", "The clays have an especially important effect on both the physical properties of the soil, and on its ability to store plant nutrients, including trace nutrients such as Mo and Mn. These properties are due to the high ion-exchange capacity of clays. The more highly charged cations such as Al3+ and Fe3+ tend to be more strongly absorbed within the inter-sheet regions than do Mg2+ or K+. As plants withdraw these latter cations from the soil water, more are released by the clay components, which thus act as nutrient reservoirs.", "The ion-exchange properties of clays also help to maintain the pH balance of soils, through the exchange of H+ and cations such as Ca2+. The soil pH, in turn, strongly affects the solubility of nutrient cations, and thus their availability to plants. For example, the uptake of phosphorus (in the form of H2PO42\u2013 , is only efficient within the rather narrow pH range between 6 and 7. Below 6, dihydrogen phosphates of Fe and Al are precipitated, while insoluble Ca3(PO4)2 forms at higher pH\u2019s.", "Part of the organic matter of soil consists of organisms (mainly bacteria and fungi) and roots and root hairs. The remainder is largely in the form of fulvic and humic acids. These substances of indefinite composition are classified on the basis of their solubility behavior; fulvic acids remain in solution at pH 2, but humic acids, having molecular weights of 20,000 to 100,000, are precipitated. Both are flexible polyelectrolytes that interact strongly with their own kind and with inorganic ions.", "Associated with the fulvic and humic fractions are a wide variety smaller molecules such as alkanes, amino acids, amino sugars, sulfur and phosphorus derivatives of sugars, etc. Part of the organic carbon in a fertile soil is recycled in 1-2 years; plant residues, which are the major source of soil organic matter, have a half-life of days to months. Once carbon gets incorporated into humic substances, it is locked into a much slower recycling process; the turnover times of fulvic acids are a hundred years or more, while those for fulvic acids are around a thousand years. For this reason, humic substances are the major reservoir of organic carbon in soil. Organic matter, particularly polysaccharides, binds strongly to the cation components of clay colloids; the two together act as cementing agents and strongly influence the consistency and structure of the soil.", "Soil water is held by capillary action and adsorption with varying degrees of tenacity. This water binding strength is traditionally expressed in terms of the pressure, or \u201ctension\u201d that would be required to force the water out of the soil. The tension of capillary water varies over a wide range of 0.1-32 atm; only in the lower half of this range will it be available to plants, which can exert an osmotic pressure of up to about 15 atm. Water in excess of the capillary capacity fills larger voids and is called gravitational water. Its presence in surface soils corresponds to a flooded condition that inhibits plant growth by reducing soil aeration.", "The gas phase within soil pores generally has a CO2 content of 5-50 times that of the atmosphere due to the action of organisms. O2 tends to be depleted to roughly the extent that CO2 is present in excess. Under conditions of poor aeration (i.e., exchange with the atmosphere), considerable quantities of N2O, NO, H2, CH4, C2H4, and H2S may also be present.", "The earth has been in a state of continual change since its formation. The major part of this change, involving volcanism and tectonics, has been driven by heat produced from the decay of radioactive elements within the earth. The other source of change has been solar energy, which acts as the driving force of weathering and is the ultimate source of energy for living organisms.", "The solar system was probably formed about 4.6 billion years ago, and the oldest known rocks have an age of 3.8 billion years. There is thus a gap of 0.8 billion years for which there is no direct evidence. It is known that the earth was subjected to extensive bombardment earlier in its history; recent computer simulations suggest that the moon could have resulted from an especially massive collision with another body. Although these major collisions have diminished in magnitude as the matter in the solar system has become more consolidated, they continue to occur, with the most recent one being responsible for the annihilation of the dinosaurs and much of the other life on Earth. The lack of many overt signs of these collisions (such as craters, for example) testifies to the dynamic processes at work on the Earth\u2019s surface and beneath it.", "The earth is composed of 90 chemical elements, of which 81 have at least one stable isotope. The unstable elements are 43Tc and 61Pm, and all elements heavier than 83Bi.", "Note that the vertical axis is logarithmic, which has the effect of greatly reducing\nthe visual impression of the differences between the various elements.", "The chart gives the abundances of the elements present in the solar system, in the earth as a whole, and in the various geospheres. Of particular interest are the differences between the terrestrial and cosmic abundances, which are especially notable in the cases of the lighter elements (H, C, N) and the noble gas elements (He, Ne, Ar, Xe, Kr).", "Given the mix of elements that are present in the earth, how might they combine so as to produce the chemical composition we now observe? Thermodynamics allows us to predict the composition that any isolated system will eventually reach at a given temperature and pressure. Of course the earth is not an isolated system, although most parts of it can be considered approximately so in many respects, on time scales sufficient to make thermodynamic predictions reasonably meaningful. The equilibrium states predicted by thermodynamics differ markedly from the observed compositions. The atmosphere, for example, contains 0.03% CO2 , 78% N2 and 21% O2 ; in a world at equilibrium the air would be 99% CO2.", "Similarly, the oceans, containing about 3.5% NaCl, would have a salt content of 35% if they were in equilibrium with the atmosphere and the lithosphere. Trying to understand the mechanisms that maintain these non-equilibrium states is an important part of contemporary environmental geochemistry.", "Studies based on the reflection and refraction of the acoustic waves resulting from earthquakes show that the interior of the earth consists of four distinct regions. A combination of physical and chemical processes led to the differentiation of the earth into these major parts. This is believed to have occurred approximately 4 billion years ago.", "The Earth\u2019s core is believed to consist of two regions. The inner core is solid, while the outer core is liquid. This phase difference probably reflects a difference in pressure and composition, rather than one of temperature. Density estimates obtained from seismological studies indicate that the core is metallic, and mainly iron, with 8-10 percent of lighter elements.", "Hypotheses about the nature of the core must be consistent with the the core\u2019s role as the source of the earth\u2019s magnetic field. This field arises from convective motion of the electrically conductive liquid comprising the outer core. Whether this convection is driven by differences in temperature or composition is not certain. The estimated abundance of radioactive isotopes (mainly U238 and K40 in the core is sufficient to provide the thermal energy required to drive the convective dynamo. Laboratory experiments on the high-pressure behavior of iron oxides and sulfides indicate that these substances are probably metallic in nature, and hence conductive, at the temperatures (4000-5000K) and pressures (1.3-3.5 million atm) that are estimated for the core. Their presence in the core, alloyed with the iron, would be consistent with the observed density, and would also resolve the apparent lack of sulfur in the earth, compared to its primordial abundance.", "The region extending from the outer part of the core to the crust of the earth is known as the mantle. The mantle is composed of oxides and silicates, i.e., of rock. It was once believed that this rock was molten, and served as a source of volcanic magma. It is now known on the basis of seismological evidence that the mantle is not in the liquid state. Laboratory experiments have shown, however, that when rock is subjected to the high temperatures and pressures believed to exist in the mantle, it can be deformed and flows very much like a liquid.", "The upper part of the mantle consists of a region of convective cells whose motion is driven by the heat due to decay of radioactive potassium, thorium, and uranium, which were selectively incorporated in the crystal lattices of the lower-density minerals that form the mantle. There are several independent sources of evidence of this motion. First, there are gravitational anomalies; the force of gravity, measured by changes in elevation in the sea surface, is different over upward and downward moving regions, and has permitted the mapping of some of the convective cells. Secondly, numerous isotopic ratio studies have traced the exchange of material between oceanic sediments, upper mantle rock, and back into the continental crust, which forms from melting of the upper mantle. Thirdly, the composition of the basalt formed by upper mantle melting is quite uniform everywhere, suggesting complete mixing of diverse materials incorporated into the mantle over periods of 100 million years.", "High-pressure studies in the laboratory have revealed that olivine, a highly abundant substance in the mantle composed of Fe, Mg, Si, and O (and also the principal constituent of meteorites) can undergo a reversible phase change between two forms differing in density. Estimates of conditions within the upper mantle suggest that the this phase change could occur within this region in such as way as to contribute to convection. The most apparent effect of mantle convection is the motion it imparts to the earth\u2019s crust, as evidenced by the the external topography of the earth.", "The outermost part of the earth, known also as the lithosphere, is broken up into plates that are supported by the underlying mantle, and are moved by the convective cells within the mantle at a rate of a few centimetres per year. New crust is formed where plates move away from each other under the oceans, and old crust is recycled back into the mantle as where plates moving in opposite directions collide.", "The parts of the crust that contain the world\u2019s oceans are very different from the parts that form the continents. The continental crust is 10-70 km thick, while oceanic crust averages only 5-7 km in thickness. Oceanic crust is more dense (3.0-3.1 g cm\u20133) and therefore \u201cfloats\u201d on the mantle at a greater depth than does continental crust (density 2.7-2.8 ). Finally, oceanic crust is much younger; the oldest oceanic crust is about 200 million years old, while the most ancient continental rocks were formed 3.8 billion years ago.", "An animated view of seafloor spreading.", "Where two plates collide, one generally plunges under the other and returns to the mantle in a process known as subduction. Since the continental plates have a lower density, they tend to float above the oceanic plates and resist subduction. At continental boundaries such as that of the North American west coast where an oceanic plate pushes under the continental crust, oceanic sediments may be sheared off, resulting in a low coastal mountain range (see here for a nice animation of this process.) Also, the injection of water into the subducting material lowers its melting point, resulting in the formation of shallow magma pockets and volcanic activity. Divergent plate boundaries can cross continents, however; temporary divergences create rift valleys such as the Rhine and Rio Grande, while permanent ones eventually lead to new oceanic basins.", "Collision of two continental plates can also occur; the most notable example is the one resulting in the formation of the Himalayan mountain chain.", "The Earth is composed of 90 chemical elements, of which 81 have at least one stable isotope. Most of these elements have also been detected in stars. Where did these elements come from? The accepted scenario is that the first major element to condense out of the primordial soup was helium , which still comprises about one-quarter of the mass of the known universe.", "Hydrogen is the least thermodynamically stable of the elements, and at very high temperatures will combine with itself in a reaction known as nuclear fusion to form the next element, 2He4. \"Heavier\" nuclei (that is , those having high atomic numbers, indicated here by the subscript preceding the element symbol), are more stable than \"lighter\" ones, so this fusion process can continue up to 56Fe, which is the most energetically stable of all the nuclides. Beyond this point, heavier nuclei slowly become less stable, so fission becomes more likely. FIssion, however, is not considered an important mechanism of primordialnucleosynthesis, so other processes are invoked, as discussed farther below.", "According to the \u201cbig bang\u201d theory for which there is now overwhelming evidence, the universe as we know it (that is, all space, time, and matter) had its origin in a point source or singularity that began an explosive expansion about 12-15 billion years ago, and which is still continuing.", "Following a brief period of extremely rapid expansion called inflation, protons and neutrons condensed out of the initial quantum soup after about 10\u201332 s. Helium and hydrogen became stable during the first few minutes, along with some of the very lightest nuclides up to 7Li, which were formed through various fusion and neutron-absorption processes. Formation of most heavier elements was delayed for about 106 years until nucleosynthesis commenced in the first stars. Hydrogen still accounts for about 93% of the atoms in the universe.", "The main lines of observational evidence that support this theory are the 2.7K background radiation that permeates the cosmos (the cooled-down remnants of the initial explosion), and the abundances of the lightest elements. Conventional physics is able to extrapolate back to about the first 10\u201333 second; what happened before then remains speculative.", "All elements beyond hydrogen were formed in regions where the concentration of matter was large, and the temperature was high; in other words, in stars. The formation of a star begins when the gravitational forces due to a large local concentration of hydrogen bring about a contraction and compression to densities of around 105 g cm\u20133. This is a highly exothermic process in which the gravitational potential energy is released as heat, about 1200 kJ per gram, raising the temperature to about 107 K. Under these conditions, hydrogen nuclei possess sufficient kinetic energy to overcome their electrostatic repulsion and undergo nuclear fusion:", "4 1H1-> 2He4 + 2 b+ + 2 g + 2 n", "There will be a net mass loss in above process, which will therefore be highly exothermic and is known as \u201chydrogen burning\u201d. As hydrogen burning proceeds, the helium collects in the core of the star, raising the density to 108 g cm\u20133 and the temperature to 108 K. This temperature is high enough to initiate helium burning, which proceeds in several steps:", "2 2He4 -> 4Be8 + g", "The first product, 4Be8 has a half life of only 10\u201316 sec, but a sufficient amount accumulates to drive the following two reactions:", "4Be8 + 2He4 -> 6C12 + g", "6C12 + 1H1 -> 7N13 -> 6C13 + b+ + g", "The size of a star depends on the balance between the kinetic energy of its matter and the gravitational attraction of its mass. As the helium burning runs its course, the temperature drops and the star begins to contract. The course of further nucleosynthesis and the subsequent fate of the star itself depends on the star\u2019s mass.", "If the mass of the star is no greater than 1.4 times the mass of our sun, the star collapses to a white dwarf, and eventually cools to a dark, dense dead star.", "In larger stars, the gravitational forces are sufficiently strong to overcome the normal repulsion between atoms, and so gravitational collapse continues. The gravitational energy released in this process produces temperatures of 6 108 K, which are sufficient to initiate a complex series of nuclear reactions known as the carbon-nitrogen cycle. The net reaction of this cycle is the further fusion of hydrogen to helium, in which C12 acts as a catalyst, and various nuclides of nitrogen and oxygen are intermediates. The temperature is sufficiently high, however, to initiate fusion reactions of some of these intermediates:", "6C12 + 6C12 -> 10Ne20 + 2He4", "2 8O16 -> 14Si28 + 2He4", "2 8O16 -> 16S31 + 0n1", "The intense gamma radiation that is produced in some of these reactions breaks some of the product nuclei into smaller fragments, which can then fuse into a variety of heavier species, up to the limit of26Fe56, beyond which fusion is no longer exothermic. The greater relative abundance of elements such as 6C12, 8O16, and 10Ne20 which differ by a 2He4 nucleus, reflects the participation of the latter species in these processes. These exothermic reactions eventually produce temperatures of 8 109 K, while contraction continues until the central core is essentially a ball of neutrons having a radius of about 10 km and a density of 1014 g cm\u20133. At the same time the outer shell of the star is blasted away in an explosion known as a supernova.", "26Fe56 + 0n1 -> 26Fe56 -> 26Fe59 -> 27Co59 + \u20131e0", "This process occurs at rates of about 105 yr\u20131 , and accounts for the lighter isotopes of many elements. The other process (the \u201cr\u201d, or rapid process) occurs in regions of high neutron density and involves multiple captures at rates of 0.1-10 sec\u20131:", "26Fe56 + 13 0n1 -> 26Fe56 -> 27Co59 + \u20131e0", "This mechanism favors the heavier, neutron-rich isotopes and the heaviest elements.", "A few nuclei are not accounted for by any of the processes mentioned. These are all low-abundance species, and they probably result from processes having low rates. Examples are Sn112 and Sn114which may be produced through proton-capture, and H2, Li6, Li7, Be, B10 and B11, which may come from spallation processes resulting from collisions of cosmic ray particles with heavier elements", "The solar system is believed to have formed about 5 billion years ago as a result of aggregation of cosmic dust and interstellar atoms in a region of space in which the density of such material happened to be greater than average. Over 99.8% of this mass, which consisted mostly of hydrogen, collapsed into a proto-sun; the gravitational energy released in this process raised the temperature sufficiently to initiate the hydrogen fusion reactions discussed above.", "The remaining material probably formed a disk that rotated around the sun. As the temperature dropped to around 2000K, some of the most stable combinations of the elements began to condense out. These substances might have been calcium aluminum silicates, followed by the more volatile iron-nickel system, and then magnesium silicates. The further aggregation of these materials, together with the other constituents of the cooling disk, is now believed to be the origin of the planets. Density estimates indicate that the planets closest to the sun are predominantly rocky in nature, and probably condensed first. The outer planets (Uranus, Neptune and Pluto) appear to consist largely of water ice, methane, and ammonia, with a smaller rocky core.", "The solar system is believed to have formed about 5 billion years ago as a result of aggregation of cosmic dust and interstellar atoms in a region of space in which the density of such material happened to be greater than average. Over 99.8% of this mass, which consisted mostly of hydrogen, collapsed into a proto-sun; the gravitational energy released in this process raised the temperature sufficiently to initiate the hydrogen fusion reactions discussed above.", "The remaining material probably formed a disk that rotated around the sun. As the temperature dropped to around 2000K, some of the most stable combinations of the elements began to condense out. These substances might have been calcium aluminum silicates, followed by the more volatile iron-nickel system, and then magnesium silicates. The further aggregation of these materials, together with the other constituents of the cooling disk, is now believed to be the origin of the planets. Density estimates indicate that the planets closest to the sun are predominantly rocky in nature, and probably condensed first. The outer planets (Uranus, Neptune and Pluto) appear to consist largely of water ice, methane, and ammonia, with a smaller rocky core.", "The Earth formed by accretion of solid and particulate material that remained after the much more massive amounts of hydrogen and helium present in the original protoplanets had been dispersed out of the solar system. Gradually, the heat produced by decay of radioactive elements brought about partial melting of the silicate rocks; these lower density molten materials migrated upward, leaving the more dense, iron-containing minerals below. This process, which took about 2 million years, was the first of the three stages into which the chemical evolution of the earth is usually divided:", "The above listing should not be taken too literally; all three kinds of processes have probably proceeded simultaneously, and over a number of cycles. Since the earth is losing approximately four times as much heat as is generated by radioactive decay, the principal driving force of primary and secondary differentiation has gradually slowed down. Partial melting of the upper mantle brought about further fractionation as silicon-containing materials of low density migrated outward to form a crust. In its early stages the stronger granitic rocks had not yet appeared, and the crust was mechanically weak. Upwelling flows of lava would break the surface, and the weight of the solidified lava would cause the crust to subside. In some places, magma would solidify underground, forming low-density rock (batholiths) that would eventually rise by buoyancy and push up overlying crust. These mountain-building periods probably occurred in 6-8 major episodes, each lasting about 800 million years.", "At the same time, outgassing of solids released large amounts of HCl, CO, CO2, H2S, CH4 , SO2 , and SO3 into the primitive atmosphere. Large amounts of water were present in the primeval rocks in the form of hydrates, which were broken down as the result of the heating. Eventually when the outer crust cooled enough to permit condensation of the water vapor as rain, a new stage of chemical evolution began. The rain was initially highly acidic, equivalent to about 1M HCl; this reacted readily with the basic rocks having high contents of K, Na, Mg, and Ca, leaching them away and forming what would eventually evolve into the oceans. The partial dissolution of the rocks also resulted in large amounts of sediments, which played their own role in the transformation of the earth\u2019s surface.", "Within the crust, the lighter materials, being in isostatic equilibrium with the upper mantle, floated higher, and gradually became the nuclei of continents, which grew by accumulating similar material around their boundaries. This picture of continental development is supported by isotopic ratio studies which indicate that the nucleus of the North American continent, the Canadian Shield, is over 2.5 billion years old, while the peripheral parts are less than 0.6 billion years of age.", "The more traditional geochemical view of primary differentiation begins with the assumption that the core of the earth is in a chemically reduced state, while the metallic elements constituting the mantle are almost entirely oxidized to their lower free energy cationic forms. Oxygen and sulfur acted as the major electron acceptors in this process, but the abundance of these elements was insufficient to oxidize much of the nickel or iron.", "Iron itself is believed to have played a crucial role in the primary differentiation of other metals and of oxidized metallic elements that iron is able to reduce. As the dense molten iron migrated in toward the core, it dissolved (formed a liquid alloy with) any other metals with which it came in contact, and it reduced (donated electrons to) those metallic cations that are less \u201cactive\u201d metals than iron under these conditions. The resulting metal would then mix with more of the migrating liquid iron, and be carried along with it into the core.", "Accordingly, elements whose reduction potentials are more positive than iron (i.e., are lower-free energy electron sinks) are called siderophiles; these elements have a low abundance in the crust and upper mantle. The other two important classes of solid-forming elements are lithophile and chalcophile (see below.) These generally have more negative reduction potentials than iron, and are distinguished mainly by their relative affinity for oxygen or sulfur. The chalcophiles, of which Cu, Cd, and Sb are examples, tend to form larger, more polarizable ions which can associate with the sulfide ion. The lithophiles comprise those elements such as K, Al, Mn, and Si, which have smaller ions and which combine preferentially with oxygen. This broad classification is reflected in the dominant forms in which many of these elements occur in nature.", "The differential distribution of the elements within one of the main regions of the earth has been studied in detail only in that portion that is accessible, namely the upper crust. It is clear that fractional crystallization from the cooling magma has played an important role. The relative temperatures at which minerals crystallize is determined in large part by their lattice energies, which are in turn related to ionic sizes and charges. Minerals with small, highly charged ions will have higher melting points and should crystallize first. Thus the sodium-containing feldspar albite (NaAlSi2O8) is found nearer the surface than is its calcium analog anorthite (CaAlSi2O8). The less abundant elements often do not form minerals of their own, but may replace the ion of a more abundant mineral in its crystal lattice. This is known as isomorphous replacement, and it naturally depends on the relative ionic radii. Some ion pairs that undergo isomorphous replacement in minerals are K+ and Ba2+, Si4+ and Ge4+.", "The Phase Rule can be invoked to explain in a very rough way the differentiation of the elements into distinct solid phases.", "P = C + 2 \u2013 F", "Taking the degrees of freedom as 2 (fixed temperature and pressure), the six major elemental components (O, Si, Al, Fe, Mg and Na) can form up to six phases. Actually, more than 99% of igneous rocks comprise seven principal mineral phases. These are: the silica minerals, feldspars, feldspathoids, olivine, pyroxenes, amphiboles and micas.", "The differential deposition of minerals is also influenced by the temperature-composition phase relations as exemplified by the ordinary two-component phase diagram. If the mineral that is rich in one component and which first crystallizes out is also more dense, then the richer ore will occur near the bottom of the deposit, while a more mixed ore (approaching the eutectic) will remain near the top.", "Whether an element is concentrated in the crust or elsewhere depends on its chemical behavior and on the physical properties of its stable compounds. Geochemists have found it convenient to establish the following general classifications:", "\"TheTalk\" site contains numerous links to discussions of geochronology and other evidence for the age of the earth, and on the pseudoscientific concept of a \"young Earth\".", "Unravelling geological time (Columbia University)", "Formation of the Earth's core - description of theories based on high pressure studies", "Page last modified: 21.01.2008", "\u00a9 1998 by Stephen Lower", "For information about this Web site or to contact the author,\nplease see theChem1 Virtual Textbook home page.", "This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial 2.5 License.", "The Earth is composed of 90 chemical elements, of which 81 have at least one stable isotope. Most of these elements have also been detected in stars. Where did these elements come from? The accepted scenario is that the first major element to condense out of the primordial soup was helium , which still comprises about one-quarter of the mass of the known universe.", "Hydrogen is the least thermodynamically stable of the elements, and at very high temperatures will combine with itself in a reaction known as nuclear fusion to form the next element, 2He4. \"Heavier\" nuclei (that is , those having high atomic numbers, indicated here by the subscript preceding the element symbol), are more stable than \"lighter\" ones, so this fusion process can continue up to 56Fe, which is the most energetically stable of all the nuclides. Beyond this point, heavier nuclei slowly become less stable, so fission becomes more likely. FIssion, however, is not considered an important mechanism of primordial nucleosynthesis, so other processes are invoked, as discussed farther below.", "Click on the above image to see a more detailied plot of nuclear binding energy as a function of atomic number.", "According to the \u201cbig bang\u201d theory for which there is now overwhelming evidence, the universe as we know it (that is, all space, time, and matter) had its origin in a point source or singularity that began an explosive expansion about 12-15 billion years ago, and which is still continuing.", "Following a brief period of extremely rapid expansion called inflation, protons and neutrons condensed out of the initial quantum soup after about 10\u201332 s. Helium and hydrogen became stable during the first few minutes, along with some of the very lightest nuclides up to 7Li, which were formed through various fusion and neutron-absorption processes. Formation of most heavier elements was delayed for about 106 years until nucleosynthesis commenced in the first stars. Hydrogen still accounts for about 93% of the atoms in the universe.", "Here is a more detailed time-line of the big-bang event", "All elements beyond hydrogen were formed in regions where the concentration of matter was large, and the temperature was high; in other words, in stars. The formation of a star begins when the gravitational forces due to a large local concentration of hydrogen bring about a contraction and compression to densities of around 105 g cm\u20133. This is a highly exothermic process in which the gravitational potential energy is released as heat, about 1200 kJ per gram, raising the temperature to about 107 K. Under these conditions, hydrogen nuclei possess sufficient kinetic energy to overcome their electrostatic repulsion and undergo nuclear fusion:", "4 1H12He4 + 2 b+ + 2 g + 2 n", "There will be a net mass loss in above process, which will therefore be highly exothermic and is known as \u201chydrogen burning\u201d. As hydrogen burning proceeds, the helium collects in the core of the star, raising the density to 108 g cm\u20133 and the temperature to 108 K. This temperature is high enough to initiate helium burning, which proceeds in several steps:", "2 2He4 4Be8 + g", "The first product, 4Be8 has a half life of only 10\u201316 sec, but a sufficient amount accumulates to drive the following two reactions:", "4Be8 + 2He4 6C12 + g", "6C12 + 1H1 7N13 6C13 + b+ + g", "The size of a star depends on the balance between the kinetic energy of its matter and the gravitational attraction of its mass. As the helium burning runs its course, the temperature drops and the star begins to contract. The course of further nucleosynthesis and the subsequent fate of the star itself depends on the star\u2019s mass.", "More on fusion nucleosynthesis (with nice animations of the reactions)", "If the mass of the star is no greater than 1.4 times the mass of our sun, the star collapses to a white dwarf, and eventually cools to a dark, dense dead star.", "In larger stars, the gravitational forces are sufficiently strong to overcome the normal repulsion between atoms, and so gravitational collapse continues. The gravitational energy released in this process produces temperatures of 6 108 K, which are sufficient to initiate a complex series of nuclear reactions known as the carbon-nitrogen cycle. The net reaction of this cycle is the further fusion of hydrogen to helium, in which C12 acts as a catalyst, and various nuclides of nitrogen and oxygen are intermediates. The temperature is sufficiently high, however, to initiate fusion reactions of some of these intermediates:", "6C12 + 6C12 10Ne20 + 2He4", "2 8O16 14Si28 + 2He4", "2 8O16 16S31 + 0n1", "The intense gamma radiation that is produced in some of these reactions breaks some of the product nuclei into smaller fragments, which can then fuse into a variety of heavier species, up to the limit of 26Fe56, beyond which fusion is no longer exothermic. The greater relative abundance of elements such as 6C12, 8O16, and 10Ne20 which differ by a 2He4 nucleus, reflects the participation of the latter species in these processes. These exothermic reactions eventually produce temperatures of 8 109 K, while contraction continues until the central core is essentially a ball of neutrons having a radius of about 10 km and a density of 1014 g cm\u20133. At the same time the outer shell of the star is blasted away in an explosion known as a supernova.", "Only six supernovas have been observed in our galaxy. The supernova of 1987 was the most recent; the one before this occurred in 1604, prior to the invention of the telescope. Tycho Brahe's observation of a supernova in 1572 was crucial in overturning the Aristotelian tradition of the immutability of the \"fixed stars\", or \"firmament\". The remains of these supernovas have been detected and studied by X-ray observations.", "Thus all of the elements in our solar system that are heavier than iron are the recycled remnants of former stars.", "The Chandra X-ray observatory page on supernovas", "Since 26Fe56 has the highest binding energy per nucleon of any nuclide, there are no exothermic processes which can lead to the formation of heavier elements. Fusion into heavier species is also precluded by the electrostatic repulsion of the highly charged nuclei. However, the process of neutron capture can still take place (this is the same process that is used to make synthetic elements). The neutrons are by-products of a large variety of stellar processes, and are present in a wide range of energies. Two general types of neutron capture processes are recognized. In an \u201cs\u201d (slow) process, only a single neutron is absorbed and the product usually decomposes by b-decay into a more proton-rich species:", "26Fe56 + 0n1 26Fe56 26Fe59 27Co59 + \u20131e0", "This process occurs at rates of about 105 yr\u20131 , and accounts for the lighter isotopes of many elements. The other process (the \u201cr\u201d, or rapid process) occurs in regions of high neutron density and involves multiple captures at rates of 0.1-10 sec\u20131:", "26Fe56 + 13 0n1 26Fe56 27Co59 + \u20131e0", "This mechanism favors the heavier, neutron-rich isotopes and the heaviest elements.", "A few nuclei are not accounted for by any of the processes mentioned. These are all low-abundance species, and they probably result from processes having low rates. Examples are Sn112 and Sn114 which may be produced through proton-capture, and H2, Li6, Li7, Be, B10 and B11, which may come from spallation processes resulting from collisions of cosmic ray particles with heavier elements.", "Table of cosmochemical abundances of the elements", "Page last modified: 21.01.2008", "\u00a9 1998 by Stephen Lower", "For information about this Web site or to contact the author,\nplease see theChem1 Virtual Textbook home page.", "This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial 2.5 License.", "The structure and composition of the outer part of the lithosphere has been profoundly affected by interactions with the atmosphere over one-quarter of the surface area of the earth, and with the hydrosphere over the remaining area. Further modification of the outermost parts of the crust has occurred as the result of the activities of living organisms. These changes have transformed much of the outermost parts of the crust into an unconsolidated surface region called the regolith. Further weathering and translocation of soluble substances often results in a sequence of horizons consisting of sediments, soils, or evaporites.", "Chemically, the earth\u2019s crust consists of about 80 elements distributed in approximately 2000 compounds or minerals, many of which are of variable composition. Over 99% of the mass of the crustal material is made up of only eight of these elements, however:", "The crust has its origin in the upwelling convection currents that bring mantle material near to the surface at the mid-ocean ridges. The reduced pressure causes it to melt into magma. The magma may solidify before it reaches the surface, forming basalt, or it may energe from the surface in a volcanic eruption. The oceanic crust consists mostly of the simpler silicate minerals, which are said to be basic or mafic. The more evolved, silicon-rich rocks found in the continental crust are known as acidic or sialic.", "Oceanic crust is continually being extruded from regions of the plastic mantle that intrude upward to just beneath the ocean\u2019s floor at the mid-ocean ridges. A corresponding amount of this crust is being returned to the lithosphere at subduction zones off the West coasts of the Americas, and in the process pushing up the mountain ranges that lie along these coasts. The subducted oceanic crust is reheated and combined with sedimentary material to undergo partial remelting and reworking; this is believed by some to be the origin of granite. Subduction proceeds at a rate of a few cm per year, and the complete cycle time is on the order of a few hundred million years.", "The continental and oceanic crusts.", "This schematic cross section runs in a west-to-east direction, from just of the West coast of South America on the left to the African continent on the right. Oceanic crust is shown in black, with with continental crust in red. (From Cosmos and Earth Study Guide, NYU)", "Both oceanic and contintental crusts float on the more dense upper lithosphere, and gradually shift their positions as they push against each other, and in response to the slow convective motions in the medium that supports them. The continental crust is thicker than the oceanic crust, but it is also less dense, which allows it to float higher (and thus to differentiate continents from oceans.) The lower density also prevents it from being subducted. Recycling can occur indirectly as continental material erodes and is deposited as sediments on the ocean floor, but this is a much slower process and one that takes billions instead of millions of years. Some of the very oldest rocks, found in Greenland and Labrador, have been dated at 3.9 billion years, and thus approach the age of the Earth itself.", "When magma crystallizes it forms igneous rock, the major component of the Earth\u2019s crust. The crystallization is a complex process which is not entirely understood, due largely to the lack of sufficient thermodynamic data on the various components at high temperatures and pressures. It is known that the different components of magma have differing melting points and densities, and that the phase behavior of multicomponent systems based on some of these substances is quite complex, involving binary and ternary eutectics, solid solutions, the presence of dissolved water (under pressure), and incongruent melting. One consequence of this complexity is that the composition of the magma will change as crystallization takes place; different substances will crystallize at various stages, and the resulting solids may migrate toward the top or bottom of the region if their densities differ greatly from that of the magma", "It is well known that larger crystals form when a melt cools more slowly. This principle affords a simple distinction between the coarser-grained plutonic rocks, which are believed to have been formed by gradual cooling of magma pockets within the crust, and the fine-grained volcanic rocks such as basalt. Under the influence of heat and pressure, particularly at plate boundaries, solid crustal material may undergo partial or complete remelting, followed by cooling and transformation into metamorphic rocks such as gneiss, micas, quartzite, and possibly granites.", "Granite was once thought to be an igneous rock, originating from the crystallization of a particular kind of magma. The association of granitic rocks with mountainous regions, and the similarity of their compositions in widely scattered regions, lends credence to the more recent hypothesis that granitic rocks are of metamorphic origin.", "Another class of rock is sedimentary rock, formed from the consolidation of material produced by weathering and other chemical, and biological processes. Sedimentary rocks cover about three-quarters of the land area of the earth; 80% are shales, 15% sandstones and 5% limestones.", "The chemical composition of rocks tends to be complex and variable, and can only be specified in a precise way at the structural level. The traditional way of expressing rock compositions is in terms of the mass percent of the oxides of the elements present in the rock.", "oxide", "common name", "fresh rock", "weathered rock", "Table 2: Chemical composition of a typical rock\n(quartz-feldspar-biotite gneiss)", "The figures are in percent by weight.", "This does not mean that these oxidess, or the structural units they represent, are actually present as such in a rock. In the chemical analysis of rocks, oxygen is generally not determined separately. When it is, however, it is found in an amount that would be expected to combine stoichiometrically with the other elements present. Thus the composition of albite can be written as either NaAlSi3O8 or Na2O\u00b7Al2O3\u00b76SiO2 . Some rocks contain varying ratios of certain elements. For example olivine, which can be considered a solid solution of Mg2SiO4 and Fe2SiO4, can be represented by (Mg,Fe)2SiO4; this implies that the ratio of metal to silica is constant, and that magnesium is ordinarily present in greater amount than iron.", "The major structural elements of rock (both in the crust and in the mantle) are the silicate minerals, built from silicon atoms surrounded tetrahedrally by four oxygens. The simplest of these consist just of SiO44\u2013 tetrahedra interspersed with positive ions to achieve electroneutrality; olivine, (Mg,Fe)2SiO4 is a well known example. More commonly, the silicate groups polymerize by sharing one or more oxygen atoms at adjacent tetrahedral corners. Depending on the number of joined corners per silicate unit, this can lead to the formation of a wide variety of chains (pyroxenes, amphiboles) and sheets (micas), culminating in the complete tetrahedral polymerization that produces quartz, SiO2.", "Higher degrees of polymerization are associated with higher ratios of Si to O, smaller quantities of positive ions, and higher melting points. Thus when magma cools, the first silicates to crystallize are the olivines, followed by chain and sheet minerals having progressively higher degrees of polymerization and smaller fractions of cations of metals such as Fe and Mg.", "Although some elements are distributed fairly uniformly throughout the crust, others occur at greatly enhanced concentrations in localized areas. There are two general processes that result in these localized excesses, which are called ores when their extraction and refining is economically feasible", "The first of these relates to how well a metallic ion can fit into the silicate lattice structure. Ions having the right charge and size can readily enter this structure, displacing the more common ions of Fe, Al and Mg. Such ions (of which Ga3+ is an example) are readily soluble in other minerals and thus are widely disributed and do not concentrate into ores. Other ions may be too large (Cs and La), too small (Li, Be, B) or too highly charged (Nb, Ta, W) to be accommodated in silicate mineral structures; these elements tend to remain in the magma as it solidifies, finally forming solid minerals only in the last stages of cooling.", "The other major source of ores is hydrothermal formation. Magma contains some water itself, and additional water from the surface is able to reach the heated rock near magma chambers. At the very high temperatures and pressures that prevail in these regions, the water can dissolve many compounds such as sulfides which are normally considered highly insoluble. When these superheated solutions rise to the surface the solids are re-deposited, often in highly concentrated form. Ores of Cu, Sn, W, and possibly some iron ores, as well as some native metals such as gold, are believed to be formed in this way.", "Hydrothermal vents known as \u201cblack smokers\u201d have been observed at sites of sea-floor spreading; the \u201csmoke\u201d consists of metallic sulfides which precipitate in the cold seawater. The veins of pyrites (FeS2) and similar sulfide minerals that are often observed in rock formations are the result of hydrothermal solutions that once penetrated cracks and fissures in the rock.", "The hydrothermal vent photographed here emits both black and white \"smoke\".", "Deep-sea hydrothermal vents (many more pictures)", "Theories of ore formation (a more technical tutorial)", "The weathering of rocks at the earth\u2019s surface is a complex process involving both physical and chemical changes. The latter tend in principle to be rather simple kinds of reactions involving dissolution, reaction with carbon dioxide, hydrolysis, hydration, and oxidation. The difficulty in studying them and in arriving at a quantitative description is that these reactions occur very slowly and may never reach an equilibrium state. A comparison of the two rightmost columns in Table 2 on page 14 provides some illustration of the overall effect of these changes, although it must be emphasized that these are relative composition data, and thus cannot show how much of a given component has been lost. In general, sodium, calcium and magnesium seem to be lost more rapidly than potassium and silicon, while iron and aluminum decrease very slowly. Individual rates are of course dependent on the particular structural units containing the element, and also vary somewhat with grain size and condition of the surface.", "Water is undoubtedly the most important weathering agent. Not only does it act as a solvent for ionic dissolution products, but it also brings other active agents such as carbon dioxide and oxygen into intimate contact with the rock material. As water percolates into the outermost layers of the crust, it extends the zone of weathering beneath the surface; the effects of this are quite noticeable in a number of buried sedimentary materials such as Paleozoic sandstones, which tend to be depleted of all but the most resistant minerals. Dissolution, the simplest of all the weathering processes, usually results in ionic species, some of which may react with water to yield acidic or alkaline solutions. Dissolution of silica, however, results in the neutral species H4SiO4. Reactions involving hydration and dehydration are very common, and since the free energy changes tend to be small, these reactions can usually take place in either direction under slightly different conditions. Thus gypsum and anhydrite are interconvertable at observable rates under common environmental conditions:", "CaSO4\u00b72H2O CaSO4 + 2 H2O", "In many cases, however, the reaction products are not very well characterized, thermodynamic data is lacking, and the reactions proceed so slowly that they are not entirely understood. For example, both hydrous and anhydrous iron oxides can be found in similar geologic environments, but the little is known about the interconversion process, represented approximately as", "Fe2O3 + H2O 2 FeOOH", "Solid carbonates tend to dissolve in acidic solutions, including those produced when atmospheric carbon dioxide dissolves in water. Thus the major surface limestone deposits (largely CaCO3, with some admixture of MgCO3) tend to be highly eroded in non-arid regions, and the local groundwater may have Ca2+ as high as 0.1-0.2M. Thermodynamics can unambiguously predict the most stable oxidation state of a metal ion under given conditions of pH and oxidant concentration. The mechanisms tend to be very uncertain, however. For one thing, both the reactant and product can often exist in various states of hydration, and the dissolved species (which probably undergo the actual oxidation) often consist of polycations and complexed species.", "Compounds of Fe(II), for example, will always tend to oxidize to Fe(III) in the presence of air; the various oxides of iron are responsible for the bright colors seen in many geological formations, and in certain soils. Some of the net reactions that probably occur are", "Fe2SiO4 + 1/2 O2 + H2O Fe2O3 + H2SiO4", "2 FeCO3 + 1/2 O2 Fe2O3 + 2 H2CO3", "An environmental side effect of the first process is the release of hydrated silica. Also, where both starting materials are present, the carbonic acid produced in the second reaction is believed to promote the dissolution of ferrous silicate, creating a source of Fe(II) ions that can be rapidly oxidized:", "Fe2SiO4 + 4 H2CO3 2 Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + H4SiO4", "Fe2+ + 4 HCO3\u2013 + 1/2 O2 Fe2O3 + 4 H2CO3", "The oxidation of sulfides can produce strongly acidic solutions:", "2 FeS2 + 15/2 O2 + 4 H2O Fe2O3 + 2 SO42\u2013 + 8 H+", "The effects of this can be seen in formations containing outcrops of pyrite veins, where the surrounding rocks are heavily stained with yellow and brown Fe(III) oxides, and the groundwater tends to be highly acidic. This process is mediated by microorganisms, and is an important source of acid pollution associated with mines and mine tailings.", "The various components of rocks weather at different rates. The more basic components such as CaO and MgO tend to disappear first, especially if in contact with groundwaters containing high CO2 concentrations. For rocks in general, the first reaction is usually hydration, followed by hydrolysis which can be summarized by", "4 KAlSi3O8(s) + 22 H2O Al4Si4O10(OH)8(s) + 8 H4SiO4(aq) + 4 K+ + 4 OH\u2013", "in which other Group 1 or 2 cations might replace potassium. The product Al4Si4O10(OH)8 is kaolinite, a form of clay (see below).", "In general, the rocks which crystallized first from the magma (the Ca-feldspars and olivines) weather more rapidly than do the lower-melting rocks.", "Clays are the solid end products of the weathering of rocks. They are basically composed of alternating sheets of \u201cSiO2\u201d and \u201cAlO6\u201d units in ratios of 1:1 (kaolinite), 2:1 (montmorillonite and vermiculite) and 2:2 (chlorite). In between the sheets, and holding them together by hydrogen bonding are water molecules. Also present are cations such as K+, Ca2+ and Mg2+ which act to neutralize the negative charges of the oxide ions.", "Structure of a clay, showing two layers of the stacked sheets of kaolinite.", "The major agents of physical weathering of exposed rocks are rapid changes in temperature (promoting fracture by differential expansion), the abrasive action of windborne material and glacier movement, and especially by the penetration of water into cracks and its subsequent freezing. The expansion of water on freezing can exert a pressure of 150 kg cm\u20132, whereas the tensile strength of a typical rock is around 120 kg cm\u20132 . The roots of some plants are able to penetrate rock quite effectively, producing comparable expansive pressures in subsurface rocks.", "Soils are a product of the interaction of water, air, and living organisms with exposed rocks or sediments at the earth\u2019s surface. A typical soil contains about 45% inorganic solids and 5% organic solids by volume. Water and air each make up about 20-30%.", "A simple way of classifying soils is based on the relative quantities of clay, silt and sand in the solid component. For ordinary agricultural purposes, loams are considered the most ideal soil type.", "The primary inorganic components of soils consist of sand and silt particles that come directly from the parent rocks. This fraction is dominated by quartz and feldspars (aluminosilicates). Secondary components are formed by chemical changes within the soil itself, or in sediments from which the soil derived. These are most commonly clays, but may also include calcite, gypsum, and sulfide minerals such as pyrites; the latter are formed by bacterial action under reducing conditions in the presence of organic matter.", "The clays have an especially important effect on both the physical properties of the soil, and on its ability to store plant nutrients, including trace nutrients such as Mo and Mn. These properties are due to the high ion-exchange capacity of clays. The more highly charged cations such as Al3+ and Fe3+ tend to be more strongly absorbed within the inter-sheet regions than do Mg2+ or K+. As plants withdraw these latter cations from the soil water, more are released by the clay components, which thus act as nutrient reservoirs.", "The ion-exchange properties of clays also help to maintain the pH balance of soils, through the exchange of H+ and cations such as Ca2+. The soil pH, in turn, strongly affects the solubility of nutrient cations, and thus their availability to plants. For example, the uptake of phosphorus (in the form of H2PO42\u2013 , is only efficient within the rather narrow pH range between 6 and 7. Below 6, dihydrogen phosphates of Fe and Al are precipitated, while insoluble Ca3(PO4)2 forms at higher pH\u2019s.", "Part of the organic matter of soil consists of organisms (mainly bacteria and fungi) and roots and root hairs. The remainder is largely in the form of fulvic and humic acids. These substances of indefinite composition are classified on the basis of their solubility behavior; fulvic acids remain in solution at pH 2, but humic acids, having molecular weights of 20,000 to 100,000, are precipitated. Both are flexible polyelectrolytes that interact strongly with their own kind and with inorganic ions.", "Associated with the fulvic and humic fractions are a wide variety smaller molecules such as alkanes, amino acids, amino sugars, sulfur and phosphorus derivatives of sugars, etc. Part of the organic carbon in a fertile soil is recycled in 1-2 years; plant residues, which are the major source of soil organic matter, have a half-life of days to months. Once carbon gets incorporated into humic substances, it is locked into a much slower recycling process; the turnover times of fulvic acids are a hundred years or more, while those for fulvic acids are around a thousand years. For this reason, humic substances are the major reservoir of organic carbon in soil. Organic matter, particularly polysaccharides, binds strongly to the cation components of clay colloids; the two together act as cementing agents and strongly influence the consistency and structure of the soil.", "Soil water is held by capillary action and adsorption with varying degrees of tenacity. This water binding strength is traditionally expressed in terms of the pressure, or \u201ctension\u201d that would be required to force the water out of the soil. The tension of capillary water varies over a wide range of 0.1-32 atm; only in the lower half of this range will it be available to plants, which can exert an osmotic pressure of up to about 15 atm. Water in excess of the capillary capacity fills larger voids and is called gravitational water. Its presence in surface soils corresponds to a flooded condition that inhibits plant growth by reducing soil aeration.", "The gas phase within soil pores generally has a CO2 content of 5-50 times that of the atmosphere due to the action of organisms. O2 tends to be depleted to roughly the extent that CO2 is present in excess. Under conditions of poor aeration (i.e., exchange with the atmosphere), considerable quantities of N2O, NO, H2, CH4, C2H4, and H2S may also be present.", "What is soil? An introductory survey", "Soil science tutorial from U. of Alberta", "Soils interactive textbook", "Page last modified: 21.01.2008", "\u00a9 1998 by Stephen Lower", "For information about this Web site or to contact the author,\nplease see theChem1 Virtual Textbook home page.", "This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial 2.5 License.", "Life as we know it on the Earth is entirely dependent on the tenuous layer of gas that clings to the surface of the globe, adding about 1% to its diameter and an insignificant amount to its total mass. And yet the atmosphere serves as the earth\u2019s window and protective shield, as a medium for the transport of heat and water, and as source and sink for exchange of carbon, oxygen, and nitrogen with the biosphere. The atmosphere acts as a compressible fluid tied to the earth by gravitation; as a receptor of solar energy and a thermal reservoir, it constitutes the working fluid of a heat engine that transports and redistributes matter and energy over the entire globe. The atmosphere is also a major temporary repository of a number of chemical elements that move in a cyclic manner between the hydrosphere, atmosphere, and the upper lithosphere. Finally, the atmosphere is a site for a large variety of complex photochemically initiated reactions involving both natural and anthropogenic substances.", "On the scale of cubic meters the air is a homogeneous mixture of its constituent gases, but on a larger scale the atmosphere is anything but uniform. Variations of temperature, pressure, and moisture content in the layers of air near the earth\u2019s surface give rise to the dynamic effects we know as the weather.", "Although the density of the atmosphere decreases without limit with increasing height, for most practical purposes one can roughly place its upper boundary at about 500 km. However, half the mass of the atmosphere lies within 5 km, and 99.99% within 80 km of the surface. The average atmospheric pressure at sea level is 1.01 x 105 pascals, or 1010 millibars. A 1-cm2 cross section of the earth\u2019s surface supports a column weighing 1030 g; the total mass of the atmosphere is about 5.27 x 1021 g.", "About 80% of the mass of the atmosphere resides in the first 10 km; this well-mixed region of fairly uniform composition is known as the troposphere.", "SOLAR IRRADIATION OF THE EARTH", "The gases ozone, water vapor, and carbon dioxide are only minor components of the atmosphere, but they exert a huge effect on the Earth by absorbing radiation in the ranges indicated by the shading. Ozone in the upper atmosphere filters out the ultraviolet light below about 360 nm that is destructive of life. O2, H2O, CO2 and CH4 are \"greenhouse\" gases that trap some of the heat absorbed from the Sun and prevent it from re-radiating back into space.", "We commonly think of gas molecules as moving about in a completely random manner, but the Earth\u2019s gravitational field causes downward motions to be very slightly favored so that the molecules in any thin layer of the air collide more frequently with those in the layer below. This gives rise to a pressure gradient that is the most predictable and well known structural characteristic of the atmosphere. This gradient is described by an exponential law which predicts that the atmospheric pressure should decrease by 50% for every 6 km increase in altitude. This law also predicts that the composition of a gas mixture will change with altitude, the lower-molecular weight components being increasingly favored at higher altitudes. However, this gravitational fractionation effect is completely obliterated below about 160 km owing to turbulence and convective flows (winds).", "The atmosphere is divided vertically into several major regions which are distinguished by the sign of the temperature gradient. In the lowermost region, the troposphere, the temperature falls with increasing altitude. The major source of heat input into this part of the atmosphere is long-wave radiation from the earth\u2019s surface, while the major loss is radiation into space.", "At higher elevations the temperature begins to rise with altitude as we move into a region in which heat is produced by exothermic chemical reactions, mainly the decomposition of ozone that is formed photochemically from dioxygen in the stratosphere. At still higher elevations the ozone gives out and the temperature begins to drop; this is the mesosphere, which is finally replaced by the thermosphere which consists largely of a plasma (gaseous ions). This outer section of the atmosphere which extends indefinitely to perhaps 2000 km is heated by absorption of intense u.v. radiation from the Sun and also from the solar wind, a continual rain of electrons, protons, and other particles emitted from the Sun\u2019s surface.", "Structure of the atmosphere. The main divisions of the atmosphere are defined by the elevations at which the sign of the temperature gradient changes. The chemical formulas at the right show the major species of interest in the various regions. The shaded D- and E-layers are regions of high ion concentrations that reflect radio waves and are important in long-distance communication.", "Except for water vapor, whose atmospheric abundance varies from practically zero up to 4%, the fractions of the major atmospheric components N2, O2, and Ar are remarkably uniform below about 100 km. At greater heights, diffusion becomes the principal transport process, and the lighter gases become relatively more abundant. In addition, photochemical processes result in the formation of new species whose high reactivities would preclude their existence in significant concentrations at the higher pressures found at lower elevations.", "The atmospheric gases fall into three abundance categories: major, minor, and trace. Nitrogen, the most abundant component, has accumulated over time as a result of its geochemical inertness; a very small fraction of it passes into the other phases as a result of biological activity and natural fixation by lightning. It is believed that denitrifying bacteria in marine sediments may provide the major route for the return of N2 to the atmosphere. Oxygen is almost entirely of biological origin, and cycles through the hydrosphere, the biosphere, and sedimentary rocks. Argon consists mainly of Ar40 which is a decay product of K40 in the mantle and crust.", "The most abundant of the minor gases aside from water vapor is carbon dioxide, about which more will be said below. Next in abundance are neon and helium. Helium is a decay product of radioactive elements in the earth, but neon and the other inert gases are primordial, and have probably been present in their present relative abundances since the earth\u2019s formation. Two of the minor gases, ozone and carbon monoxide, have abundances that vary with time and location. A variable abundance implies an imbalance between the rates of formation and removal. In the case of carbon monoxide, whose major source is anthropogenic (a small amount is produced by biological action), the variance is probably due largely to localized differences in fuel consumption, particularly in internal combustion engines. The nature of the carbon monoxide sink (removal mechanism) is not entirely clear; it may be partly microbial.", "Trace components", "Ozone", "Ozone is formed by the reaction of O2 with oxygen atoms produced photochemically. As a consequence the abundance of ozone varies with the time of day, the concentration of O atoms from other sources (photochemical smog, for example), and particularly with altitude; at 30 km, the ozone concentration reaches a maximum of 12 ppm.", "The concentration of atmospheric carbon dioxide, while fairly uniform globally, is increasing at a rate of 0.2-0.7% per year as a result of fossil fuel burning. The present CO2 content of the atmosphere is about 129 1018 g. Most of the CO2, however, is of natural origin, and represents the smallest part of the total carbonate reservoir that includes oceanic CO2, HCO3\u2013, and carbonate sediments. The latter contain about 600 times as much CO2 as the atmosphere, and the oceans contain about 50 times as much. These relative amounts are controlled by the rates of the reactions that interconvert the various forms of carbonate.", "The surface conditions on the earth are sensitively dependent on the atmospheric CO2 concentration. This is due mainly to the strong infrared absorption of CO2, which promotes the absorption and trapping of solar heat (see below). Since CO2 acts as an acid in aqueous solution, the pH of the oceans is also dependent on the concentration of CO2 in the atmosphere; it has been estimated that if only 1% of the carbonate presently in sediments were still in the atmosphere, the pH of the oceans would be 5.9, instead of the present 8.2.", "The amount of energy (the solar flux) impinging on the outer part of the atmosphere is 1367 watts m\u20132 . About 30% of this is reflected or scattered back into space by clouds, dust, and the atmospheric gas molecules themselves, and by the earth\u2019s surface. About 19% of the radiation is absorbed by clouds or the atmosphere (mainly by and O3 , but not CO2), leaving 51% of the incident energy available for absorption by the earth\u2019s surface. If one takes into account the uneven illumination of the earth\u2019s surface and the small flux of internal heat to the surface, the assumption of thermal equilibrium requires that the earth emit about 240 watts m\u20132. This corresponds to the power that would be emitted by a black body at 255 K, or \u201318\u00b0C, which is the average temperature of the atmosphere at an altitude of 5 km. The observed mean global surface temperature of the earth is 13\u00b0C, and is presumably the temperature required to maintain thermal equilibrium between the earth and the atmosphere.", "The energy radiated by the earth has a longer wavelength (maximum 12m) than the incident radiation. Most gases absorb radiation in this range quite efficiently, including those gases such as CO2 and N2O that do not absorb the incident radiation. The energy absorbed by atmospheric gases is re-radiated in all directions; some of it therefore escapes into space, but a portion returns to the earth and is reabsorbed, thus raising its temperature.This is commonly called the greenhouse effect. If the amount of an infrared-absorbing gas such as carbon dioxide increases, a larger fraction of the incident solar radiation is trapped, and the mean temperature of the earth will increase.", "Any significant increase in the temperature of the oceans would increase the atmospheric concentrations of both water and CO2, producing the possibility of a runaway process that would be catastrophic from a human perspective. Fossil fuel combustion and deforestation during the last two hundred years have increased the atmospheric CO2 concentration by 25%, and this increase is continuing. The same combustion processes responsible for the increasing atmospheric CO2 concentration also introduce considerable quantities of particulate materials into the upper atmosphere. The effect of these would be to scatter more of the incoming solar radiation, reducing the amount that reaches and heats the earth\u2019s surface. The extent to which this process counteracts the greenhouse effect is still a matter of controversy; all that is known for sure is that the average temperature of the Earth is increasing.", "Carbon dioxide is not the only atmospheric gas of anthropogenic origin that can affect the heat balance of the earth; other examples are SO2 and N2O. Nitrous oxide is of particular interest, since its abundance is fairly high, and is increasing at a rate of about 0.5% per year. It is produced mainly by bacteria, and much of the increase is probably connected with introduction of increased nitrate into the environment through agricultural fertilization and sewage disposal. Besides being a strong infrared absorber, N2O is photochemically active, and can react with ozone. Any significant depletion of the ozone content of the upper atmosphere would permit more ultraviolet radiation to reach the earth. This would have numerous deleterious effects on present life forms, as well as contributing to a temperature increase. The warming effect attributed to anthropogenic additions of greenhouse gases to the atmosphere is estimated to be about 2 watts per m2 , or about 1.5% of the 150 watts per m2trapped by clouds and atmospheric gases. This is a relatively large perturbation compared to the maximum variation in solar output of 0.5 watts per m2 that has been observed during the past century. Continuation of greenhouse gas emission at present levels for another century could increase the atmospheric warming effect by 6-8 watts per m2.", "A less-appreciated side effect of the increase in atmospheric carbon dioxide (and of other plant nutrients such as nitrates) may be reduction in plant species diversity by selectively encouraging the growth of species which are ordinarly held in check by other species that are able to grow well with fewer nutrients. This effect, for which there is already some evidence, could be especially pronounced when the competing species utilize the C3 and C4 photosynthetic pathways that differ in their sensitivity to CO2.", "Stephen Lower, Professor Emeritus (Simon Fraser U.) Chem1 Virtual Textbook", "The atmosphere of the Earth (and also of Venus and Mars) is generally believed to have its origin in relatively volatile compounds that were incorporated into the solids from which these planets accreted. Such compounds could include nitrides (a source of N2), water (which can be taken up by silica, for example), carbides, and hydrogen compounds of nitrogen and carbon. Many of these compounds (and also some noble gases) can form clathrate complexes with water and some minerals which are fairly stable at low temperatures. The high temperatures developed during the later stages of accretion as well as subsequent heating produced by decay of radioactive elements presumably released these gases the surface. Even at the present time, large amounts of CO2 , water vapor, N2, HCl, SO2 and H2S are emitted from volcanos. The more reactive of these gases would be selectively removed from the atmosphere by reaction with surface rocks or dissolution in the ocean, leaving an atmosphere enriched in its present major components with the exception of oxygen which is discussed in the next section.", "Any hydrogen present would tend to escape into space, causing the atmosphere to gradually became less reducing. However there is now some doubt that hydrogen and other volatiles (mainly the inert gases) were present in the newly accreted planets in anything like their cosmic abundance. The main evidence against this is the observation that gases such as helium, neon and argon, which are among the ten most abundant elements in the universe, are depleted on the earth by factors of 10\u20137 to 10\u201311 . This implies that there was a selective removal of these volatiles prior to or during the planetary accretion process.", "The overall oxidation state of the earth\u2019s mantle is not consistent with what one would expect from equilibration with highly reduced volatiles, and there is no evidence to suggest that the composition of the mantle has not remained the same. If this is correct, then the primitive atmosphere may well have had about the same composition as the gases emitted by volcanos at the present time. These consist mainly of water and CO2, together with small amounts of N2, H2, H2S, SO2, CO, CH4, NH3, HCl and HF. If water vapor was a major component of outgassing of the accreted earth, it must have condensed quite rapidly into rain. Any significant concentration of water vapor in the atmosphere would have led to a runaway greenhouse effect, resulting in temperatures as high as 400\u00b0C.", "Free oxygen is never more than a trace component of most planetary atmospheres. Thermodynamically, oxygen is much happier when combined with other elements as oxides; the pressure of O2 in equilibrium with basaltic magmas is only about 10\u20137 atm. Photochemical decomposition of gaseous oxides in the upper atmosphere is the major source of O2 on most planets. On Venus, for example, CO2 is broken down into CO and O2 . On the earth, the major inorganic source of O2 is the photolysis of water vapor; most of the resulting hydrogen escapes into space, allowing the O2 concentration to build up. An estimated 2 1011 g of O2 per year is generated in this way. Integrated over the earth\u2019s history, this amounts to less than 3% of the present oxygen abundance. The partial pressure of O2 in the prebiotic atmosphere is estimated to be no more than 10\u20133 atm, and may have been several orders of magnitude less. The major source of atmospheric oxygen on the earth is photosynthesis carried out by green plants and certain bacteria:", "\\[\\ce{H2O + CO2 -> (CH2O)_x + O2}\\]", "A historical view of the buildup of atmospheric oxygen concentration since the beginning of the sedimentary record (3.7 109 ybp) can be worked out by making use of the fact that the carbon in the product of the above reaction has a slightly lower C13 content than does carbon of inorganic origin. Isotopic analysis of carbon-containing sediments thus provides a measure of the amounts of photosynthetic O2 produced at various times in the past.", "Figure. Evolution of atmospheric oxygen content. Note carefully that the curve plotscumulative O2 production, but that until a few hundred million years ago, most of this was taken up by Fe(II) compounds in the crust and by reduced sulfur; only after this massive \"oxygen sink\" became filled did free O2 begin to accumulate in the atmosphere.", "Carbon dioxide has probably always been present in the atmosphere in the relatively small absolute amounts now observed (around 54 x 1015 mol = 54 Pmol). The reaction of CO2 with silicate-containing rocks to form precambrian limestones suggest a possible moderating influence on its atmospheric concentration throughout geological time.", "\\[\\ce{ CaSiO_3 + CO_2 \\rightarrow CaCO_3 + SiO_2 }\\]", "About ten percent of the atmospheric \\(CO_2\\) is taken up each year by photosynthesis. Of this, all except 0.05 percent is returned by respiration, almost entirely due to microorganisms. The remainder leaks into the slow part of the geochemical cycle, mostly as buried carbonate sediments.", "Since the advent of the industrial revolution in 1860, the amount of \\(CO_2\\) in the atmosphere has been increasing. Isotopic analysis shows that most of this has been due to fossil-fuel combustion; in recent years, the mass of carbon released to the atmosphere by this means has been more than ten times the estimated rate of natural removal into sediments. The large-scale destruction of tropical forests, which has accelerated greatly in recent years, is believed to exacerbate this effect by removing a temporary sink for \\(CO_2\\).", "The oceans have a large absorptive capacity for \\(CO_2\\) owing to its reaction with carbonate:", "\\[ \\ce{CO_2 + CO_3^{2\u2013} \\rightleftharpoons 2 HCO_3^\u2013}\\]", "There is about 60 times as much inorganic carbon in the oceans as in the atmosphere. However, efficient transfer takes place only into the topmost (100 m) wind-mixed layer of the ocean, which contains only about one atmosphere equivalent of \\(CO_2\\). Further uptake is limited by the very slow transport of water into the deep ocean, which takes around 1000 years. For this reason, the buffering effect of the oceans on atmospheric \\(CO_2\\) is not very effective; only about ten percent of the added \\(CO_2\\) is taken up by the oceans.", "Figure. This set of plots, taken from an ETE page with data from NASA, shows the dramatic increase in atmospheric CO2since the beginning of the industrial age. The \"squiggles\" on the Mauna Loa data reflect seasonal variations; more CO2is taken up during the longer-daylight periods of the summer.", "Stephen Lower, Professor Emeritus (Simon Fraser U.) Chem1 Virtual Textbook", "The biosphere comprises the various regions near the earth\u2019s surface that contain and are dynamically affected by the metabolic activity of the approximately 1.5 million animal species and 0.5 million plant species that are presently known and are still being discovered at a rate of about 10,000 per year. The biosphere is the youngest of the dynamical systems of the earth, having had its genesis about 2 billion years ago. It is also the one that has most profoundly affected the other major environmental systems, particularly the atmosphere and the hydrosphere.", "\"The tree of life\"", "About a third of the chemical elements cycle through living organisms, which are responsible for massive deposits of silicon, iron, manganese, sulfur, and carbon. Large quantities of methane and nitrous oxide are introduced into the atmosphere by bacterial action, and plants alone inject about 400,000 tons of volatile substances (including some metals) into the atmosphere annually.", "It has been suggested that biological activity might be responsible for the deficiency of hydrogen on Earth, compared to its very high relative abundance in the solar system as a whole. Bacteria capable of reducing hydrogen compounds into H2 transform this element into a form in which it can escape from the earth; such bacteria may have been especially active in the reducing atmosphere of the early planet.", "A second mechamism might be the microbial production of methane, which presently injects about 109 T of CH4 into the atmosphere each year. Some of this reaches the stratosphere, where it is oxidized to CO2 and H2O. The water vapor is photolyzed to H2, which escapes into space. This may be the major mechanism by which water vapor (and thus hydrogen) is transported to the upper atmosphere; the low temperature of the upper atmosphere causes most of the water originating at lower levels to condense before it can migrate to the top of the atmosphere.", "The increase in the abundance of atmospheric oxygen from its initial value of essentially zero has without question been the most important single effect of life on earth, and the time scale of this increase parallels the development of life forms from their most primitive stages up to the appearance of the first land animals about 0.5 billion years ago.", "All life processes involve the uptake and storage of energy, and its subsequent orderly release in small steps during the metabolic process. This energy is taken up in the combination of ADP with inorganic phosphate to form ATP, in which form the energy is stored and eventually delivered to sites where it can provide the free energy needed for driving non-spontaneous reactions such as protein and carbohydrate synthesis.", "ADP + PO43\u2013 \u2192 ATP \u0394G\u00b0 = +30 kJ", "The three main metabolic processes are glycolysis, respiration, and photosynthesis. The first two of these extract free energy from glucose by breaking it up into smaller, more thermodynamically stable fragments. Photosynthesis reverses this process by capturing the energy of sunlight into ATP which then drives the buildup of glucose from CO2.", "As its name implies, this most primitive (and least efficient) of all metabolic processes is based on the breakdown of a sugar into fragments having a smaller total free energy. Thus the 6-carbon sugar glucose can be broken down into two 3-carbon lactic acid units, or into three 2-carbon ethanol units.", "C6H12O6 \u2192 2 CH3CHOHCOOH \u0394G\u00b0 = \u2013197 kJ", "In this process, two molecules of ATP are produced, thus capturing 61 kJ of free energy. Since the standard free energy of glucose (with respect to its elements) is \u20132870 kJ, this represents an overall efficiency of about 2 percent.", "The net reaction of glycolysis is essentially a rearrangement of the atoms initially present in the energy source. This is a form of fermentation, which is defined as the enzymatic breakdown of organic molecules in which other organic compounds serve as electron acceptors. Since there is no need for an external oxidizing or reducing agent, there is no change in the oxidation state of the environment.", "When the enzymatic degradation of organic molecules is accompanied by transfer of electrons to an external (and usually better) electron acceptor, the process is known as respiration. The overall reaction of respiration is the oxidation of glucose to carbon dioxide:", "C6H12O6 + 6 O2 \u2192 6 CO2 + 6 H2O \u0394G\u00b0 = \u20132380 kJ", "In this process, 36 molecules of ADP are converted into ATP, thus capturing 1100 kJ of free energy: an efficiency of 38 percent.", "The oxidizing agent (electron sink) need not be oxygen; some bacteria reduce nitrates to NO or to N2, and sulfates or sulfur to H2S. These metabolic products can have far-reaching localized environmental effects, particularly if hydrogen ions are involved. Falling down the respiratory ladder presents a succinct picture of oxidation-reduction and the role of non-O2 electron sinksin biological energy capture.", "The energy of sunlight is trapped in the form of an intermediate which is able to deliver electrons to successively lower free-energy levels through the mediation of various molecules (mainly cytochromes) comprising an electron-transport chain. The free energy thus gained is utilized in part to reduce CO2 to glucose, which is then available to supply metabolic energy by glycolysis or respiration. In green plants and eukaryotic algae, the source of hydrogen is water, the net reaction being", "6 CO2 + 6 H2O \u2192 C6H12O6 + 6 O2 \u0394G\u00b0 = +2830 kJ", "For every CO2 molecule fixed in this way, 469 kJ of free energy must be supplied. Red light of 680 nm wavelength has an energy of 168 kJ/mol; this implies that about three photons must be absorbed for every carbon atom taken up, but experiment indicates that about ten seem to be required.", "The photosynthetic - respiration cycle.", "Photosynthesis utilizes the energy of red light to add hydrogen (from H2O) and electrons (from the O in H2O) to CO2, reducing it to carbohydrate. Respiration is the reverse of this process; electrons are removed from the carbohydrate (food is \"burned\") in small steps, each one releasing a small amount of energy. Some of this energy is liberated as heat, but part of it is used to add a phosphate group to ADP, converting it into ATP. ATP (adenosine triphosphate) is to an organism's energy needs as money is to our material needs; it circulates to wherever it is required in order to bring about energy-requiring reactions or to make muscle cells contract. Each increment of energy given up by ATP converts it back to ADP and phosphate, ready to repeat the cycle.", "Green plants are able to operate in both modes during the daylight hours, reverting to respiration-only at night. Animals carry out only the right side of the cycle and thus require as source of carbohydrate (\"food\") either directly (by eating plants), or indirectly by eating other animals that eat plants.", "There are many kinds of photosynthetic bacteria, but with one exception (cyanobacteria) they are incapable of using water as a source of hydrogen for reducing carbon dioxide. Instead, they consume hydrogen sulfide or other reduced sulfur compounds, organic molecules, or elemental hydrogen itself, excreting the reducing agent in an oxidized state. Green plants, cyanobacteria, green filamentous bacteria and the purple nonsulfur bacteria utilize glucose by respiration during periods of darkness, while the green sulfur bacteria and the purple sulfur bacteria are strictly anaerobic.", "Present evidence suggests that blue-green algae, and possibly other primitive microbial forms of life, were flourishing 3 billion years ago. This brackets the origin of life to within one billion years; prior to 4 billion years ago, surface temperatures were probably above the melting point of iron, and there was no atmosphere nor hydrosphere.", "By about 3.8 billion years ago, or one billion years after the earth was formed, cooling had occurred to the point where rain was possible, and primitive warm, shallow oceans had formed. The atmosphere was anoxic and highly reducing, containing mainly CO2, N2, CO, H2O, H2S, traces of H2, NH3, CH4, and less than 1% of the present amount of O2, probably originating from the photolysis of water vapor. This oxygen would have been taken up quite rapidly by the many abundant oxidizable substances such as Fe(II), H2S, and the like.", "Timeline for development of the major life forms.", "The fossil record that preserves the structural elements of organisms in sedimentary deposits has for some time provided a reasonably clear picture of the evolution of life during the past 750,000 years. In more recent years, this record has been considerably extended, as improved techniques have made it possible to study the impressions made by single-celled microorganisms embedded in rock formations.", "The main difficulty in studying fossil microorganisms extending back beyond a billion years is in establishing that the relatively simple structural forms one observes are truly biogenic. There are three major kinds of evidence for this.", "If all three of these lines of evidence are present in samples that can be shown to be contemporaneous with the sediments in which they are found, then the argument for life is incontrovertible. One of the most famous of these sites was discovered near Thunder Bay, Ontario in the early 1950\u2019s. The Gunflint Formation consists of an exposed layer of chert (largely silica) from which the overlying shale of the Canadian Shield had been removed. Microscopic examination of thin sections of this rock revealed a variety of microbial cell forms, including some resembling present freshwater blue-green algae. Also present in the Gunflint Deposits are the oldest known examples of metazoa, or organisms which display a clear differentiation into two or more types of cell. These deposits have been dated at 1.9-2.0 billion years.", "These filaments are believed to be the fossilized imprints of blue-green algae, one of the earliest life forms. They occur in the Bitter Springs Formation in Australia and are about 850 million years old.", "The evidence from very old paleomicrobiotic deposits is less clear. Western Australia has yielded fossil forms that are apparently 2.8 billion years old, and other deposits in the same region contain structures resembling living blue-green algae. Other forms, heavily modified by chemical infiltration, bear some resemblence to a present iron bacterium, and are found in sediments laid down 3.5 billion years ago, but evidence that these fossils are contemporaneous with the sediments in which they are found is not convincing.", "The oldest evidence of early life is the observed depletion of C13 in 3.8-billion year old rocks found in southwestern Greenland.", "Under the conditions that prevailed at this time, most organic molecules would be thermodynamically stable, and there is every indication that a rich variety of complex molecules would be present. The most direct evidence of this comes from laboratory experiments that attempt to simulate the conditions of the primitive environment of this period, the first and most famous of these being the one carried out by Stanley Miller in 1953.", "Schematic of the Miller experiment. A mixture of the various reduced gases believed to be compose the early atmosphere circulate through an apparatus in which spark discharges (intended to simulate lightning) create a complex mixture of organic compounds. S.L. Miller: A production of amino acids under possible primitive earth conditions. 1953: Science (117) 528-529. U. Texas provided the above diagram, and contains a very good description of of primitive life with many pictures of fossil organisms.", "Since that time, other experiments of a similar nature have demonstrated the production of a wide variety of compounds under prebiotic conditions, including nearly all of the monomeric components of the macromolecules present in living organisms. In addition, small macromolecules, including peptides and sugars, as well as structural entities such as lipid-based micelles, have been prepared in this way.", "The discovery in 1989 of a number of amino acids in the iridum-rich clay layer at the Cretaceous-Tertiary boundary suggests that bio-precursor molecules can be formed or deposited during a meteoric impact. Although this particular event occurred only 65 million years ago (and is presumed to be responsible for the extinction of the dinosaurs), the Earth has always been subject to meteoric impacts, and it is conceivable that these have played a role in the origin of life.", "The presence of clays, whose surfaces are both asymmetric and chemically active, could have favored the formation of species of a particular chirality; a number of experiments have shown that clay surfaces can selectively adsorb amino acids which then form small peptides. It has been suggested that the highly active and ordered surfaces of clays not only played a crucial role in the formation of life, but might have actually served as parts of the first primitive self-replicating life forms, which only later evolved into organic species.", "Since no laboratory experiment has yet succeeded in producing a self-replicating species that can be considered living, the mechanism by which this came about in nature must remain speculative. Infectious viruses have been made in the laboratory by simply mixing a variety of nucleotide precursors with a template nucleic acid and a replicase enzyme; the key to the creation of life is how to do the same thing without the template and the enzyme.", "Smaller polynucleotides may have formed adventitiously, possibly on the active surface of an inorganic solid. These could form complementary base-paired polymers, which might then serve as the templates for larger molecules. Non-enzymatic template-directed synthesis of nucleotides has been demonstrated in the laboratory, but the resulting polymers have linkages that are not present in natural nucleotides.", "It has been suggested that these linkages could have been selectively hydrolyzed by a long period of cycling between warm, cool, wet, and dry environmental conditions. The earth at that time was rotating more rapidly than it is now; cycles of hydration-dehydration and of heating-cooling would have been more frequent and more extreme.", "The first organisms would of necessity have been heterotrophs\u2014 that is, they derived their metabolic energy from organic compounds in the environment. Their capacity to synthesize molecules was probably very limited, and they would have had to absorb many key substances from their surroundings in order to maintain their metabolic activity. Among the most primitive organisms of this kind are the archaeons, which are believed to be predecessors of both bacteria and eucaryotes. DNA sequencing of one such organism, a methane-producer that lives in ocean-bottom sediments at 200 atm and 48-94\u00b0C, reveals that only about a third of the genes resemble those of bacteria or eucaryotes.", "It has been estimated that about 50 genes are required in order to define the minimal biochemical and structural machinery that a hypothetical simplest possible cell would have.", "The earliest organisms derived their metabolic energy from the organic substances present in their environment; once they began to reproduce, this nutrient source began to become depleted.", "Some species had probably by this time developed the ability to reduce carbon dioxide to methane; the hydrogen source could at first have been H2 itself (at that time much more abundant in the atmosphere), and later, various organic metabolites from other species could have served.", "Before the food supply neared exhaustion, some of these organisms must have developed at least a rudimentary means of absorbing sunlight and using this energy to synthesize metabolites. The source of hydrogen for the reduction of CO2 was at first small organic molecules; later photosynthetic organisms were able to break this dependence on organic nutrients and obtain the hydrogen from H2S.", "These bacterial forms were likely the dominant form of life for several hundred million years. Eventually, due perhaps to the failing supply of H2S, plants capable of mediating the photochemical extraction of hydrogen from water developed. This represented a large step in biochemical complexity; it takes 10 times as much energy to abstract hydrogen from water than from hydrogen sulfide, but the supply is virtually limitless.", "It appears that photosynthesis evolved in a kind of organism whose present-day descendents are known as cyanobacteria.", "The five \u201ckingdoms\u201d into which living organisms are classified are Monera, Protista (protozoans, algae), Fungi, Plantae, and Animalia. The genetic (and thus, evolutionary) relations between these and the subcategories within them are depicted below.", "Superimposed on this, however, is an even more fundamental division between the procaryotes and eucaryotes.", "In this group are primitive organisms whose single cells contain no nucleus; the gene-bearing structure is a single long DNA chain that is folded irregularly throughout the cell. Procaryotic cells usually reproduce by budding or division; where sexual reproduction does occur, there is a net transfer of some genetic material from one cell to another, but there is never an equal contribution from both parents.", "In spite of their primitive nature, procaryotes constitute the majority of organisms in the biosphere. The division between bacteria and archaea within the procaryotic group is a fairly recent one. Archaea are now believed to be the most primitive of all organisms, and include the so-called extremophiles that occupy environmental niches in which life was at one time thought to be impossible; they have been found in sedimentary rocks, hot springs, and highly saline environments.", "All other organisms\u2014 seaweeds (algae), protozoa, molds, fungi, animals and plants, are composed of eucaryotic cells. These all have a membrane-bound nucleus, and with a few exceptions they all reproduce by mitosis, in which the chromosomes split longitudinally and move toward opposite poles. Other organelles unique to eucaryotes are mitochondria, ribosomes, and structural elements such as microtubules.", "Oxygen and biogeochemical evolution", "Oxygen is poisonous to all forms of life in the absence of enzymes that can reduce the highly reactive byproducts of oxidation and oxidative metabolism (peroxides, superoxides, etc.). All organic compounds are thermodynamically unstable in the presence of oxygen; carbon-carbon double bonds in lipids are subject to rapid attack. Prebiotic chemical evolution leading to the development of biopolymers was possible only under the reducing, anoxic conditions of the primitive atmosphere.", "The rise of atmospheric oxygen. Once organisms existed that could use water as a hydrogen source for the reduction of carbon dioxide, O2began to be introduced into the atmosphere. The widespread occurrence of ferrous compounds in surface rocks and sediments provided a sink for this oxygen that probably did not become saturated until about 2 billion years ago, when the atmospheric oxygen abundance first rose above about 1 percent.Illustration from All about entropy, the laws of thermdynamics, and order from disorder. There is lots of good stuff here!", "As the oxygen concentration began to rise, organisms in contact with the atmosphere had to develop protective mechanisms in order to survive. One indication of such adaptation is the discovery of fossil microbes whose cell walls are unusually thick. A more useful kind of adaptation was the synthesis of compounds that would detoxify oxygen by reacting rapidly either with O2 itself or with peroxides and other active species derived from it. Isoprenoids (the precursors of steroids) and porphyrins are examples of two general classes of compounds that are found in nearly all organisms, and which may have originated in this way. Later, highly efficient oxygen mediating enzymes such as peroxidase and catalase developed. The widespread phenomenon of bioluminescence may be the result of a very early adaptation to oxygen. The compound luciferin is a highly efficient oxygen detoxifier, which also happens to be able to emit light under certain conditions. Bioluminescence probably developed as a by-product in early procaryotic organisms, but was gradually lost as more efficient detoxifying mechanisms became available.", "In spite of the deleterious effects of oxygen on cell biomolecules, O2 is nevertheless an excellent electron sink, capable of releasing large quantities of energy through the oxidation of glucose. This energy can be efficiently captured through oxidative phosphorylation, the key process in respiration.", "A cell that utilizes oxygen must have a structural organization that isolates the oxygen-consuming respiratory centers from the other parts of the cell that would be poisoned by oxygen or its reaction products. Some procaryotic organisms have developed in this way; a number of cyanobacteria and other species are facultative anaerobes which can survive both in the presence and absence of oxygen.", "It is in the eucaryotic cell, however, that this organization is fully elaborated; here, respiration occurs in membrane-bound organelles called mitochondria. With only a few exceptions, all eucaryotic organisms are obligate aerobes; they can rarely survive and can never reproduce in the absence of oxygen. Mitotic cell division depends on the contractile properties of the protein actomyosin, which only forms when oxygen is present.", "The development of the eucaryotic cell about 1.4 billion years ago is regarded as the most significant event in the evolution of the earth and of the biosphere since the appearance of photosynthesis and the origin of life itself. How did it come about? The present belief, supported by an increasing amount of evidence, suggests that it began when one species of organism engulfed another. The ingested organism possessed biochemical machinery not present in the host, but which was retained in such a way that it conferred a selective evolutionary advantage on the host. Eventually the two organisms became able to reproduce as one, and so effectively became a single organism. This process is known as endosymbiosis", "According to this view, mitochondria represent the remains of a primitive oxygen-tolerant organism that was incorporated into one that could produce the glucose fuel for the oxygen to burn. Chloroplasts were once free-living photosynthesizing procaryotes similar to present-day cyanobacteria. It is assumed that some of these began parasitising respiratory organisms, conferring upon them the ability to synthesize their carbohydrate food during daylight. The immense selective advantage of this arrangement is evident in the extent of the plant kingdom.", "It is interesting that an atmospheric oxygen concentration of about 1 percent, known as the Pasteur point is both the maximum that obligate anaerobes can tolerate, and the minimum required for oxidative phosphorylation.", "Louis Pasteur discovered that some bacteria are anaerobic and unable to tolerate oxygen above 1% concentration.", "As was mentioned previously, the oxygen produced by the first photosynthetic organisms was taken up by ferrous iron in sediments and surface minerals. The widespread deposits known as banded iron formations consist of alternating layers of Fe(III)-containing oxides (hematite and magnetite) that were laid down between 1 and 2 billion years ago; the layering may reflect changing climatic or other environmental conditions that brought about a cycling of the organism population.", "During the buildup of oxygen, an equivalent amount of carbon had to be deposited in sediments in order to avoid the thermodynamically spontaneous back reaction which would consume the O2through oxidation of the organic matter. Thus the present levels of atmospheric oxygen are due to a time lag in the geochemical cycling of photosynthetic products.", "As the oxygen concentration increased, evolution seems to have speeded up; this may reflect both the increased metabolic efficiency and the greater biochemical complexity of the eucaryotic cell. The oldest metazoan (multiple-celled) fossils are coelenterates that appeared about 700 million years ago. Modern representatives of this group such as marine worms and jellyfish can tolerate oxygen concentrations as low as 7%, thus placing a lower boundary on the atmospheric oxygen content of that era. The oldest fossil organisms believed to have possessed gills, which function only above 10% oxygen concentration, appeared somewhat later.Carbon dioxide decreased as oxygen increased, as indicated by the prevalence of dolomite over limestone in early marine sediments.", "The physical conditions under which life as we know it can exist encompass a relatively narrow range of temperature, pH, osmotic pressure, and ultraviolet radiation intensity. It seems remarkable enough that life was able to get started at all; it is even more remarkable that it has continued to thrive in the face of all the perils that have, or could have occurred, during the past 3 billion years or so.", "During the time that life has been evolving, the sun has also been going through the process of evolution characteristic of a typical star; one consequence of this is an increase in its energy output by about 30 percent during this time. If the sun\u2019s output should suddenly drop to what it was 3 billion years ago, the oceans would freeze. How is it that the earth was not in a frozen state for the first 1.5 billion years of life\u2019s existence? Alternatively, if conditions were somehow suitable 3 billion years ago, why have the oceans not long since boiled away?", "A rather non-traditional answer to this kind of question is that the biosphere is far from playing a passive role in which it is continually at the mercy of environmental conditions. Instead, the earth\u2019s atmosphere, and to a lesser extent the hydrosphere, may be actively maintained and regulated by the biosphere. This view has been championed by the British geochemist J.E. Lovelock, and is known as the Gaia hypothesis.", "Gaia is another name for the Greek earth-goddess Ge, from which root the sciences of geography, geometry, and geology derive their names. Lovelock's book Gaia: a new look at life on Earth (Oxford, 1979) is a short and highly readable discussion of the hypothesis.", "Evidence in support of this hypothesis is entirely circumstantial, but nevertheless points to important questions that must be answered: how have the climatic and chemical conditions on the earth remained optimal for life during all this time; how can the chemical composition of the atmosphere remain in a state that is tens of orders of magnitude from equilibrium?", "NOTE", "Although the Gaia hypothesis has received considerable publicity in the popular press, it has never been very well received by the scientific community, many of whom feel that there is no justification for proposing a special hypothesis to describe a set of connections which can be quite adequately explained by conventional geochemical processes. More recently, even Lovelock has backed away from the teleological interpretation of these relations, so that the Gaia hypothesis should now be more properly described as a set of loosely connected effects, rather than as a hypothesis. Nevertheless, these effects and the mechanisms that might act to connect them are sufficiently interesting that it seems worthwhile to provide an overview of the major observations that led to the development of the hypothesis.", "Teleology is the doctrine that natural processes operate with a purpose. See No longer willful, Gaia becomes respectable. 1988: Science 240 393-395.", "The increase in the oxygen content of the atmosphere as a result of the development of the eucaryotic cell was discussed above. Why has the oxygen content leveled off at 21 percent? It is interesting to note that if the oxygen concentration in the atmosphere were only four percent higher, even damp vegetation, once ignited by lightning, would continue to burn, enveloping vast areas of the earth in a firestorm. Evidence for such a worldwide firestorm that may be related to the extinction of the dinosaurs has recently been discovered. The charcoal layers found in widely distributed sediments laid down about 65 million years ago are coincident with the iridium anomaly believed to be due to the collision of a large meteor with the earth.", "The input of salts into the sea from streams and rivers is about 5.4 x 108 tons per year, into a total volume of about 1.2 x 109 km3 yr\u20131 . Upwelling of juvenile water and hydrothermal action at oceanic ridges provide additional inputs of salts. With a few bizarre exceptions such as the brine shrimp and halophilic bacteria, 6 percent is about the maximum salinity level that organisms can tolerate. The internal salinities of cells must be maintained at much lower levels (around 1%) to prevent denaturation of proteins and other macromolecules whose conformations are dependent on electrostatic forces. At higher levels than this, the electrostatic interaction between the salt ions and the cell membrane destroys the integrity of the latter so that it can no longer pump out salt ions that leak in along the osmotic gradient. At the present rate of salt input, the oceans would have reached their present levels of salinity millions of years ago, and would by now have an ionic strength far to high to support life, as is presently the case in the landlocked Dead Sea.", "The present average salinity of seawater is 3.4 percent. The salinity of blood, and of many other intra- and intercellular fluids in animals, is about 0.8 percent. If we assume that the first organisms were approximately in osmotic equilibrium with seawater, then our body fluids might represent \u201cfossilized\u201d seawater as it existed at the time our predecessors moved out of the sea and onto the land.", "By what processes is salt removed from the oceans in order to maintain a steady-state salinity? This remains one of the major open questions of chemical oceanography. There are a number of answers, mostly based on strictly inorganic processes, but none is adequately supported by available evidence. For example, Na+ and Mg2+ ions could adsorb to particulate debris as it drops to the seafloor, and become incorporated into sediments. The requirement for charge conservation might be met by the involvement of negatively charged silicate and hydroxyaluminum ions. Another possible mechanism might be the burial of salt beds formed by evaporation in shallow, isolated arms of the sea, such as the Persian Gulf. Extensive underground salt deposits are certainly found on most continents, but it is difficult to see how this very slow mechanism could have led to an unfluctuating salinity over shorter periods of highly variable climatic conditions.", "The possibility of biological control of oceanic salinity starts with the observation that about half of the earth\u2019s biomass resides in the sea, and that a significant fraction of this consists of diatoms and other organisms that build skeletons of silica. When these organism die, they sink to the bottom of the sea and add about 300 million tons of silica to sedimentary rocks annually. It is for this reason that the upper levels of the sea are undersaturated in silica, and that the ratio of silica to salt in dead salt lakes is much higher than in the ocean.", "These facts could constitute a basis for a biological control of the silica content of seawater; any link between silica and salt could lead to the control of the latter substance as well. For example, the salt ions might adsorb onto the silica skeletons, and be carried down with them; if the growth of these silica-containing organisms is itself dependent on salinity, we would have our negative feedback mechanism.", "The continual buildup of biogenic sedimentary deposits on the ocean floor might possibly deform the thin oceanic crust by its weight, and cause local heating by its insulating properties. This could conceivably lead to volcanic action and the formation of new land mass, thus linking the lithosphere into Gaia.", "Stephen Lower, Professor Emeritus (Simon Fraser U.) Chem1 Virtual Textbook", "Water is the most abundant substance at the earth\u2019s surface. Almost all of it is in the oceans, which cover 70% of the surface area of the earth. However, the amounts of water present in the atmosphere and on land (as surface runoff, lakes and streams) is great enough to make it a significant agent in transporting substances between the lithosphere and the oceans. Water interacts with both the atmosphere and the lithosphere, acquiring solutes from each, and thus provides the major chemical link between these two realms. The various transformations undergone by water through the different stages of the hydrologic cycle act to transport both dissolved and particulate substances between different geographic locations.", "Reservoir", "Volume / 106, km3", "Percent of total", "Shallow groundwater", "The composition of the ocean has attracted the attention of some of the more famous names in science, including Robert Boyle, Antoine Lavoisier and Edmund Halley. Their early investigations tended to be difficult to reproduce, owing to the different conditions under which they crystallized the various salts. As many as 54 salts, double salts and hydrated salts can be obtained by evaporating seawater to dryness. At least 73 elements are now known to be present in seawater.", "The best way of characterizing seawater is in terms of its ionic content, shown above. The remarkable thing about seawater is the constancy of its relative ionic composition. The overall salt content, known as the salinity (grams of salts contained in 1 kg of seawater), varies slightly within the range of 32-37.5%, corresponding to a solution of about 0.7% salt content. The ratios of the concentrations of the different ions, however, are quite constant, so that a measurement of Cl\u2013 concentration is sufficient to determine the overall composition and total salinity. Although most elements are found in seawater only at trace levels, marine organisms may selectively absorb them and make them more detectable. Iodine, for example, was discovered in marine algae (seaweeds) 14 years before it was found in seawater. Other elements that were not detected in seawater until after they were found in marine organisms include barium, cobalt, copper, lead, nickel, silver and zinc. Si32, presumably deriving from cosmic ray bombardment of Ar, has been discovered in marine sponges.", "pH balance. Reflecting this constant ionic composition is the pH, which is usually maintained in the narrow range of 7.8-8.2, compared with 1.5 to 11 for fresh water. The major buffering action derives from the carbonate system, although ion exchange between Na+ in the water and H+ in clay sediments has recently been recognized to be a significant factor.", "The major ionic constituents whose concentrations can be determined from the salinity are known as conservative substances. Their constant relative concentrations are due to the large amounts of these species in the oceans in comparison to their small inputs from river flow. This is another way of saying that their residence times are very large.", "A number of other species, mostly connected with biological activity, are subject to wide variations in concentration. These include the nutrients NO3\u2013, NO2\u2013, NH4+, and HPO42\u2013, which may become depleted near the surface in regions of warmth and light. As was explained in the preceding subsection on coastal upwelling, offshore prevailing winds tend to drive Western coastal surface waters out to sea, causing deeper and more nutrient-rich water to be drawn to the surface. This upwelled water can support a large population of phytoplankton and thus of zooplankton and fish. The best-known example of this is the anchovy fishery off the coast of Peru, but the phenomenon occurs to some extent on the West coasts of most continents, including our own.", "Other non-conservative components include Ca2+ and SiO42\u2013. These ions are incorporated into the solid parts of marine organisms, which sink to greater depths after the organisms die. The silica gradually dissolves, since the water is everywhere undersaturated in this substance. Calcium carbonate dissolves at intermediate depths, but may reprecipitate in deep waters owing to the higher pressure. Thus the concentrations of Ca and of SiO42\u2013 tend to vary with depth. The gases O2 and CO2, being intimately involved with biological activity, are also non-conservative, as are N2O and CO.", "Most of the organic carbon in seawater is present as dissolved material, with only about 1-2% in particulates. The total organic carbon content ranges between 0.5 mg/L in deep water to 1.5 mg/L near the surface. There is still considerable disagreement about the composition of the dissolved organic matter; much of it appears to be of high molecular weight, and may be polymeric. Substances qualitatively similar to the humic acids found in soils can be isolated. The greenish color that is often associated with coastal waters is due to a mixture of fluorescent, high molecular weight substances of undetermined composition known as \u201cGelbstoffe\u201d. It is likely that the significance of the organic fraction of seawater may be much greater than its low abundance would suggest. For one thing, many of these substances are lipid-like and tend to adsorb onto surfaces. It has been shown that any particle entering the ocean is quickly coated with an organic surface film that may influence the rate and extent of its dissolution or decomposition. Certain inorganic ions may be strongly complexed by humic-like substances. The surface of the ocean is mostly covered with an organic film, only a few molecular layers thick. This is believed to consist of hydrocarbons, lipids, and the like, but glycoproteins and proteoglycans have been reported. If this film is carefully removed from a container of seawater, it will quickly be reconstituted. How significant this film is in its effects on gas exchange with the atmosphere is not known.", "The salinity of the ocean appears to have been about the same for at least the last 200 million years. There have been changes in the relative amounts of some species, however; the ratio of Na/K has increased from about 1:1 in ancient ocean sediments to its present value of 28:1. Incorporation of calcium into sediments by the action of marine organisms has depleted the Ca/Mg ratio from 1:1 to 1:3.", "If the composition of the ocean has remained relatively unchanged with time, the continual addition of new mineral substances by the rivers and other sources must be exactly balanced by their removal as sediment, possibly passing through one or more biological systems in the process.", "In 1715 Edmund Halley suggested that the age of the ocean (and thus presumably of the world) might be estimated from the rate of salt transport by rivers. When this measurement was actually carried out in 1899, it gave an age of only 90 million years.", "This is somewhat better than the calculation made in 1654 by James Ussher, the Anglican Archbishop of Armagh, Ireland, based on his interpretation of the Biblical book of Genesis, that the world was created at 9 A.M. on October 23, 4004 BC, but it is still far too recent, being about when the dinosaurs became extinct. What Halley actually described was the residence time, which is about right for Na but much to long for some of the minor elements of seawater.", "The commonly stated view that the salt content of the oceans derives from surface runoff that contains the products of weathering and soil leaching is not consistent with the known compositions of the major river waters (See Table). The halide ions are particularly over-represented in seawater, compared to fresh water. These were once referred to as \u201cexcess volatiles\u201d, and were attributed to volcanic emissions. With the discovery of plate tectonics, it became apparent that the locations of seafloor spreading at which fresh basalt flows up into the ocean from the mantle are also sources of mineral-laden water. Some of this may be seawater that has cycled through a hot porous region and has been able to dissolve some of the mineral material owing to the high temperature. Much of the water, however, is \u201cjuvenile\u201d water that was previously incorporated into the mantle material and has never before been in the liquid phase. The substances introduced by this means (and by volcanic activity) are just the elements that are \u201cmissing\u201d from river waters. Estimates of what fraction of the total volume of the oceans is due to juvenile water (most of it added in the early stages of mantle differentiation that began a billion years ago) range from 30 to 90%.", "The oceans can be regarded as a product of a giant acid-base titration in which the carbonic acid present in rain reacts with the basic materials of the lithosphere. The juvenile water introduced at locations of ocean-floor spreading is also acidic, and is partly neutralized by the basic components of the basalt with which it reacts. Surface rocks mostly contain aluminum, silicon and oxygen combined with alkali and alkaline-earth metals, mainly potassium, sodium and calcium. The CO2 and volcanic gases in rainwater react with this material to form a solution of the metal ion and HCO3\u2013, in which is suspended some hydrated SiO2. The solid material left behind is a clay such as kaolinite, Al2Si2O5(OH)4. This first forms as a friable coating on the surface of the weathered rock; later it becomes a soil material, then an alluvial deposit, and finally it may reach the sea as a suspended sediment. Here it may undergo a number of poorly-understood transformations to other clay sediments such as illites. Sea floor spreading eventually transports these sediments to a subduction region under a continental block, where the high temperatures and pressures permit reactions that transform it into hard rock such as granite, thus completing the geochemical cycle.", "Deep-sea hydrothermal vents are now recognized to be another significant route for both the addition and removal of ionic substances from seawater.", "Although the relative concentrations of most of the elements in seawater are constant throughout the oceans, there are certain elements that tend to have highly uneven distributions vertically, and to a lesser extent horizontally. Neglecting the highly localized effects of undersea springs and volcanic vents, these variations are direct results of the removal of these elements from seawater by organisms; if the sea were sterile, its chemical composition would be almost uniform.", "Plant life can exist only in the upper part of the ocean where there is sufficient light available to drive photosynthesis. These plants, together with the animals that consume them, extract nutrients from the water, reducing the concentrations of certain elements in the upper part of the sea. When these organisms die, they fall toward the lower depths of the ocean as particulate material. On the way down, some of the softer particles, deriving from tissue, may be consumed by other animals and recycled. Eventually, however, the nutrient elements that were incorporated into organisms in the upper part of the ocean will end up in the colder, dark, and essentially lifeless lower part.", "Mixing between the upper and lower reservoirs of the ocean is quite slow, owing to the higher density of the colder water; the average residence time of a water molecule in the lower reservoir is about 1600 years. Since the volume of the upper reservoir is only about 1/20 of that of the lower, a water molecule stays in the upper reservoir for only about 80 years.", "Except for dissolved oxygen, all elements required by living organisms are depleted in the upper part of the ocean with respect to the lower part. In the case of the major nutrients P, N and Si, the degree of depletion is sufficiently complete (around 95%) to limit the growth of organisms at the surface. These three elements are said to be biolimiting. A few other biointermediate elements show partial depletion in surface waters: Ca (1%), C (15%), Ba (75%).", "The organic component of plants and animals has the average composition C80N15P . It is remarkable that the ratio of N:P in seawater (both surface and deep) is also 15:1; this raises the interesting question of to what extent the ocean and life have co-evolved.", "In the deep part of the ocean the elemental ratio corresponds to C800N15P, but of course with much larger absolute amounts of these elements. Eventually some of this deeper water returns to the surface where the N and P are quickly taken up by plants. But since plants can only utilize 80 out of every 800 carbon atoms, 90 percent of the carbon will remain in dissolved form, mostly as HCO3\u2013.", "To work out the balance of Ca and Si used in the hard parts of organisms, we add these elements to the average composition of the lower reservior to get Ca3200Si50C800N15P. Particulate carbon falls into the deep ocean in the ratio of about two atoms in organic tissue to one atom in the form of calcite. This makes the overall composition of detrital material something like C120N15P; i.e., 80 organic C\u2019s and 40 in CaCO3. Accompanying these 40 calcite units will be 40 Ca atoms, but this represents a minor depletion of the 3200 Ca atoms that eventually return to the surface, so this element is only slightly depleted in the upper waters. Silicon, being far less abundant, is depleted to a much greater extent.", "A continual rain of particulate material from dead organisms falls through the ocean. This shower is comprised of three major kinds of material: calcite (CaCO3), silica (SiO2), and organic matter. The first two come from the hard parts of both plants and animals (mainly microscopic animals such as foraminifera and radiolarians). The organic matter is derived mainly from the soft tissues of organisms, and from animal fecal material. Some of this solid material dissolves before it reaches the ocean floor, but not usually before it enters the deep ocean where it will remain for about 1600 years.", "The remainder of this material settles onto the floor of the sea, where it forms one component of a layer of sediments that provide important information about the evolution of the sea and of the earth. Over a short time scale of months to years, these sediments are in quasi-equilibrium with the seawater. On a scale of millions of years, the sediments are merely way-stations in the geochemical cycling of material between the earth\u2019s surface and its interior.", "The oceanic sediments have three main origins:", "Our main interest lies with the silica and calcium carbonate, since these substances form a crucial part of the biogeological cycle. Also, their distributions in the ocean are not uniform- a fact that must tell us something.", "The skeletons of diatoms and radiolarians are the principal sources of silica sediments. Since the ocean is everywhere undersaturated with respect to silica, only the most resistant parts of these skeletons reach the bottom of the deep ocean and get incorporated into sediments. Silica sediments are less common in the Atlantic ocean, owing to the lower content of dissolved silica.", "The parts of the ocean where these sediments are increasing most rapidly correspond to regions of upwelling, where deep water that is rich in dissolved silica rises to the surface where the silica is rapidly fixed by organisms. Where upwelling is absent, the growth of the organisms is limited, and little silica is precipitated. Since deep waters tend to flow from the Atlantic into the Pacific ocean where most of the upwelling occurs, Atlantic waters are depleted in silica, and silica sediments are not commonly found in this ocean.", "For calcium carbonate, the situation is quite different. In the first place, surface waters are everywhere supersaturated with respect to both calcite and aragonite, the two common crystal forms of CaCO3. Secondly, Ca2+ and HCO3\u2013 are never limiting factors in the growth of the coccoliths (plants) and forams (animals) that precipitate CaCO3; their production depends on the availability of phosphate and nitrogen. Because these elements are efficiently recycled before they fall into the deep ocean, their supply does not depend on upwelling, and so the production of solid is more uniformly distributed over the world\u2019s oceans.", "More importantly, however, the chances that a piece of carbonate skeleton will end up as sediment will be highly dependent on both the local CO32\u2013 concentration and the depth of the ocean floor. These factors give rise to small-scale variations in the production of carbonate sediments that can be quite wide-ranging.", "New crust is being generated and moving away from the crests of the mid-ocean ridges at a rate of a few centimetres per year. Although the crests of these ridges are relatively high points, projecting to within about 3000 m of the surface, the continual injection of new material prevents sediments from accumulating in these areas. Farther from the crests, carbonate sediments do build up, eventually reaching a depth of about 500 m, but by this time the elevation has dropped off below the saturation horizon, so from this point on the carbonate sediments are overlaid by red clay.", "If we drill a hole down through a part of the ocean floor that is presently below the saturation horizon, the top part of the drill core will consist of clay, followed by CaCO3 at greater depths. The core may also contain regions in which silica predominates. Since silica production is very high in equatorial regions, the appearance of such a layer suggests that this particular region of the oceanic crust has moved across the equator.", "Stephen Lower, Professor Emeritus (Simon Fraser U.) Chem1 Virtual Textbook", "To the extent that the composition of the ocean remains constant, the rate at which any one element is introduced into seawater must equal the rate of its removal. A listing of the various routes of addition and removal, together with the estimated rate of each process, constitutes the budget for a given element. If that budget is greatly out of balance and no other transport routes are apparent, then it is likely that the ocean is not in a steady state with respect to that element, at least on a short time scale. It is important to understand, however, that short-term deviations from constant composition are not necessarily inconsistent with a long-term steady state. Deviations from the latter condition are most commonly inferred from geological evidence.", "The major input of elements to the oceans is river water. Groundwater seepage constitutes a very small secondary source. These were considered the only sources until the 1970\u2019s, when the existence of hydrothermal springs at sites of seafloor spreading became known. There are presently no reliable estimates of the magnitude of this source. Pollution represents an additional input, mainly dissolved in river water, but also sometimes in rain and by dry deposition.", "Routes of removal are formation and burial of sediments, formation of evaporite deposits, direct input to the atmosphere by sea-salt aerosol transfer associated with bubble-breaking, and burial with sediments, either in interstitial water or adorbed onto active surfaces. Reaction with newly-formed basalt associated with undersea volcanic activity appears to be an important removal mechanism for some elements.", "The major elements undergoing steady-state dynamic change in the ocean are connected with biological processes. The key limiting element in the development of oceanic biomass is phosphorus, in the form of the phosphate ion. For terrestrial plant life, nitrogen is more commonly the limiting element, where it is taken up in the form of the nitrate ion. In the ocean, however, the ratio of the nitrate ion concentration to that of phosphorus has been found to be everywhere the same; this implies that the concentration of one controls that of the other. The source of nitrate ion is atmospheric N2, which is freely soluble in water and is thus always present in abundance. The conversion of N2 to NO3\u2013 is presumed to be biologically mediated, probably by bacteria. The constancy of the NO3\u2013/P concentration ratio implies that the phosphorus concentration controls the activity of the nitrogen-fixing organisms, and thus the availability of nitrogen to oceanic life.", "Photosynthetic activity in the upper part of the ocean causes inorganic phosphate to be incorporated into biomass, reducing the concentration of phosphorus; in warm surface waters, phosphate may become totally depleted. A given phosphorus atom may be traded several times among the plant, animal and bacterial populations before it eventually finds itself in biodebris (a dead organism or a fecal pellet) that falls into the deep part of the sea. Only about 1% of the phosphorus atoms that descend into deeper waters actually reach the bottom, where they are incorporated into sediments and permanently removed from circulation. The other 99% are released in the form of soluble phosphate, which is eventually brought to the surface in regions of upwelling. An average phosphorus atom will undergo one cycle of this circulation in about 1000 years; only a few months of this cycle will be spent in biomass. After an average of 100 such cycles, the atom will be removed from circulation and locked into the bottom sediment, and a new one will have entered the sea with river or juvenile water.", "Phosphorus is unique in that its major source of input to the oceans derives ultimately from pollution; in the long term, this represents a transfer of land-based phosphate deposits to the oceans. About half of the phosphorus input is in the form of suspended material, both organic and inorganic, the latter being in a variety of forms including phosphates adsorbed onto clays and iron oxide paticles, and calcium phosphate (apatatite) eroded from rocks. These various particulates are known to dissolve to some extent once they reach the ocean, but there is considerable uncertainty about the rates of these processes under various conditions.", "The major sink for oceanic phosphorus is burial with organic matter; this accounts for about two-thirds of the phosphorus removed. Most of the remainder is due to deposition with CaCO3. A minor removal route is through reaction with Fe(II) formed when seawater attacks hot basalt, and in the formation of evaporite deposits. However, there is more phosphorus in evaporite deposits in the Western U.S. than in all of the ocean, so it is apparent that the long-term phosphorus budget is still not clearly understood.", "Carbon enters the ocean from both the atmosphere (as CO2) and river water, in which the principal species is HCO3\u2013. Once in solution, the carbonate species are in equilibrium with each other and with H3O+, and the concentrations of all of these are influenced by the partial pressure of atmospheric CO2. The mass budget for calcium is linked to that of carbon through solubility equilibria with the various solid forms of CaCO3 (mainly calcite). During photosynthesis, C12 is taken up slightly more readily than the rare isotope C13. Since the rate of photosynthesis is controlled by the phosphate concentration, the C13/C12 ratio in the dissolved carbon dioxide of surface waters is slightly higher than in the ocean as a whole. Observations of carbon isotope ratios in buried sediments have been useful in tracking historical changes in phosphate concentrations.", "The ratio of carbon to phosphorus in sea salt is about eight times greater than the same ratio measured in organic debris. This implies that in exhausting the available phosphate, the living organisms in the upper ocean consume only 12.5% of the dissolved carbon. Even this relatively small withdrawal of carbon from the carbonate system is sufficient to noticeably reduce the partial pressure of gaseous CO2 in equilibrium with the ocean; it has been estimated that if all life in the ocean should suddenly cease, the atmospheric CO2 content would rise to about three times its present level. The regulation of atmospheric CO2 pressure by the oceans also works the other way: since the amount of dissolved carbonate in the oceans is so much greater than the amount of CO2 in the atmosphere, the oceans act to buffer the effects of additions of CO2 to the atmosphere. Calculations indicate that about half of the CO2 that has been produced by burning fossil fuel since the Industrial Revolution has ended up in the oceans.", "This is of course the major carbonate species in the ocean. Although it is interconvertible with CO2 and is thus coupled to the carbon and photosynthetic cycles, itself can neither be taken up nor produced by organisms, and so it can be treated somewhat independently of biological activity. In this sense the only major input of into the oceans is river water. The two removal mechanisms are formation of CO2", "\\[H^+ + HCO_3^\u2013 \\rightarrow H_2O + CO^2\\]", "and the (biologically mediated) formation of \\(CaCO_3^:\\)", "\\[Ca^{2+} + HCO_3^\u2013 \\rightarrow CaCO_3 + H^+\\]", "Since the pH of the oceans does not change, \\(H^+\\) is conserved and the removal of \\(HCO_3^\u2013\\) by biogenic secretion of \\(CaCO_3\\) can be expressed by the sum of these reactions:", "\\[Ca^{2+} + 2 HCO_3^\u2013 \\rightarrow CaCO_3 + CO_2 + H_2O\\]", "whose reverse direction represents the dissolution of the skeletal remains of dead organisms as they fall to lower depths.", "The upper parts of the ocean tend to be supersaturated in CaCO3. Solid CaCO3, in the form of calcite, is manufactured by a large variety of organisms such as foraminifera. A constant rain of calcite falls through the ocean as these organisms die. The solubility of increases with pressure, so only that portion of the calcite that falls to shallow regions of the ocean floor is incorporated into sediments and removed from circulation; the remainder dissolves after reaching a depth known as the lysolcline. At the present time, the amounts of carbonate and Ca2+ supplied by erosion and volcanism appear to be only about one-third as great as the amount of calcite produced by organisms. As the carbonate concentration in a given region of the ocean becomes depleted due to higher calcite production, the lysocline moves up, tending to replenish the carbonate, and reducing the amount that is withdrawn by burial in sediments. Organic residues that fall into the deep sea are mostly oxidized to CO2, presumably by bacterial activity.", "Calcium is removed from seawater solely by biodeposition as CaCO3, a process whose rate can be determined quite accurately both at the present and in the past.", "inputs", "outputs", "Present-day budget for oceanic calcium (Tg Ca/yr).", "As is explained above, the upper part of the ocean is supersaturated in calcite but the lower ocean is not. For this reason, less than 20% of the CaCO3 that is formed ends up as sediment and is eventually buried.", "The main questions about the calcium budget tend to focus on the rates and locales at which dissolution of skeletal carbonates occurs, and on how to interpret the various kinds of existing carbonate sediments. For example, the crystalline form aragonite is less stable than calcite, and will presumably dissolve at a higher elevation. The absence of aragonite-containing pteropod shells in deeper deposits seems to confirm this, but in the absence of rate data is it difficult to know at what elevations these particular organisms originated.", "The data in the above Table indicate that at the present time there is a net removal of calcium from the oceans. This is due to the rise in sea level since the decline of the more recent glacial epoch during the past 11,000 years. The additional water has covered the continental shelves, increasing the amount of shallow ocean where the growth of organisms is most intense. Over the more distant past (25 million years) the calcium budget appears to be well balanced.", "Evidence from geology and peleontology indicates that the salinity, and hence the chloride concentration of sewater has been quite constant for about 600 million years. There have been periods when climatic conditions and coastal topography have led to episodes of evaporite formation, but these have evidently been largely compensated by the eventual return of the evaporite deposits to the sea. The natural input of chloride from rivers is about 215 Tg/yr, but the present input is about half again as great (Table 7 on page 33), due to pollution. Also, there are presently no significant areas where seawater is evaporating to dryness. Thus the oceanic chloride budget is considerably out of balance. However, the replacement time of Cl\u2013 in the oceans is so long (87 million years) that this will probably have no long-term effect.", "Although sodium is tied to chloride, it is also involved in the formation of silicate minerals, the weathering of rocks, and in cation exchange with clay sediments. Its short-term budget is quite out of balance for the same reasons as is that of chloride. On a longer time scale, removal of sodium by reaction with hot basalt associated with undersea volcanic activity may be of importance.", "Considerably more sulfate is being added to seawater than is being removed by the major mechanisms of sediment formation (mainly CaSO4 and pyrites). The natural river input is 82 Tg of S per year, while that due to pollution is 61 Tg/yr from rivers and 17 Tg/yr from rain and dry deposition.", "This element is unusual in that its river-water input is balanced mostly by reaction with volcanic basalt; removal through biogenic formation of magnesian calcite (dolomite) accounts for only 11% of its total removal from the ocean. The present-day magnesium budget seems to have been balanced for the past 100 million years. However, most of the extensive dolomite deposits were formed prior to this time, so the longer-term magnesium budget is poorly understood.", "The potassium budget of the ocean is not well understood. The element is unusual in that only about 60% of its input is by rivers; the remainder is believed to come from newly formed undersea basalt. The big question about potassium is how it is removed; fixation by ion-exchange with illite clays seems to be a major mechanism, and its uptake by basalt (at lower temperatures than are required for its release) is also believed to occur.", "About 85% of the silicon input to the oceans comes from river water in the form of silicic acid, H4SiO4. The remainder probably comes from basalt. It is removed by biogenic deposition as opaline silica, SiO2\u00b7n H2O produced mainly by planktonic organisms (radiolaria and diatoms). Unlike the case for CaCO3, the ocean is everywhere undersaturated in silica, especially near the surface where these organisms deplete it with greater efficiency than any other element.", "Because opaline silica dissolves so rapidly, only a small fraction makes it to the bottom. The major deposits occur in shallower waters where coastal upwelling provides a good supply of N and P nutrients for siliceous organisms. Thus over half of the biogenic silica deposits are found in the Antarctic ocean.", "In spite of the fact that dissolved silica has the shortest replacement time (21,000 years) of any major element in the ocean, its concentration appears to have been remarkably constant during geological time. This is taken as an indication of the ability of siliceous organisms to respond quickly to changes in local concentrations of dissolved silica.", "This element is complicated by its biologically-mediated exchange with atmospheric nitrogen, and by its existence in several oxidation states, all of which are interconvertible. Unlike the other major elements, nitrogen does not form extensive sedimentary deposits; most of the nitrogen present in dead organic material seems to be removed before it can be buried. Through this mechanism there is extensive cycling of nitrogen between the shallow and deep parts of the oceans.", "The real difficulty in constructing a budget for oceanic nitrogen is the very large uncertainty in the rates of the major input (fixation) and output. Both of these processes are biologically mediated, but little is known about what organisms are responsible, where they thrive and how they are affected by local nutrient supply and other conditions.", "Stephen Lower, Professor Emeritus (Simon Fraser U.) Chem1 Virtual Textbook", "The composition of the ocean has attracted the attention of some of the more famous names in science, including Robert Boyle, Antoine Lavoisier and Edmund Halley. Their early investigations tended to be difficult to reproduce, owing to the different conditions under which they crystallized the various salts.", "As many as 54 salts, double salts and hydrated salts can be obtained by evaporating seawater to dryness. At least 73 elements are now known to be present in seawater.", "These values, expressed in parts per thousand, are for seawater of 35% salinity.", "The best way of characterising seawater is in terms of its ionic content, shown above. The remarkable thing about seawater is the constancy of its relative ionic composition. The overall salt content, known as the salinity (grams of salts contained in 1 kg of seawater), varies slightly within the range of 32-37.5%, corresponding to a solution of about 0.7% salt content. The ratios of the concentrations of the different ions, however, are quite constant, so that a measurement of Cl\u2013 concentration is sufficient to determine the overall composition and total salinity. Although most elements are found in seawater only at trace levels, marine organisms may selectively absorb them and make them more detectable. Iodine, for example, was discovered in marine algae (seaweeds) 14 years before it was found in seawater. Other elements that were not detected in seawater until after they were found in marine organisms include barium, cobalt, copper, lead, nickel, silver and zinc. Si32, presumably deriving from cosmic ray bombardment of Ar, has been discovered in marine sponges.", "pH balance. Reflecting this constant ionic composition is the pH, which is usually maintained in the narrow range of 7.8-8.2, compared with 1.5 to 11 for fresh water. The major buffering action derives from the carbonate system, although ion exchange between Na+ in the water and H+ in clay sediments has recently been recognized to be a significant factor.", "The major ionic constituents whose concentrations can be determined from the salinity are known as conservative substances. Their constant relative concentrations are due to the large amounts of these species in the oceans in comparison to their small inputs from river flow. This is another way of saying that their residence times are very large.", "Concentrations in micromols/L", "Replacement time with respect to river addition for some components of seawater", "A number of other species, mostly connected with biological activity, are subject to wide variations in concentration. These include the nutrients NO3\u2013, NO2\u2013, NH4+, and HPO42\u2013, which may become depleted near the surface in regions of warmth and light. As was explained in the preceding subsection on coastal upwelling, offshore prevailing winds tend to drive Western coastal surface waters out to sea, causing deeper and more nutrient-rich water to be drawn to the surface. This upwelled water can support a large population of phytoplankton and thus of zooplankton and fish. The best-known example of this is the anchovy fishery off the coast of Peru, but the phenomenon occurs to some extent on the West coasts of most continents, including our own.", "Other non-conservative components include Ca2+ and SiO42\u2013. These ions are incorporated into the solid parts of marine organisms, which sink to greater depths after the organisms die. The silica gradually dissolves, since the water is everywhere undersaturated in this substance. Calcium carbonate dissolves at intermediate depths, but may reprecipitate in deep waters owing to the higher pressure. Thus the concentrations of Ca and of SiO42\u2013 tend to vary with depth. The gases O2 and CO2, being intimately involved with biological activity, are also non-conservative, as are N2O and CO.", "Most of the organic carbon in seawater is present as dissolved material, with only about 1-2% in particulates. The total organic carbon content ranges between 0.5 mg/L in deep water to 1.5 mg/L near the surface. There is still considerable disagreement about the composition of the dissolved organic matter; much of it appears to be of high molecular weight, and may be polymeric. Substances qualitatively similar to the humic acids found in soils can be isolated. The greenish color that is often associated with coastal waters is due to a mixture of fluorescent, high molecular weight substances of undetermined composition known as \u201cGelbstoffe\u201d. It is likely that the significance of the organic fraction of seawater may be much greater than its low abundance would suggest. For one thing, many of these substances are lipid-like and tend to adsorb onto surfaces. It has been shown that any particle entering the ocean is quickly coated with an organic surface film that may influence the rate and extent of its dissolution or decomposition. Certain inorganic ions may be strongly complexed by humic-like substances. The surface of the ocean is mostly covered with an organic film, only a few molecular layers thick. This is believed to consist of hydrocarbons, lipids, and the like, but glycoproteins and proteoglycans have been reported. If this film is carefully removed from a container of seawater, it will quickly be reconstituted. How significant this film is in its effects on gas exchange with the atmosphere is not known.", "The salinity of the ocean appears to have been about the same for at least the last 200 million years. There have been changes in the relative amounts of some species, however; the ratio of Na/K has increased from about 1:1 in ancient ocean sediments to its present value of 28:1. Incorporation of calcium into sediments by the action of marine organisms has depleted the Ca/Mg ratio from 1:1 to 1:3.", "Mass balance of P, C, and Ca for the oceans", "If the composition of the ocean has remained relatively unchanged with time, the continual addition of new mineral substances by the rivers and other sources must be exactly balanced by their removal as sediment, possibly passing through one or more biological systems in the process.", "In 1715 Edmund Halley suggested that the age of the ocean (and thus presumably of the world) might be estimated from the rate of salt transport by rivers. When this measurement was actually carried out in 1899, it gave an age of only 90 million years.", "This is somewhat better than the calculation made in 1654 by James Ussher, the Anglican Archbishop of Armagh, Ireland, based on his interpretation of the Biblical book of Genesis, that the world was created at 9 A.M. on October 23, 4004 BC, but it is still far too recent, being about when the dinosaurs became extinct. What Halley actually described was the residence time, which is about right for Na but much to long for some of the minor elements of seawater.", "The commonly stated view that the salt content of the oceans derives from surface runoff that contains the products of weathering and soil leaching is not consistent with the known compositions of the major river waters (See Table). The halide ions are particularly over-represented in seawater, compared to fresh water. These were once referred to as \u201cexcess volatiles\u201d, and were attributed to volcanic emissions. With the discovery of plate tectonics, it became apparent that the locations of seafloor spreading at which fresh basalt flows up into the ocean from the mantle are also sources of mineral-laden water. Some of this may be seawater that has cycled through a hot porous region and has been able to dissolve some of the mineral material owing to the high temperature. Much of the water, however, is \u201cjuvenile\u201d water that was previously incorporated into the mantle material and has never before been in the liquid phase. The substances introduced by this means (and by volcanic activity) are just the elements that are \u201cmissing\u201d from river waters. Estimates of what fraction of the total volume of the oceans is due to juvenile water (most of it added in the early stages of mantle differentiation that began a billion years ago) range from 30 to 90%.", "The oceans can be regarded as a product of a giant acid-base titration in which the carbonic acid present in rain reacts with the basic materials of the lithosphere. The juvenile water introduced at locations of ocean-floor spreading is also acidic, and is partly neutralized by the basic components of the basalt with which it reacts. Surface rocks mostly contain aluminum, silicon and oxygen combined with alkali and alkaline-earth metals, mainly potassium, sodium and calcium. The CO2 and volcanic gases in rainwater react with this material to form a solution of the metal ion and HCO3\u2013, in which is suspended some hydrated SiO2. The solid material left behind is a clay such as kaolinite, Al2Si2O5(OH)4. This first forms as a friable coating on the surface of the weathered rock; later it becomes a soil material, then an alluvial deposit, and finally it may reach the sea as a suspended sediment. Here it may undergo a number of poorly-understood transformations to other clay sediments such as illites. Sea floor spreading eventually transports these sediments to a subduction region under a continental block, where the high temperatures and pressures permit reactions that transform it into hard rock such as granite, thus completing the geochemical cycle.", "Deep-sea hydrothermal vents are now recognized to be another significant route for both the addition and removal of ionic substances from seawater.", "Although the relative concentrations of most of the elements in seawater are constant throughout the oceans, there are certain elements that tend to have highly uneven distributions vertically, and to a lesser extent horizontally. Neglecting the highly localized effects of undersea springs and volcanic vents, these variations are direct results of the removal of these elements from seawater by organisms; if the sea were sterile, its chemical composition would be almost uniform.", "Plant life can exist only in the upper part of the ocean where there is sufficient light available to drive photosynthesis. These plants, together with the animals that consume them, extract nutrients from the water, reducing the concentrations of certain elements in the upper part of the sea. When these organisms die, they fall toward the lower depths of the ocean as particulate material. On the way down, some of the softer particles, deriving from tissue, may be consumed by other animals and recycled. Eventually, however, the nutrient elements that were incorporated into organisms in the upper part of the ocean will end up in the colder, dark, and essentially lifeless lower part.", "Mixing between the upper and lower reservoirs of the ocean is quite slow, owing to the higher density of the colder water; the average residence time of a water molecule in the lower reservoir is about 1600 years. Since the volume of the upper reservoir is only about 1/20 of that of the lower, a water molecule stays in the upper reservoir for only about 80 years.", "Except for dissolved oxygen, all elements required by living organisms are depleted in the upper part of the ocean with respect to the lower part. In the case of the major nutrients P, N and Si, the degree of depletion is sufficiently complete (around 95%) to limit the growth of organisms at the surface. These three elements are said to be biolimiting. A few other biointermediate elements show partial depletion in surface waters: Ca (1%), C (15%), Ba (75%).", "The organic component of plants and animals has the average composition C80N15P . It is remarkable that the ratio of N:P in seawater (both surface and deep) is also 15:1; this raises the interesting question of to what extent the ocean and life have co-evolved.", "In the deep part of the ocean the elemental ratio corresponds to C800N15P, but of course with much larger absolute amounts of these elements. Eventually some of this deeper water returns to the surface where the N and P are quickly taken up by plants. But since plants can only utilize 80 out of every 800 carbon atoms, 90 percent of the carbon will remain in dissolved form, mostly as HCO3\u2013.", "To work out the balance of Ca and Si used in the hard parts of organisms, we add these elements to the average composition of the lower reservior to get Ca3200Si50C800N15P. Particulate carbon falls into the deep ocean in the ratio of about two atoms in organic tissue to one atom in the form of calcite. This makes the overall composition of detrital material something like C120N15P; i.e., 80 organic C\u2019s and 40 in CaCO3. Accompanying these 40 calcite units will be 40 Ca atoms, but this represents a minor depletion of the 3200 Ca atoms that eventually return to the surface, so this element is only slightly depleted in the upper waters. Silicon, being far less abundant, is depleted to a much greater extent.", "A continual rain of particulate material from dead organisms falls through the ocean. This shower is comprised of three major kinds of material: calcite (CaCO3), silica (SiO2), and organic matter. The first two come from the hard parts of both plants and animals (mainly microscopic animals such as foraminifera and radiolarians). The organic matter is derived mainly from the soft tissues of organisms, and from animal fecal material. Some of this solid material dissolves before it reaches the ocean floor, but not usually before it enters the deep ocean where it will remain for about 1600 years.", "The remainder of this material settles onto the floor of the sea, where it forms one component of a layer of sediments that provide important information about the evolution of the sea and of the earth. Over a short time scale of months to years, these sediments are in quasi-equilibrium with the seawater. On a scale of millions of years, the sediments are merely way-stations in the geochemical cycling of material between the earth\u2019s surface and its interior.", "The oceanic sediments have three main origins:", "Our main interest lies with the silica and calcium carbonate, since these substances form a crucial part of the biogeological cycle. Also, their distributions in the ocean are not uniform- a fact that must tell us something.", "The skeletons of diatoms and radiolarians are the principal sources of silica sediments. Since the ocean is everywhere undersaturated with respect to silica, only the most resistant parts of these skeletons reach the bottom of the deep ocean and get incorporated into sediments. Silica sediments are less common in the Atlantic ocean, owing to the lower content of dissolved silica.", "The parts of the ocean where these sediments are increasing most rapidly correspond to regions of upwelling, where deep water that is rich in dissolved silica rises to the surface where the silica is rapidly fixed by organisms. Where upwelling is absent, the growth of the organisms is limited, and little silica is precipitated. Since deep waters tend to flow from the Atlantic into the Pacific ocean where most of the upwelling occurs, Atlantic waters are depleted in silica, and silica sediments are not commonly found in this ocean.", "For calcium carbonate, the situation is quite different. In the first place, surface waters are everywhere supersaturated with respect to both calcite and aragonite, the two common crystal forms of CaCO3. Secondly, Ca2+ and HCO3\u2013 are never limiting factors in the growth of the coccoliths (plants) and forams (animals) that precipitate CaCO3; their production depends on the availability of phosphate and nitrogen. Because these elements are efficiently recycled before they fall into the deep ocean, their supply does not depend on upwelling, and so the production of solid is more uniformly distributed over the world\u2019s oceans.", "More importantly, however, the chances that a piece of carbonate skeleton will end up as sediment will be highly dependent on both the local CO32\u2013 concentration and the depth of the ocean floor. These factors give rise to small-scale variations in the production of carbonate sediments that can be quite wide-ranging.", "New crust is being generated and moving away from the crests of the mid-ocean ridges at a rate of a few centimetres per year. Although the crests of these ridges are relatively high points, projecting to within about 3000 m of the surface, the continual injection of new material prevents sediments from accumulating in these areas. Farther from the crests, carbonate sediments do build up, eventually reaching a depth of about 500 m, but by this time the elevation has dropped off below the saturation horizon, so from this point on the carbonate sediments are overlaid by red clay.", "If we drill a hole down through a part of the ocean floor that is presently below the saturation horizon, the top part of the drill core will consist of clay, followed by CaCO3 at greater depths. The core may also contain regions in which silica predominates. Since silica production is very high in equatorial regions, the appearance of such a layer suggests that this particular region of the oceanic crust has moved across the equator.", "Page last modified: 21.01.2008", "\u00a9 1998 by Stephen Lower", "For information about this Web site or to contact the author,\nplease see theChem1 Virtual Textbook home page.", "This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial 2.5 License.", "How inappropriate to call this planet Earth,\nwhen clearly it is Ocean.\u201d", "Arthur C. Clarke", "Water is the most abundant substance at the earth\u2019s surface. Almost all of it is in the oceans, which cover 70% of the surface area of the earth. However, the amounts of water present in the atmosphere and on land (as surface runoff, lakes and streams) is great enough to make it a significant agent in transporting substances between the lithosphere and the oceans.", "Water interacts with both the atmosphere and the lithosphere, acquiring solutes from each, and thus provides the major chemical link between these two realms. The various transformations undergone by water through the different stages of the hydrologic cycle act to transport both dissolved and particulate substances between different geographic locations.", "Reservoir", "Volume / 106, km3", "Percent of total", "Oceans", "Ice caps and glaciers", "Deep groundwater", "Shallow groundwater", "Inventory of water on Earth", "It appears to have been bound up in the silica-based materials such as micas and amphiboles which accreted to form the Earth. The heat released during this process would have been sufficient to drive off this water, which amounted to about 0.01% by mass of the primoridal material.", "The hydrologic cycle refers to the steady state that exists between evaporation, condensation, percolation, runoff, and circulation of water. The cycle is driven by solar energy, mainly through direct vaporization, but also by convective motion induced by uneven heating.", "The major interphase transport process of the hydrologic cycle is evaporation of water from the ocean. However, 90% of this vapor falls directly back into the ocean as rain, while 10% is transported over the land. Of the latter, about two-thirds evaporates again and one third runs off to the ocean.", "Diagram and text from a page at the Web site of the Institute for Global Environment and Society", "The amounts of water precipitated onto the land and oceans are in approximate proportion to the relative surface areas, but evaporation from the ocean exceeds that from the land by about 37,400 km\u20133 yr\u20131. This difference is the amount of water transported to the oceans by river runoff. When water condenses from the atmosphere in the form of rain, it is slightly enriched in H2O18. During epochs of glacial buildup the fraction of H2O18 in the oceans consequently decreases. Observation of H2O18/H2O16 ratios in marine sediments is one way of studying the timing and extent of past glaciations. Since the degree of heavy isotope enrichment of condensed water is temperature dependent, this same method can be used to estimate mean world temperatures in the distant past.", "The hydrologic cycle also has important effects on the energy budget of the earth. Atmospheric water vapor (along with carbon dioxide and methane) tends to absorb the long-wavelength infrared radiation emitted by the earth\u2019s surface, partially trapping the incoming shorter-wavelength energy and thus maintaining the mean surface temperature about 30\u00b0 higher than would be the case in the absence of water vapor. Of the 51% of the solar radiation incident on the atmosphere that reaches the earth\u2019s surface, about half of this (23%) is used to evaporate water. During the ten days that an average molecule resides in the atmosphere, it will travel about 1000 km. The atmospheric transport of water from equatorial to subtropical regions serves as an important mechanism for the transport of thermal energy; at latitudes of about 40\u00b0, as much as one-third of the energy input comes from release of latent heat from water vapor formed in equatorial regions.", "About 97% of the earth\u2019s water is contained in the two reservoirs which comprise the oceans. The upper mixed layer contains about 5% of the total; it is separated from the deeper and colder layer by the thermocline. Mixing between these two stratified layers is very slow; of the total ocean volume of 6.8 1018 m3, only about 0.71 1015 m3, or about 0.01%, moves between the two layers per year. The mean residence time of a water molecule in the deep layer is about 1600 years.", "The large-scale motions of ocean water are the primary means by which chemical substances, especially those taken up and excreted by organisms, are transported within the ocean. An understanding of the general patterns of this circulation is essential in order to analyze the observed distribution of many of the chemical elements in different parts of the ocean and in the oceanic sediments.", "The circulation of the surface waters of the ocean is driven by the prevailing winds. The latter arise from uneven heating of the earth\u2019s surface, and are arranged in bands that parallel the equator.", "Although the motion of the waters at the surface of the ocean are driven by the winds, they do not follow them in a simple manner. The reasons are threefold: the Coriolis effect, the presence of land masses, and uneveness in the sea level due to regional differences in temperature and atmospheric pressure.", "The most intense heat input into the atmosphere occurs near the equator, where the heated air rises and cools, producing intense local precipitation but little surface wind. After cooling and losing moisture, this air moves north and south and descends at a latitude of about 30\u00b0. As it descends, it warms (largely by adiabatic compression) and its relative humidity decreases. The extreme dryness of this air gives rise to the subtropical desert regions between about 15\u00b0 and 30\u00b0. Part of this air flows back toward the equator, giving rise to the northeast and southwest trade winds; the deflection to the east or west is caused by the Coriolis effect. Another part of the descending air travels poleward, producing the prevailing westerlies. Eventually these collide with cold air masses moving away from the polar regions, producing a region of unstable air and storm activity known as a polar front. Some of this polar air picks up enough heat to rise and enter into polar cell circulation patterns.", "The flow of air in the prevailing westerlies is subject to considerable turbulence which gives rise to planetary waves. These are moving regions in which warm surface air is lifted to higher levels, producing lines of storms that travel from west to east, and exchanging more air between the polar and temperate regions.", "In the Northern hemisphere, the Coriolis effect not only deflects south-moving objects to the east but it also causes currents flowing parallel to the equator to veer to the right of the direction of flow, i.e. to the north or south.", "In addition, prevailing westerly winds and the eastward rotation of the earth cause water to pile up by a few centimeters at the western edges of the oceans. The resultant downhill flow, interacting with Coriolis forces, produces a western boundary current that runs south-to-north in the northern hemisphere. A similar but opposite effect gives rise to a south-flowing eastern boundary current on continental east coasts.", "In contrast to the upper levels of the ocean, the deep ocean is stratified; the density increases with depth so as to inhibit the vertical transport of water. This stratification divides the deep oceans into several distinct water masses which undergo movement in a more or less horizonal plane, with adjacent masses sometimes moving in opposite directions.", "The winds and atmospheric effects outlined above affect only the upper part of the ocean. Below 100 meters or so, oceanic circulation is driven by the density of the seawater, which is determined by its temperature and its salinity. Variations in these two quantities give rise to the thermohaline circulation of the deep currents of the ocean.", "It all starts when seasonal ice begins to form in the polar regions. Because the salts dissolved in seawater cannot be accommodated within the ice structure, they are largely excluded from the new ice and remain in solution. This increases the density of the surrounding unfrozen water, causing it to sink into the bottom ocean.", "As the cold water fillus up the deepest regions and spills over ridges into other deep basins, it creates huge undersea cascades which rival the greatest terrestrial waterfalls in height and the largest rivers in volume. For more on this, see the Feb. 1989 Scientific American.", "There are two major locations at which surface waters enter the deep ocean. The northern entry point is in the Norwegian Sea off Greenland; this water forms a mass known as the North Atlantic Deep Water (NADW) which flows southward across the equator.", "Most of the transport into the deep ocean takes place in the Weddell Sea off the coast of Antarctica. The highly saline water flows down the submerged Antarctic Slope to begin a 5000-year trip to the north across the bottom of the ocean. This is the major route by which dissolved CO2 and O2 (which are more soluble in this cold water) are transported into the deep ocean where it forms a water mass known as the Antarctic Bottom Water (AABW) which can be traced into all three oceans.", "In the south, a flow from the antarctic region forms a water mass known as the Antarctic Bottom Water (AABW) which can be traced into all three oceans.", "The Pacific Ocean lacks any major identifiable direct source of cold water, so it is less differentiated and its deep circulation is sluggish and poorly defined.", "Figure from Don Reed, Marine Geology 130 at San Jose State U.", "Temperature and salinity profiles in a north-south subsection of the Atlantic ocean.", "As is apparent from the figure above, the vertical profiles of temperature and especially of the salinity are not uniform. To some extent, these two parameters have opposite effects: in equatorial regions, temperatures are higher (leading to lower density) but evaporation rates are also higher (leading to higher density). In polar regions, the formation of sea ice raises the density of the seawater (because only a small proportion of salt is incorporated into the ice).", "The nature and extent of the deep ocean currents differ in the Atlantic, Pacific, and Indian oceans. These currents are much slower than the surface currents, and in fact have not been measured directly; their existence is however clearly implied by the chemical composition and temperature of water samples taken from various parts of the ocean. Estimated rates are of the order of kilometers per month, in contrast to the few kilometers per hour of surface waters. The deep currents are the indirect results of processes occuring at the surface in which cold water of high salinity is produced as sea ice forms in the arctic and antarctic regions. This water is so dense that it sinks to the bottom, displacing warmer or less saline water as it moves.", "Recirculation of deep water to the surface occurs to a very small extent in many regions, but it is especially pronounced where water entering the Antarctic Bottom mass displaces other bottom water, and where water piles up at the western edges of continents. This latter water flows downhill (forming the western boundary currents mentioned above) and is replaced by colder water from the deep ocean. The deep ocean contains few organisms to deplete the water of the nutrients it receives from the remains of the dead organisms floating down from above; this upwelled water is therefor exceptionally rich in nutrients, and strongly encourages the growth of new organisms that extend up the food chain to fish. Thus the wind-driven upwelling that occurs off the west coast of South America is responsible for the Peruvian fishing and guano fertilizer industry.", "About every seven years these prevailing winds disappear for a while, allowing warm equatorial waters to move in. This phenomenon is known as El Ni\u00f1o and it results in massive kills of plankton and fish. Decomposition of the dead organisms reduces the oxygen content of the water, causing the death of still more fish, and allowing reduced compounds such as hydrogen sulfide to accumulate.", "Matthias Tomczak's Introduction to physical oceanography is an excellent source of more information on the topics covered above.", "Page last modified: 21.01.2008", "\u00a9 1998 by Stephen Lower", "For information about this Web site or to contact the author,\nplease see theChem1 Virtual Textbook home page.", "This work is licensed under a Creative Commons Attribution-NonCommercial 2.5 License.", "North Carolina State University", "Key Elements of Green Chemistry", "Lucian Lucia", "This open text is disseminated via the Open Education Resource (OER) LibreTexts Project (https://LibreTexts.org) and like the hundreds of other open texts available within this powerful platform, it is licensed to be freely used, adapted, and distributed. This book is openly licensed which allows you to make changes, save, and print this book as long; the applicable license is indicated at the bottom of each page.", "Instructors can adopt existing LibreTexts texts or Remix them to quickly build course-specific resources to meet the needs of their students. Unlike traditional textbooks, LibreTexts\u2019 web based origins allow powerful integration of advanced features and new technologies to support learning.", "The LibreTexts mission is to unite students, faculty and scholars in a cooperative effort to develop an easy-to-use online platform for the construction, customization, and dissemination of OER content to reduce the burdens of unreasonable textbook costs to our students and society. The LibreTexts project is a multi-institutional collaborative venture to develop the next generation of open-access texts to improve postsecondary education at all levels of higher learning by developing an Open Access Resource environment. The project currently consists of 13 independently operating and interconnected libraries that are constantly being optimized by students, faculty, and outside experts to supplant conventional paper-based books. These free textbook alternatives are organized within a central environment that is both vertically (from advance to basic level) and horizontally (across different fields) integrated.", "The LibreTexts libraries are Powered by MindTouch\u00ae and are supported by the Department of Education Open Textbook Pilot Project, the UC Davis Office of the Provost, the UC Davis Library, the California State University Affordable Learning Solutions Program, and Merlot. This material is based upon work supported by the National Science Foundation under Grant No. 1246120, 1525057, and 1413739. Unless otherwise noted, LibreTexts content is licensed by CC BY-NC-SA 3.0.", "Any opinions, findings, and conclusions or recommendations expressed in this material are those of the author(s) and do not necessarily reflect the views of the National Science Foundation nor the US Department of Education.", "Have questions or comments? For information about adoptions or adaptions contact info@LibreTexts.org. More information on our activities can be found via Facebook (https://facebook.com/Libretexts), Twitter (https://twitter.com/libretexts), or our blog (http://Blog.Libretexts.org).", "This text was compiled on 05/14/2020", "The rise of the industrial complex and society\u2019s strong need to increase its quality of life, security, wealth, and future productivity have helped to relegate the discipline of chemistry and its work to a very lofty position of prominence. Our progress toward achieving a Utopia of human intellectual growth, freedom of choices, equality within classes, and wealth acquisition have been supplemented and encouraged by the fruits of chemical research & development efforts since the dawn of last century. For example, we have witnessed significant strides in the following facets of our lives:", "The chemical industry has played a vital role in the emergence of high quality life within our human societies in these latter areas as well as many others. In fact, the industry is among the top ten industrial sectors in terms of gross output and sales. One of the most adverse realities and perceptions of the industry is its impact on the environment. Although it is a very safe industry as a whole, well publicized disasters have contributed to a poor public perception. For example, issues such as eutrophication, persistent organic pollutants, BOD, and the famous burning Cuyahoga River are typical of the calamities that damage the reputation and importance of our industry.", "Please see http://clevelandhistorical.org/items/show/63#.V7NI5BWU2og", "In fact, the morning of June 22, 1969 was witness to a fire from the burning of oil and debris that collected on the surface of the Cuyahoga River (Cleveland). The event roused up a media storm, captured national attention, and was featured in a commentary on the nation\u2019s environmental problems (Time magazine, Aug. 1). It was a clarion call to how calamitous the nation\u2019s environmental problems had become. The then EPA Administrator Lisa Jackson commented years later (2011) that the fire evidence of \u201cthe almost unimaginable health and environmental threats\u201d from water pollution of the time. Clearly, as one environmentalist stated, \u201cwhen rivers are on fire, you know things are bad.\u201d The image was seared into the nation\u2019s emerging environmental consciousness and fueled a demand for greater regulation. In 1972, Congress passed the federal Clean Water Act (CWA). Today, the nation\u2019s waters are far cleaner, and many credit CWA with preventing other rivers from befalling a similar fate.", "The reality is that the fire was a symbol of how bad river conditions in the US had once been. That fire was not the first time an industrial river had caught on fire, but it was the last. For example, the late 19th and early 20th century saw many river fires. At least 13 on the Cuyahoga occurred, whereas there were others on rivers in Detroit, Baltimore, Philadelphia, and elsewhere. Although industries, chemists, and governments do not ever intentionally wish to or contribute to cause harm, the law espoused by \u201cMurphy\u201d holds. The contemporary form of the law can be traced back to 1952 as an epigraph for a mountaineering book by Sack who described the adage as an \u201cancient mountaineering adage\u201d:", "Anything that can possibly go wrong, does (Sack, 1952).", "Thus, the challenge for contemporary chemists and allied workers in view of the law is to ensure that any and all reactions, processes, and designs keep this general philosophy in mind. Our goal in the twenty first century is to mitigate potential disasters that can occur from our chemistries and engineering.", "The concept of \u201csustainable development\u201d was articulated from a UN Commission on Environment and Development in 1987 (Brundtland Commission). It is simply stated:\n\u2018..meeting the needs of the present without compromising the ability of future generations to meet their own needs.\u2019 Since the Brundtland Commission, a number of governments, NGOs, and societies have considered deeply what sustainable really means. Several of the key drivers heating up this\ndiscussion include:", "Obviously, waste is a given in any industrial process, but the primary question is not its generation, but how it is handled. If we produce a waste stream, can it be recovered, recycled, or reused? If carbon dioxide is the waste stream, can we conclude that nature will sequester it or will it contribute to global warming (climate change)? These are questions that warrant intense analysis and follow-up. The overall fate of the planet (humanity, ecosystems, and our way of life) hang in the balance. Methods to address ensuring the continuation of our planet and its resources include:", "We as an educated community (students, teachers, government workers, industry workers, etc.)recognize and appreciate that the Earth is equipped to deal with hiccups and disturbances in its processes, but continuously pushing such boundaries of recovery will only lead to disasters.Indeed, a paradigm for ensuring that our chemical processes do not exceed the capacity of the Earth to engage in buffering and recovery is the following:", "To promote innovative chemical technologies that reduce or eliminate the use or generation of hazardous substances in the design, manufacture, and use of chemical products.", "The above statement defines the concept of \u201cGreen Chemistry.\u201d The subject has now become a very well accepted and welcomed part of many chemistry curricula and industry philosophies. In fact, the concept of a triple bottom line, i.e., financial, social, and environmental owes its existence to green chemistry. Green chemistry has become an incredibly indispensable field within the panoply of chemistry subject matter. Its content and mission, however, are very unique in comparison to its sister courses because it embodies a social and environmental focus.", "The growing of crops in different farming regions to feed the masses owes its potential greatly to harnessing the power of chemicals such as herbicides, pesticides, fungicides, etc. Although in general we tend to think of the benefits of pesticides, there are a number of issues associated with their use that go well beyond their ability to promote the cultivation and availability of food. For example, DDT (Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\)) is a chemical that has seen much use in the US. Over the period of 1950 to 1980, it was used in agriculture at the rate of more than 40,000 tons each year worldwide and it has been estimated that a total of 1.8 million tons have been produced around the world since the 1940s. In the United States, it was manufactured by numerous companies including Monsanto, Ciba, Montrose Chemical Company, and Pennwalt. More than 600,000 tons (1.35 billion pounds) were applied in the US before it was banned in 1972.", "The idea that nature produces chemicals that are \u201cgreen\u201d is a fallacy or a myth. The concept of green deserves some clarification at this point. What is green and what isn\u2019t is actually a matter of nature, quantity, human safety, long term effects, and acute toxicity. Green is generally a term associated with a sustainable (renewable) product or non-toxic process whose employment in society has no acute toxicity and a general favorable life cycle analysis. There are a number of documented chemicals in nature that are extremely toxic even at small doses thus invalidating the idea that nature is \u201cgreen\u201d. For example, aflatoxin B1, shown below in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\), is a toxin produced by Apsergillus flavus and A. parasiticus that is one of the most potent carcinogens known. It is a common contaminant of a variety of foods including peanuts, cottonseed meal, corn, and other grains as well as animal feeds. According to the Food and Agriculture Organization, the worldwide maximum levels of aflatoxin B1 is in the range of 1\u201320 \u00b5g/kg in food, and 5\u201350 \u00b5g/kg in dietary cattle feed.", "Shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{3}\\) below is a derivative of lysergic acid. Lysergic acid, also known as D-lysergic acid and (+)-lysergic acid, is a precursor to a diverse array of ergoline alkaloids produced by the ergot fungus and found in the seeds of Turbina corymbosa (ololiuhqui), Argyreia nervosa (Hawaiian Baby Woodrose), and Ipomoea tricolor (morning glories, tlitliltzin). Amides of lysergic acid, lysergamides (see Fig. 3), are widely used as pharmaceuticals and as psychedelic drugs (LSD). Lysergic acid received its name from the lysis of various ergot alkaloids.", "Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\): Shown above is the diethylamide version of lysergic acid.\nhttps://www.wikiwand.com/en/Lysergic_acid", "Again, as already stipulated, nature\u2019s best does not necessarily imply that her products are \u201cgreen\u201d. Green, by virtue of the product distribution found in nature (e.g. cocaine), can certainly pose serious if not lethal implications for human consumption. We all know that sodium chloride is ubiquitous within nature. It is a common salt that manifests a cubic crystal lattice structure that readily dissolves in water where it is mostly found. Humans consume it in great quantities as a flavorant, seasoning, and preservative. Nevertheless, its mass consumption especially in the US has led to > 65 million people afflicted with high blood pressure while numerous others have all other maladies associated from its overconsumption.", "Waste because of the nature of living processes is a natural consequence. Within the schema of living cell frameworks, the ability to generate waste is considered a clear indication of a \u201cliving\u201d system. Waste is a necessary by-product of any work function even if it is heat, light, or some other form of energy by virtue of the intrinsic inefficiencies associated with the utilization of \u201cfuel\u201d or raw materials. For example, even a newborn that is fed on breast milk, a ideal natural food source for babies, does not simply produce a non-material, i.e., heat/energy dissipation, waste product. The problems associated with waste including inherent inefficiencies with using resources are how it builds up and affects the quality of the environment. In general, we cannot prevent waste because everything is subject to entropy.", "The crux of the problem associated with waste boils down to safety. As alluded to in the Prezi example above, rust can cause material fatigue or loss of integrity that can compromise functionality. Additionally, chemical processes that produce waste need to adhere to the three general \u201cR\u201ds of Green Chemistry.", "THE THREE \"R\"S OF GREEN CHEMISTRY", "The Leblanc process industrial factories were very damaging to the local environment. It was an early industrial process for producing soda ash (sodium carbonate) that was named after its inventor. It required two stages: sodium sulfate (salt cake) produced from sodium chloride (salt, we just discussed this!) followed by reaction with coal and calcium carbonate to produce sodium carbonate. It eventually became obsolete after development of the Solvay process. The process of generating salt cake involved reacting salt with sulfuric acid which released hydrochloric acid gas, an acid that was industrially useless in the early 19th century and therefore vented into the atmosphere. Also, an insoluble, smelly solid waste (CaS, galligu) was produced. The inefficiency of the process was horrific! Each ton of soda ash, the process produced ~1.5 tons of hydrogen chloride and >1 ton of calcium sulfide, the useless waste product! Galligu had no economic value so it was piled in heaps and spread on fields where it weathered to release\nhydrogen sulfide (what a smell!).", "Leblanc soda works then became targets of lawsuits and legislation. A lawsuit from 1839 alleged that, \u201cthe gas from these manufactories is of such a deleterious nature as to blight everything within its influence and is alike baneful to health and property. The herbage of the fields in their vicinity is scorched, the gardens neither yield fruit nor vegetables; many flourishing trees have lately become rotten naked sticks. Cattle and poultry droop and pine away. It tarnishes the furniture in our houses, and when we are exposed to it, which is of frequent occurrence, we are afflicted with coughs and pains in the head ... all of which we attribute to the Alkali works.\u201d", "Therefore, in 1863, the British Parliament passed the first Alkali Act, a precursor to the first modern air pollution legislation. This Act dictated that no more than 5% of the hydrochloric acid produced by alkali plants could be vented. To comply, soda works passed it up a tower packed with charcoal where it was absorbed by water flowing in the other direction. Unfortunately, the chemical works usually dumped the resulting solution into nearby bodies of water where it promptly ended up killing fish and other aquatic life.", "The greatest blight affecting the modern time is the apathy associated with ignorance. We tend to strongly adhere to wrongful beliefs\u2014all manufacturing and industrial processes are failsafe in protecting humans and the environment. The truth is that Murphy\u2019s Law more often than not is RIGHT. Thus, the need for pre-emptive measures as embodied by the principles of green chemistry is of paramount significance. The principles as listed below will constitute a future chapter in this book:", "Prevention\nIt is better to prevent waste than to treat or clean up waste after it has been created.", "Atom Economy\nSynthetic methods should be designed to maximize the incorporation of all materials used in the process into the final product.\nLess Hazardous Chemical Syntheses\nWherever practicable, synthetic methods should be designed to use and generate substances that possess little or no toxicity to human health and the environment.\nDesigning Safer Chemicals\nChemical products should be designed to affect their desired function while minimizing their toxicity.\nSafer Solvents and Auxiliaries\nThe use of auxiliary substances (e.g., solvents, separation agents, etc.) should be made unnecessary wherever possible and innocuous when used.\nDesign for Energy Efficiency\nEnergy requirements of chemical processes should be recognized for their environmental and economic impacts and should be minimized. If possible, synthetic methods should be conducted at ambient temperature and pressure.\nUse of Renewable Feedstocks\nA raw material or feedstock should be renewable rather than depleting whenever technically and economically practicable.\nReduce Derivatives\nUnnecessary derivatization (use of blocking groups, protection/ deprotection, temporary modification of physical/chemical processes) should be minimized or avoided if possible, because such steps require additional reagents and can generate waste.\nCatalysis\nCatalytic reagents (as selective as possible) are superior to stoichiometric reagents.\nDesign for Degradation\nChemical products should be designed so that at the end of their function they break down into innocuous degradation products and do not persist in the environment.\nReal-time analysis for Pollution Prevention\nAnalytical methodologies need to be further developed to allow for real-time, in- process monitoring and control prior to the formation of hazardous substances.\nInherently Safer Chemistry for Accident Prevention\nSubstances and the form of a substance used in a chemical process should be chosen to minimize the potential for chemical accidents, including releases, explosions, and fires.", "\\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) Using lysergic acid as a starting point, indicate the general type of chemistry (you can indicate in your own words what is happening) that would need to occur in order for the epimerization of lysergic and L-lysergic acid to occur shown below. https://www.wikiwand.com/en/Lysergic_acid", "\\(\\PageIndex{2}\\).How does too much salt in a human\u2019s diet contribute to high blood pressure?", "a. What are two known chemical mechanisms (reactions) that enzymes can pursue for bonding\nto 4-hydroxy-2-nonenal?\nb. Come up with a way to quantify the inefficiency of a reaction; that is, derive a quantitative\nmeasure of the wastefulness of a reaction using the LeBlanc numerical process\ninformation contained in this chapter.", "Green chemistry, in addition to being a science, it is also a philosophy and nearly a religion. Attendance at American Chemical Society Green Chemistry & Engineering Conferences will instill such an ideal into any attendant because of the universal appeal and possibilities in this novel approach to radicalizing the business of doing science and engineering. Life Cycle Assessment (LCA) is a comprehensive life cycle approach that quantifies ecological and human health impacts of a product or system over its complete life cycle. It uses credible scientific methods to model steady-state, global environmental and human health impacts. It also helps decision-makers understand the scale of many environmental and human health impacts of competing products, services, policies or actions.", "Please see for more information https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NQTW7jjXVmE (LCA: Intro to Life Cycle Assessment. (2013).)", "Triple Bottom Line accounting enables enterprises to support sustainability analysis in their operations, products and services. LCA contributes to the Triple Bottom Line reporting by quantifying the ecological and human health performance of competing products and services (Figure 2-1). Adding the social and economic performance reporting of a product or service to the LCA results of the product or service is one way to deliver Triple Bottom Line reporting.", "LCA for Decision Making\nWho makes decisions", "Primary drivers and expectations for LCA:", "Types of decision situations", "Eco-labels:", "Eco-labels that require LCA:", "Type 1) Third-party certified multi-criteria environmental labeling", "Type 3) Independently verified label with preset quantified indices", "Life Cycle Assessment (LCA) enables the creation of Type 1 and Type 3 eco-labels. These eco-labels can be powerful tools in obtaining larger shares of a specific market sector. Life cycle assessment (LCA) is a standardized programmatic tool to determine the environmental impacts of products or services. It can be described by a four-part framework as outlined by the 14044 ISO standard.", "LIFE CYCLE ASSESSMENT FRAMEWORK", "This integrated framework was inspired by earlier forms of life-cycle thought from life cycle financial analysis. Examining a product from origination to use and disposal provides more holistic analysis to identify where environmental impacts originate and guide efforts in reducing impacts.", "The ISO standards (http://www.iso.org/iso/home/standards.htm) provides guidance on structure framework, reuse requirements of data, study assumptions, and methods. By using more standard LCA methodologies, studies are more comparable and of greater scientific rigor. A standardized method allows LCA practitioners to manage complex datasets, provide comparisons among products, and allow benchmarking. In the absence of a standardized method, the results of LCA studies are even more variable depending on study assumptions and methods. The ISO standards help reduce the influence of the practitioner influence on study results.", "Goal, Scope, and Definition", "Assumptions inherent in an LCA study are apt to change the results and conclusions derived from analysis. In addition, many different types of studies require various levels data collection and analysis. The goal and scope of a LCA defines its intent, targeted audience, and use. The intended use informs further decisions for scope, functional unit of comparison, and data collection. For example, if a LCA study is used internally, a full review panel of LCA experts is not required; however, when providing public environmental claims about a competing product, a review is required.", "Inventory analysis", "A life cycle inventory (LCI) is the most laborious step of a LCA: data is collected and organized. It often involves contacting companies, accumulating literature sources, and building models using life cycle assessment software. Materials flows, types of\nmaterials, product life time, and product energy requirements are collected in the LCI phase.", "Life Cycle Impact Assessment", "A life cycle impact assessment (LCIA) part of the analysis process collects life cycle inventory data and delivers environmental impacts values. This process greatly reduces the complexity of the data set from hundreds of inputs to 10 or fewer impact categories for decision-making. There are many different methods for LCIA based on location, goals, and scope.", "Interpretation", "The interpretation step derives from what was found in the other steps for the generation of new information. It is not the last step but iterative. When it is done, the study assumptions, goals, scope, and methods are refined to suit the needs of the study.", "Goal", "The first step is defining the goal to give the aim and what it encompasses. There are two types of LCA objectives: (1) descriptive and (2) change-oriented. The descriptive types look at broader aspects of an issues, e.g., how much of the world\u2019s carbon dioxide emissions are derived from commuters (light duty vehicles). These broader environmental questions fall within the domain of descriptive LCAs. The second type of LCA is change-oriented, in which two options for fulfilling a function are compared. Typical examples of change-oriented LCAs are paper vs. plastic, flying vs. driving, and gas vs. electric heating. These types of studies can guide the choice of methods to reduce environmental impacts. The intended audience is another part of the goal and scope. The audience may include interest groups such as policy makers, company marketing groups, or product development teams. Additionally, interest groups should be identified. These include companies, funding sources, target audiences, and expert reviewers. It is noted that the intended use of the LCA may be different from the end use because the information may be relevant to other decisions and analyses beyond the original intent.", "One specific LCA to compare two products is a \u201ccomparative assertion disclosed to the public\u201d. In this type of study, \u201cenvironmental claims regarding the superiority or equivalence of one product vs a competing product which performs the same function\u201d are communicated. These types of studies must follow ISO 14044 standards with the nine steps for a \u201ccomparative assertion\u201d.", "Scope", "The scope definition serves the purpose of communicating to the audience what is included and what is excluded. Depending on the goal, there are several types of scopes including cradle-to-gate, cradle-to-grave, and gate-to-gate. There are other words commonly used to describe these scopes:", "The scope must be carefully selected in consideration of the potential implications not including product stages or phases in the scope of the work. For example, a product may have lower product emissions, but have a shorter lifetime than an alternative product that would not be communicated in a process stage diagram as seen in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\). These types of diagrams list the major unit steps considered and clearly show what is not included.", "Temporal boundaries are also established in the scope. Assumptions relating to time can have a large influence on the results. A study timeframe should be picked which will best capture the impacts of the product or processes. A 100-year window is a common temporal boundary, for example, in global warming. In a 100-year temporal window, impacts occurring after 100 years are not part of the overall analysis.", "Other aspects to be included in scope are technology and geographical regions. Many studies are spatially dependent so LCA results are not broadly applicable to other regions. Products or services from older technologies often have different impacts than current technologies. Thus, it is important to communicate the type and stage of the technology. In addition, allocation procedure impact assessment methods and should be reported.", "Functional Unit", "A functional unit is the primary measure of a product or service. ISO states that \u201cthe functional unit defines the quantification of the identified functions (performance characteristics) of the product. The primary purpose of a functional unit is to provide a reference to which the inputs and outputs are related. This reference is necessary to ensure comparability of LCA results. The functional unit can be a service, mass of material, or an amount of energy. Selecting appropriate functional units is critical to creating an unbiased analysis. For example, when comparing trains to cars for transportation, the comparison may suffer from the inability to correlate energy inputs and outputs. The real purpose of the train would be to deliver a larger number of people to a specific centralized location. For this example, a better functional unit may be impacts of a train delivering a specific number of people over a specified distance. The results will then be normalized to distance for more reasonable correlations and assessments.", "Cut of Criteria", "Data collection for an LCA is the most time-intensive and laborious step. Cut-off criteria are used to expedite the process. Cut-off criteria define a level of product content or other parameter to which the study will not consider. One example: materials contents less than 1% of the total product mass are not considered. This allows the LCA practitioner to focus on data from the main flows of the system while systematically eliminating flows which may not influence the results.", "Life Cycle Inventory", "In addition to data collection, the life cycle inventory (LCI) step is a very laborious aspect of life cycle assessment. The data collected for the product, production process, and product life cycle are used in the impact assessment to determine the environmental impacts. Collecting consistent, transparent, and accurate LCI data is critical to the success of an overall LCA.", "Primary and Secondary Data", "Example data collected:", "Tracking the material flows into and out of the defined system is the first step of LCI. After the materials flows have been determined through interviews, literature searches, and measurement, LCA software can be used to track the material process\u2019s elementary flows to and from the environment. Elementary flows originate in the environment and are mined or retrieved for use in a process or flows that are released from processes to the environment and are not used by other processes. These elementary flows are the actual materials used and materials released to the environment as a result of the studied product system. In Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\), the two types of LCI data can be seen. On the top half of the figure, process flows such as products, services and other goods are listed. The lower half lists elementary flows such as chemicals released to soil or air.", "Life Cycle Impact Assessment", "Life cycle impact assessment (LCIA) is among the last steps of LCA. The purpose of a LCIA \u201cis to provide additional information to assess life cycle inventory (LCI) results and help users better understand the environmental significance of natural resource use and environmental releases\u201d. The LCIA helps provide significance and results for easier decision making; however, it is important to understand it does not directly measure the impacts of chemical releases to the environment as an environmental risk assessment does. The third step of LCIA follows sequentially after the LCI using the many flows to and from the environment developed in the LCI. These LCI flows, without an impact assessment step, are not easily interpreted and understanding the significance of emissions is impossible. The LCIA is different from a risk assessment measuring absolute values of environmental impacts in that the LCIA helps determine the significance of emissions and impacts in relation to the study scope. The absolute value of the impacts cannot be determined by the LCIA due to (Margni and Curran 2012):", "Even though the LCIA has limitations, it is useful in determining what impacts matter, what unit processes are contributing the most through hot spot analysis and identify best scenario options when environmental tradeoffs occur.", "According to ISO there are three mandatory processes of a LCIA including Selection of impact categories, Classification, and Characterization, Figure \\(\\PageIndex{4}\\).", "There are many tools to assist life cycle assessments. There are software and data packages designed for performing LCAs. No matter the form of the software, the use of some sort of LCA software and data management system is needed in LCAs. The life cycle inventory step of an LCA often requires a large data set listing hundreds of emissions to the environment. Keeping track of these flows manually is arduous, so LCA software is designed to manage these flows and perform specific functions such as impact assessments based on the inventory as well as uncertainty analysis.", "There is a large list of LCA software emerging with various features. A basic overview of how data and LCA software will first be provided then a list of software packages. LCA software can be split into several components:", "Software packages such as SimaPro, openLCA, and Gabi are frameworks or calculators that keep track of data and performs intensive numerical calculations. With the many flows and detailed 49 data, much effort has been invested in creating efficient calculation methods to speed up analysis time. This framework, however, is not useful without inventory data. There are many premade datasets provided from sources such as Ecoinvent, Gabi and United States Department of Agriculture (USDA) that contain previous life cycle inventory results for various chemicals, materials, energy, services, and waste treatment processes. LCA software can access this previously developed data and include a chemical or other process from a dataset in their LCA without needing to perform an entire LCA on that particular material or process. This fundamental aspect of LCA, the leveraging of previous study results for new studies, is a key benefit of LCA software and can save countless hours on the LCI step. LCIA methods are procedures and conversions that are used in performing a LCIA such as global warming potential characterizations and weighting methods. There are many accepted LCIA methods that calculate LCA results using different impact categories, types of impacts, and weighting methods.", "Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) visually depicts how the different components of LCA software and data interact. The life cycle inventory step requires data from datasets (e.g., Ecoinvent) and primary data gathered by the LCA practitioner surrounding the process or product under analysis. The combination of these two types of data with the use of LCA software calculations gives an LCI. The LCI data can then be used to perform an impact assessment using the LCIA methods (e.g., TRACI).", "www.openLCA.org", "Further Reading", "What we as a population must realize is that no substance in and of itself is a poison or a remedy. It is the dosage that defines the activity of the substance. For example, let\u2019s look at the concept of \u201chormesis\u201d as a precursor to the concept of poison/remedy by dosage.", "We all have heard at one time or another the phrase, \u201cWhat doesn't kill you makes you stronger\u201d. This phrase contains truth and contains at its essence the theory of hormesis: when organisms are exposed to low levels of stressors or toxins, they become more resistant to larger levels of stressors or toxins. This theory has been met with skepticism. Recently, however, biologists have put together a molecular explanation of its function and it has finally been accepted as a fundamental principle of biomedicine.", "For example, exposing mice to low levels of gamma ray radiation before irradiating them with high levels actually decreases their likelihood of cancer. Similarly, when dioxin is given to rats we find the same situation. However, the biochemical mechanisms are not well understood. It is believed that a low dose of a toxin can trigger repair mechanisms that are efficient enough to not only neutralize the toxin, but repair other defects not caused by the toxin.", "Thus, hormesis is nature\u2019s way of dealing with harmful agents; in fact, antibodies are a natural consequence of hormesis. However, the toxins/poisons that were once absolute, are NO LONGER. For example, thalidomide was found to be a very dangerous chemical for embryo development, but has recently found great promise in a number of ailments according to the Mayo Clinic including HIV, skin lesions, and multiple myeloma (please see: http://www.mayoclinic.org/diseasesco...e/art-20046534). Such a fact is outstanding considering the horrific aftermath (a few photographs shown below(Figure 3.1.1) of its use in the middle part of last century:", "In fact, the list of former \u201cpure\u201d toxins is extremely interesting: snake venom, bacteria (botulin), fungi (penicillin), leeches (Hirudin), maggots (gangrene), etc. The toxic aspect notwithstanding, we all live in the wake of a world and society that is rife with potential hazards.", "Types of hazards", "A hazard is \u201cthreat\u201d to life, health, property, or environment. These can come in many forms, but they are classified according to their modalities or nature of operation. The modalities of hazards are the following:", "Within these modalities of hazards, hazards can be further refined as to their types. The following types of hazards classify the threats to life:", "Globally Harmonized System", "To best classify hazards, the concept of GHS (Globally Harmonized System) has been introduced. Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) demonstrates the categories of hazards:", "Notice that each logo attempts to demonstrate pictorially the type of hazard represented by a specific chemical or material. For example, notice Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\) below. This particular chemical\u2019s hazard level could be listed as \u201cgases under pressure\u201d and \u201cexplosives\u201d. The intensity of its peculiar hazards is evaluated according to the pressure and the explosive nature of the gas.", "Exposure and Categories of Hazardous Substances", "Our overall sensitivity to hazards, again, depends on a number of factors that not only include the typical factors of levels, LDs, type of toxin, modality, etc., but also to our idiosyncratic immunity or responsiveness.", "We have been accustomed to a number of wonderful creature comforts in life that have only come about because of the power, versatility, and creativity inherent in the chemical enterprise. For example, phosgene, a notorious chemical warfare agent in the Great War, is now used as a precursor for the manufacture of a number of items including polyurethane. Shown below in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{3}\\) is a representation of phosgene:", "Lab Safety", "Lab safety is an essential part of working with hazardous materials. It is important to follow good lab practice techniques and to know how to deal with situations should they occur. In the following video by Chemistry crash courses, some good lab techniques and safety guidelines are discussed. Lab Techniques and safety by crash course: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VRWRmIEHr3A", "Reference: Green, H. Crashcourse. (2013, July 8). Lab Techniques & Safetey: Crash Course Chemistry#21. Retrieved from https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=VRWRmIEHr3A", "Lethal Dose", "Lethal dose (LD50) is the amount of any ingested or interfering substance that kills 50% of a test 58 sample. It is expressed in mg/kg, or milligrams of substance per kilogram of body weight. In toxicology, it is also referred to as the median lethal dose that refers specifically to a toxin, radiation, or pathogen. The lower the LD50, the more toxic is the item being measured for toxicity. It can be considered a pragmatic approach to toxicity exposure levels because in general, toxicity does NOT always scale with body mass. The choice of 50% lethality as the gold standard avoids ambiguity because it measures in the extremes and reduces the amount of testing. However, such a fact also means that LD50 is not the lethal dose for all subjects; in other words, some may be killed by much less. Measures such as \u201cLD1\u201d and \u201cLD99\u201d (dosages required to kill 1% or 99%, respectively, of the test population) are sometimes used. Shown below is a chart of sample LD50 taken from Wikipedia (https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Median_lethal_dose) with active links to allow further investigation of the substances whose measurements are given.", "Substance", "LD50 (LC50)", "LD50: g/kg", "(LC50 g/L)", "standardized", "Water", ">90 g/kg", ">90", "6,860 mg/kg", "6.86", "22 \u00b5g/kg", "22-30 mg/kg", "0.000022", "0.02", "Sources for toxicity information:", "Notice that the venom of the Brazilian Wandering Spider is particularly potent. A ten thousandth of a g/kg or ~5mg would kill a normal sized female. Luckily the venom discharged per bite is quite small. Nevertheless, the point is that the vector (or venom) represents a toxin that is of sufficient lethality that it can cause great harm or injury to a human being.", "Case Study for Hazardous Waste", "Environmental cleanup of the 7,400-acre Badger Army Ammunition Plant will be greater than $250 million. This is one of the 40 contaminated military sites in Wisconsin which the Defense Environmental Restoration Account cites as the most contaminated. In fact, 32 areas are polluted with dangerous levels of solvents, metals and explosive/incendiary waste. The water beneath the plant is contaminated with mutagenic chemicals that include carbon tetrachloride, trichloroethylene and dinitrotoluenes. One part of the site, known as the Propellant Burning Grounds, is the source of a three-mile plume of contaminated groundwater that has migrated offsite, completely contaminating private drinking water wells in addition to the Wisconsin River.", "Elevated Cancer Rates", "In 1990, the Wisconsin Division of Health conducted a health survey. It concluded that communities near the Badger plant have a significantly higher incidence of cancer and deaths. In spite of these alarming findings, the State refused to take any action. In 1995, the Division of Health responded because of pressure from CSWAB (Citizens for Safe Water Around Badger) and reopened the community health study.", "On October 26, 1998, CSWAB concluded \u201cthere was entirely inadequate contact with our community \u2013 the population being studied.\u201d Prior to September 1998, no press releases were published, no public meetings were held, and no interviews were conducted. Despite several requests, virtually no resources were devoted to interviewing residents about current health problems and concerns regarding their exposure to air, dust, emissions, and surface soils. Assessment of risk from cleanup activities was also absent. CSWAB also determined that the Wisconsin DOH focused on death studies when many health problems and community concerns have been nonlethal, such as respiratory illnesses or reproductive problems.", "CSWAB appealed to ATSDR (Agency for Toxic Substances and Disease Registry in D.C.) to discuss the lack of adequate community participation in this and similar health assessments across the nation. The Wisconsin Department of Health conducted the assessment under a cooperative agreement with ATSDR.", "Cleanup Plans Abandoned", "The U.S. Army proposed to abandon and severely reduce cleanup of two priority areas within the plant. The Settling Ponds and Spoils Disposal area \u2014 a series of lagoons that run the length of the 7,000-acre facility \u2014 is contaminated with high levels of lead and dinitrotoluenes.", "Maintenance of the Badger plant costs in excess of $17 million per year. In 1991, only $3 million was allocated for environmental studies. Since 1975, there have been over 56 chemical spills and incidents. Moreover, there is no national strategic need for maintaining the Badger plant. A February 20, 1997 Government Accounting Office report concludes BAAP and three other military plants could be eliminated \u201cbecause alternative sources exist\u2026to provide the capabilities these plants provide.\u201d", "Since the fallout from the Bhopal tragedy, efforts have centered on avoiding storage of methyl isocyanate (MIC). The final product, Sevin, is no longer being manufactured by a two-step process. The process now consists of no longer reacting naphthol with MIC (one step), but sequentially with phosgene and methyl amine. The basis for the Bhopal tragedy was the reaction shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\).", "Polyurethane is a polymer composed of carbamate (urethane) linkages. Polyurethanes are traditionally formed by reacting a di- or polyisocyanate with a polyol (alcoholic polymer such as PEG, polyethylene glycol). Both the isocyanates and polyols used to make polyurethanes contain, on average, two or more functional groups (either on termini or within the molecule, hence being telechelic, i.e., a di-end-functional polymer where both ends possess the same functionality) per molecule. Recent efforts have been dedicated to minimizing the use of isocyanates to synthesize polyurethanes because isocyanates are toxic. Non-isocyanate-based polyurethanes (NIPUs), especially made from soybean oils, have recently been targeted as a new greener class of polyurethanes. Shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\) is a molecular representation of polyurethane linkages (highlighted in blue). The carbamate linkages are composed of a central carbonyl moiety that has two heteroatoms attached to it \u2013 a nitrogen and an oxygen. From an organic perspective, it is an ester/amide hybridized molecular system. Interestingly, telechelic monomers such as adipic acid chloride (left telechelic monomer) and hexamethylene diamine (right telechelic monomer) such as shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{3}\\).", "What is immediately noticeable is that the final polymer is a blend of two distinct monomers; thus, the final properties can be tailored by judicious (and discrete) choice of the monomers. More specifically, prepolymers (> 10-12 monomer units) of each monomer may be coupled to provide distinct segments having specific properties. For example, polyethylene glycol (PEG) is a polymer that is hydrophilic, soft, rubbery, and flows well. However, the phenyl-based di-isocyanate segment is much more rigid, tough, and non-stretchable. Therefore, the overall final physical and thermal properties of the polyurethane can be tuned. The opportunity to enhance the polymerization reactivity inherent for polyurethanes can be catalyzed by a non-nucleophilic base (such as DABCO \u2013 diazabicyclooctane) shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{4}\\)", "In Figure \\(\\PageIndex{4}\\), DABCO is able to abstract a proton from an alcohol (say ethylene glycol) to allow for the nucleophilic reactivity at the cumulated carbon of the isocyanate.", "An additional \u201cgreener\u201d approach to forming isocyanates, an important class of starting material in the formation of many highly important materials, is through the Curtius Rearrangement (RAR) Reaction, an example of which is shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{5}\\).", "The Curtius Rearrangement is a thermal or photochemical decomposition starting from carboxylic azides (left structure in reaction above) to an isocyanate (first product in reaction above). In the above reaction, the solvent also plays the role of a reactant as shown by N atom insertion into cyclohexane via a radicaloid mechanism. These intermediates may be isolated, or their reaction or hydrolysis products can be obtained.", "The reaction sequence that includes the subsequent reaction with water that leads to amines is called the Curtius Reaction. This reaction is similar to the Schmidt Reaction, shown below in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{6}\\) (https://www.wikiwand.com/en/Schmidt_reaction), with acids that differs in that the acyl azide is prepared from the acyl halide and an azide salt.", "For the Curtius RAR, the following steps take place: Starting Reagent 1 undergoes an electrophilic attack by an anionic azide molecule to produce an azide whose mesomerism is shown in brackets 2. It then undergoes decomposition under the appropriate stressor (heat, pressure, etc.), which leads to the isocyanate 3 with the loss of nitrogen (denitrogenation). This can react with water to yield a carbamate-like molecule (carbamic acid, urethane-like) which can spontaneously decompose thru decarboxylation to a primary amine 4. In the presence of an alcohol or an amine, 3 can yield an ester, 5, and an amide, 6, respectively. http://www.wikiwand.com/en/Curtius_rearrangement", "The opportunity to apply green chemistry to reducing the toxicity in industrial processes is of paramount importance for a sustainable future. In this chapter, we investigated the concept of hazards from the perspective of their meaning, nature, implications, control, and ultimate reengineering. Green chemical principles hold the key to ensuring that society provides a viable channel for all of our physical needs and maintains the environment.", "In a very general sense, solvents are a class of chemical compounds that allow chemistry to occur. The concept of a solvent has significant ramifications because they serve as the matrix, medium, or carrier for solutes. They are necessary in a number of processes, reactions, and systems. We tend to think of a substance like \u201cwater\u201d as a universal solvent because it is so useful in so many disciplines. Water cleans up everything, allows biochemical reactions to occur, is used in paints, coatings, and films, allows cooking to occur (or else everything would catch fire), and provides lubrication and ease of movement for a great many devices.", "Interestingly, in the business world, the word \u201csolvent\u201d has another meaning: A state of financial soundness characterized by the ability of an entity to meet its monetary obligations when they fall due. This latter definition does indeed apply in a certain sense to the solvent concept we are espousing in this chapter. A solvent ($olvent) carries materials for a reaction or specific function in the same sense that solvent from a financial sense carries funding/money to meet its obligations. Thus, using an analogy:", "Solvent : Solute :: $olvent : Money", "Chemically, a solvent will dissolve or \u201csolvate\u201d a solute. What does that mean? It means that solvent molecules will surround the solute in such a way that a solution is formed; in other words, a homogeneous system is generated in which the solute is part of/indistinguishable from the solvent network. A solute/solution conceptcan be visualized in the Figure below:", "Solubility", "The ability of one a compound to dissolve in some other (likely different) compound is termed \u201csolubility\u201d. Miscibility is another term that characterizes the facility of compound A to dissolve in compound B. When the two compounds can completely dissolve or combine to form a homogeneous solution, the two liquids are said to be miscible. Two that can never blend well enough to form a solution are called immiscible.", "All solutions have a positive entropy of mixing whereas the interactions between different compounds may or may not be energetically favored. If interactions are unfavorable, then the free energy decreases with increasing solute concentration. The energy loss may at some point in time outweighs the entropy gain, and no more solute can be dissolved \u2013 this is a condition solution in which the solution is said to be saturated. This condition can change with different environmental factors, such temperature, pressure, and purity of the system. A supersaturated solution can be prepared by raising the solubility (e.g., increasing temperature) to dissolve more solute, and then lowering it by cooling. However, most gases and several compounds exhibit solubilities that tend to drop with raised temperatures. The solubility of liquids in liquids, however, is less temperaturesensitive than solids or gases.", "According to GC Principle No. 5, \u201cThe use of auxiliary substances (solvents, separation agents, etc.) should be made unnecessary wherever possible, and innocuous when used.\u201d This statement signifies or upholds the dogma in GC that simplification to execute a specific transformation should be observed. In other words, if we can find a way to not use a solvent, let\u2019s not use it! Although in our modern society such a stance is almost untenable, the ideal nevertheless is what we as a society should contend to achieve. For example, as shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) , we have an overwhelming influx of medicines, drugs, etc., within our society to promote our health. We typically take these concoctions with water, in emulsions, in solutions, in suspensions, etc.", "Of course, taking a medicine without solution is a difficult proposition, but there are a number of ways to do it:", "Nevertheless, the use of solvents and solvent-based systems are deeply ingrained in our culture and society. The reasons are many, but they tend to be tradition, ease of use, reduced cost, and convenience. Doing without solvents tends to require much more creativity and overall planning.", "Typically, a reaction profile or surface (where and how a reaction proceeds according to an energy perspective) provides sufficient information to understand the pathways (independent of final energy states) necessary to achieve a forward reaction. For example, the coordinate shown below illustrates the SN2 reaction between t-butyl chloride and hydroxide. Note that most of the variables shown relate to the energy constraints or parameters associated with the reaction. The reaction has an inherent activation barrier for the forward direction. This barrier characterized by an energy differential input (DE1\u00b9 ), relates to the difficulty to accessing a transition state (\u00b9) that must be accessed for the forward reaction.", "Such an energy input, however, can be accommodated or lessened by a number of factors, viz., the use of a catalyst which in general has shown the ability to reduce the energetic considerations to access that state by virtue of its capacity to engage in structural or energetic interactions with the starting material and strongly encourage the formation of the transition state. The downhill nature of the coordinate surface is akin to rolling a ball whose potential energy conversion to kinetic energy is extremely facile. Thus, an intermediate is achieved (the trialkyl carbocation in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\) ) that has a measurable lifetime and properties. Although it is by its fundamental character unstable, it nevertheless exists to then engage in further reactions. Notice that it still at an energy surface that is much higher to the starting energy state. Such a phenomenon is then predictive of its future course. In fact, as you move closer to the product along the abscissa of the reaction coordinate surface, the intermediate resembles in a number of properties the nature of the final product. In this case, the intermediate has to a great extent a number of the features of both the starting materials and the product. Indeed, the next activation barrier that must be crossed to access the final product is much lower in height than the normal activation barrier indicating the gradual easing of the transition of starting material(s) to product(s).", "There are a number of solvents that from a green chemistry perspective must be dealt with judiciously. The following are representative solvent classes:", "Each of the above have their pros & cons in terms of environmental benefit/issue, economics, and social justice. Each may do different things; for example, the aprotic solvent class is one where there is no chance for the solvent to provide a proton to a reaction it is hosting. Alcohols, on the other hand, can easily do that and should not be used in reactions where water/protons could quench a reaction or trigger a violent reaction.", "Methyl Soyate", "Methyl soyate is a biobased solvent that is a mixture of long-chain fatty acid methyl esters. More information on its specific properties and potential uses can be found in the following tract:", "https://www.yumpu.com/en/document/view/10362159/the-formulary-guide-for-methyl-soyate-soy-new-uses", "In general, it can be used to clean countertops, pretreat fabric stains, clean concrete, degreaser, graffiti remover (with ethyl lactate and surfactants), paint stripper, mastic remover, varnish remover, deinker, asphalt remover, and waterless hand cleaner. In addition to the soyate, there are a number of other emerging biobased cleaners/solvents such as shown below:", "Please see http://pubs.rsc.org/en/Content/ArticleLanding/2011/GC/c1gc15523g#!divAbstract for more information on this marvelous solvent.", "Gas Phase", "The gas phase is a very useful modality to allow reactions to occur because (like the hydrophobic effect) it forces reactions or processes to occur through non-solvent-mediated channels. For example, the production of methanol can be done in the gas phase by reaction of \u201csyn\u201d gas (hydrogen and carbon monoxide) with ZnO as the solid catalyst for the reaction to occur.", "No Solvents", "It is altogether possible and highly desirable to use the starting materials themselves for the reaction of interest. This is doable if one of the reactants is a liquid that can allow the other(s) to dissolve into it. This has been shown by taking a p-xylene and reacting it with oxygen to make the terephthalic acid:", "The acid in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) can then be used directly with ethylene glycol to synthesize polyethylene terephthalate:", "Melt State", "It is possible to combine two solids to provide a composition that can achieve a eutectic point, or melts/solidifies at a single temperature lower than the melting points of the separate constituents or of any other mixture of them. At the eutectic point, you can achieve an isotropic blend of dissolved materials such as evidence in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{3}\\) .", "Triggered Solid State Reactions", "It is possible to induce a chemical reaction outside of the melt by introducing a trigger such as acid, ultrasound, grinding, light, etc. Such triggers take the place of solvent-mediated reaction stabilization. For example, the following reactions are amenable to such triggers:", "Michael Reaction:", "In addition, it is possible to do the reaction using a catalyst such as alumina with microwave induction as shown in Figure 4-9:", "There are a number of other reactions that are similar in their reactivity as a function of triggers in water (non-organic) and without catalysts.", "Baeyer-Villiger:", "For example, the Baeyer-Villiger Reaction is an important reaction in making an ester or lactone", "The Baeyer-Villiger Oxidation is the oxidative cleavage of a carbon-carbon bond adjacent to a carbonyl to converts ketones to esters and cyclic ketones to lactones. It may vw carried out with peracids, such as m-CBPA, or with hydrogen peroxide and a Lewis acid.", "Benzilic Acid Rearrangement", "1,2-Diketones undergo a rearrangement in the presence of a strong base to yield \u03b1hydroxycarboxylic acids. The best yields are obtained when the diketones do not have enolizable protons. Shown below in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{7}\\) is a representation of the mechanism of the reaction.", "Benzilic acid rearrangement has traditionally been conducted by heating benzyl derivatives and alkali metal hydroxides (KOH) in aqueous organic solvent. However, the rearrangements proceed more efficiently and quickly in the solid state.", "Williamson Ether Synthesis", "The Williamson Ether Synthesis is an organic reaction forming an ether from an organohalide and a deprotonated alcohol (alkoxide) that is done in organic solvents. However, a very rapid synthesis of symmetrical and asymmetrical ethers in \u201cdry\u201d media under microwave radiation has been reported (http://www.cyfronet.krakow.pl/~pcbogdal/alcohol/). The reaction was carried out by mixing an alcohol with 50% excess of an alkyl halide and catalytic amount of tetrabutylammonium bromide, adsorbed onto potassium carbonate or a mixture of potassium carbonate and potassium hydroxide, and irradiated in open conditions in a domestic microwave oven for 45-100 s. In the absence of the ammonium salt, ethers were not detected or were very low yield.", "Friedel-Crafts Reaction", "The opportunity to perform acylation or alkylation of an aromatic nucleus is a very important transformation in organic chemistry. The principal tool we have for such a transformation is the Friedel-Crafts, a classical reaction dating back to the 19th century, can be done in a green way to avoid the need for acid chlorides, Lewis acids, and hydrochloric acid waste products. Shown below in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{8}\\) is a representation of the photo-Friedel-Crafts, a mild and greener alternative to the classical analogue.", "Ball Milling", "Ball milling works on the principle of impact and attrition; size reduction results from impact as the balls drop from near the top of the shell. A ball mill is made up of a hollow cylindrical shell rotating about its axis. The axis may be either horizontal or at an acute angle to the horizontal. The shell is partially filled with balls whose grinding by action of balls, made of steel (chrome steel), stainless steel, ceramic, or rubber, results in much finer particles. The inner surface of the cylindrical shell is usually lined with an abrasion-resistant material such as manganese steel or rubber whereas less wear takes place in a rubber-lined mill. One of the reactions that is done in this manner is polymerization of MMA (methylmethacrylic acid) to PMMA (poly- ) shown in \\(\\PageIndex{9}\\) . Below is a video resource that shows the process of ball milling. In this video it is possible to see how larger materials could be broken down and ground to specific sizes based on the size of grinding ball used.", "The polymerization of MMA is normally done through one of several chemical-initiated approaches. In the ball milling approach, the application of mechanical energy is sufficient to conduct the reaction, a significant finding! The same type of approach can be used to extract lignin, the third or fourth most abundant polymer on the planet. A generic molecular representation of the structure of lignin is shown in \\(\\PageIndex{10}\\) .", "Process Intensification", "Process intensification can be defined as a strategy for introducing dramatic reductions in the footprint of a chemical plant to reach a given production objective. These reductions may consist of shrinking the size of pieces of equipment and reducing the number of unit operations or apparatuses. Such reductions tend to be significant because the objective is to dramatically reduce energy, materials waste, and process efficiency. Several of its most salient characteristics are:", "Reactive Extrusion", "Reactive extrusion is a chemical engineering process characterized by the forced mixing of one or more components under high pressure conditions for a specific end goal. Hot melt extrusion is one example of this. It is defined as the application of heat and/or pressure to melt a polymer and force it though a small space (extruder) as part of a continuous process. It is a well-known process that was developed to make polymer products of uniform shape and density. It is widely applied in the plastic, rubber and food industries to prepare more than half of all plastic products including bags, films, sheets, tubes, fibers, foams, and pipes.", "Supercritical Fluid", "A supercritical fluid (sCF) is a substance at a temperature and pressure that are above the critical point, at which distinct liquid and gas phases do not exist. It is a very unique phase that can effuse through solids like a gas, and dissolve materials like a liquid.", "sCFs are extremely useful in green chemistry because they can be derived from environmentally friendly materials such as water and carbon dioxide with little to no impact on the carbon footprint of the planet.", "Water as a Solvent", "Water can behave as an exquisite solvent in a host of typical organic reactions by virtue of its ability to encourage reactivity via the \u201chydrophobic effect\u201d.", "Microemulsions", "Microemulsions are clear, thermodynamically stable, isotropic liquid mixtures of oil, water and a surfactant that are frequently in combination with a co-surfactant. The aqueous phase likely contains salt(s) or other ingredients, whereas the \u201coil\u201d may actually be a complex mixture of different hydrocarbons and olefins.", "The opportunity to use alternatives to typical organic solvents to do the same transformations with the same or better efficiencies has never been better than today. We are learning that we can do a lot of chemistry in a green way because we are putting our efforts into it. Although we still have a long way to go before solventless, gas phase, etc., are the mode of doing chemistry, the range of available reactions and processes is superb.", "Further Reading", "\u201cA reagent ain\u2019t supposed to make you faint!\u201d -Lucian Lucia", "Reagents, not unlike solvents in the previous chapter, are the chemical materials or reactants used in a chemical conversion to product. When we think of a \u201creagent\u201d, we tend to think of a chemical used in a reaction, although there are numerous examples of chemicals throughout our world that do not neatly fit that mold. Dirt, water, air, etc., can all be reagents in terms of transformations to products. For example, the humic and fulvic acids found in dirt can act as exquisite reagents in separation, uptake, and cellular metabolic processes. Fulvics display a sorptive interaction with environmental chemicals before or after they reach concentrations that are toxic. The toxic herbicide Paraquat is rapidly detoxified, as are other organic compounds applied to the soil as pesticides. It is also vital to aid in the formation of new species of metal ions that bind with pesticides and herbicides to catalyze their breakdown.", "We must think of a reagent as a means to an end. How can we use ingenious chemistry to take an otherwise invaluable or low-value item (commodity) to a valuable end product? This is the secret to enhancing the appeal and utility of green chemistry.", "The opportunity to do chemistry by means of, for example, a fixed substrate is very much in keeping with the concepts that we are learning. We explored the functionality and power of packed-bed columns that do chemistry normally done in solution with dissolved solutes. A packed-bed reactor can provide a source of protons, ions, or other chemicals that can affect chemistry. An ion-exchange system can perform ion metathesis, i.e., substitute the anion (X-m) in dilute salt system (M+n)m(X-m)n for the anion enriched on the packed bed. Shown below is an example of the process of interest. The solute (a mixture of proteins) is loaded onto the exchanger and subsequently adsorbs to the carboxymethyl anion substrate (a porogen). This process is typically characterized as a facile equilibrium process in which the protein mixture can replace the sodium cations. UV absorbance can follow the overall displacement as shown in the graph at the lower right (1st: Mes anion peak; 2nd and 3rd peaks are the desired protein chloride substance).", "Replacing Hazardous Substances", "A common misconception in chemistry is that we should be vigilant only when we know we are working with a hazardous compound. In fact, all substances should be treated with the level of respect that they deserve. Even salt can be an irritant when used incorrectly. The most importance criteria to consider in the evaluation of the hazards of substances are the following:", "Each of the above three criteria may be used in the assessment of a compound with respect to hazard level. Obviously, efficacy must be emphasized or else there is no need to go any further with the replacement.", "Inorganic and Organic Supports", "Supports or scaffolds or templates represent a fixed medium for the express purpose of a targeted transformation. We will use the following paper (shown are title, authors, and abstract) for our discussion in this part of the chapter.", "\u201cPaper-immobilized enzyme as a green microstructured catalyst\u201d Hirotaka Koga, Takuya Kitaokabc and Akira Isogaia; DOI: 10.1039/c2jm30759f", "The facile and direct introduction of methacryloxy groups into cellulose paper was carried out using a silane coupling technique, leading to the improvement of hydrophobicity and both dry and wet physical strengths of the paper. Immobilization of lipase enzymes onto the methacrylate- modified paper was then accomplished, possibly due to hydrophobic interaction. The as-prepared immobilized lipase on methacrylatemodified paper possessed paper-specific practical utility. During a batch process for the nonaqueous transesterification between 1 phenylethanol and vinyl acetate to produce 1- phenylethylacetate, the paperimmobilized lipase showed high catalytic activity, selectivity and reusability, suggesting that the methacryloxy groups introduced into the cellulose paper played a key role in the hyperactivation of lipases. In addition, a higher productivity of 1-phenylethylacetate was achieved in a continuous flow reaction system than in the batch system, indicating that the interconnected porous microstructure of the paper provided favorable flow paths for the reactant solution. Thus, the paper-immobilized enzyme is expected to offer a green catalytic material for the effective production of useful chemicals.", "What we note in this \u201cpaper\u201d is the \u201csmart\u201d exploitation of paper as a porous microreaction chamber (interconnected paths) for a transesterification reaction between 1-phenylethanol and vinyl acetate to produce 1-Phenylethylacetate, as shown below:", "This research effort explores the opportunity to catalyze reactions of interest using natural catalysts (enzymes). In this case, lipase-catalyzed reactions (e.g., esterification, transesterification, aminolysis, acylation, and thio-transesterification) that can be carried out in nonaqueous media have been examined in the synthesis of many useful chemicals for food, cosmetic, pharmaceutical and biodiesel.", "However, lipases are typically unstable in nonaqueous media due to aggregation, denaturation, or some other form of deactivation. Enzymes are often immobilized on supporting materials (silica, ceramics, carbon, resins) to provide reusability, isolation advantages, and stability in nonaqueous media. Their study offered a number of advantages for the use of this green system including the asymmetry of the final productcomposition:", "Figure 5-3 shows that the paper-based system encourages the formation of the \u201cR\u201d enantiomer as opposed to the S (non-detected). Such a finding signals the value of a simple, facile, and highly conserved approach to an enantioselective and high yield (50%, 5 hrs.).", "Removal of Lactose", "The opportunity to remove lactose through a separation process can be achieved by attaching glutaraldehyde (two terminal-ended aldehyde group below, left) to an aminated silica particle (image on right) which is then covalently linked to a galactosidase enzyme that can be used to remove lactose from milk products followed by coupling with galactosidase and reaction with milk.", "Quaternization of Amines", "Quaternary ammonium cations, quats, are positively-charged ions of the structure shown below:", "The R group can be an alkyl group or an aryl group. Unlike ammonium (NH4 + ), quaternary ammonium cations are permanently charged, independent of pH.", "Combinatorial Chemistry", "Combinatorial chemistry is an approach to chemical synthesis that makes possible the preparation of a large number (e.g., millions) of compounds in a single sweep. These libraries can be mixtures, individual compounds, or computational structures.", "Combinatorial chemistry can be used for small molecules, as well as for biomacromolecules such as peptides. Synthesis can quickly lead to large numbers of products. As an example, a molecule with three points of functionality or diversity (R1, R2, and R3) can generate structures, where NR# = the numbers of different substituents utilized. The basic principle of combinatorial chemistry is the preparation of large numbers of compounds that are then used to identify the useful components of the libraries.", "Although combinatorial chemistry has been in play over the last 25 years, its roots go to the 1960s when a Rockefeller researcher, Bruce Merrifield, started investigating solid phase synthesis of peptides. It has had its biggest impact in the drug industry where researchers optimize the activity profile of a compound by creating a library of many different but related compounds.", "Starch", "Starch is an energy storage biomaterial generated from carbon dioxide and water during photosynthesis. Among the panoply of natural polymers, starch is of considerable interest because of its biodegradability, low cost, renewability, and biocompatibility. It is therefore considered a promising candidate for the sustainable development of new functional materials.", "Starch is composed of two homopolymers of D-glucose: amylase, a virtually linear \u03b1-D- (1, 4\u2019)- glucan, and branched amylopectin, with many \u03b1-1, 6\u2019-linked branch points (Figure \\(\\PageIndex{4}\\) ).", "Starch is a polyol: it has therefore, two secondary hydroxyl groups at C-2 and C-3, and one primary hydroxyl at C-6 when it is not linked. It is also quite hydrophilic and can be oxidized and reduced for the formation of ethers and esters and many other functional molecules. Starch has various proportions of amylose and amylopectin from about 10\u201320% amylose and 80\u201390% amylopectin based on the source. It forms a helical structure and occurs naturally as discrete granules because the short- branched amylopectin chains can form helical structures to crystallize. It has a MW of 500-20K consisting of a-(1\u00e04)-D-glucose units whose extended shape has a 7-22 nm hydrodynamic radius range. The helical form of the molecule usually forms a stiff left- handed single helix whose structure, not unlike DNA, is supported by H-bonding between O2 and the O6 atoms. Amylose can undergo syneresis (dehydration synthesis) between vicinal (neighboring) glucan residues to form the cyclodextrin cavity in which the interior maintains a hydrophobicity. Interestingly, it can form double-stranded crystallites that are resistant to amylase (the putative enzyme for its deconstruction), and H-bonding and solubility. The crowing macromolecule from starch, CD, is a veritable green chemist\u2019s dream owing to a number of wonderful properties. Shown below is the toroidal structure of CD and dimensions:", "How do Cyclodextrins Work?? https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=UaEes6cJu7k (How do Cyclodextrins work? (1980). Cyclolab.)", "Specifically, it is a cyclic oligomer of a-D-glucopyranose held together by glycosidic bonds very much like what is seen in all polysaccharides. It was discovered in 1891 by Villiers who synthesized by the enzymatic conversion of amylose followed by a selective precipitation. The precipitation can be done with several solvents, albeit organic in nature and not sustainable, but with varying degrees of yields. Note that we look at three forms of the CDs as shown in the graph below:", "What is remarkable about the CDs is their ability to form host/guest inclusion complexes owing to their unique HLB (Hydrophilic Lipophilic Balance) criteria. These are quite literally molecularscale reactors that can do many things. In the context of biomedical applications, the focus for our particular discussion, the following are among their benefits.", "The nanoreactors have an uncanny capacity to encapsulate and/or do chemistry with a number of chemicals that are hydrophobic or low polarity. Shown in Figure 5-9 is a cartoon that depicts the hydrolytic action of CD with a phosphate molecule.", "Figure \\(\\PageIndex{6}\\) A simplified representation of the encapsulating and chemical reactivity behavior of a CD macromolecule for phosphate hydrolysis. https://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/F...ease_Mimic.png", "CD can by virtue of the varieties in its sizes accommodate relatively small to large guest molecules. Shown below in Figure 5-10 is a pictorial description of a 1:2 guest:host complex that engages in photophysical behavior.", "The system is engaging in an energy transfer from the peripheral boron- containing molecules to the encapsulated porphyrin molecules which releases a photon of light upon resonant energy transfer (645 nm) from the peripheral molecules.", "Phase Solubility Diagrams", "Phase solubility studies are carried out in aqueous systems at different temperatures to calculate stability (equilibrium) constants, (Kc) and thermodynamic values for the formation of inclusion complexes. It is known that if phase solubility diagrams show that the solubility of a guest molecule increases linearly along with the concentration of CD, then they can be considered as AL-type phase diagrams [1], suggesting the formation of 1:1 complexes, which are the most common and best understood of these types of interactions. When the phase solubility data are collected at different temperatures, we can obtain valuable additional information such as the thermodynamic parameters for the formation of the complex.", "The integrated form of the Van\u2019t Hoff Equation allows for the calculation of the enthalpy (DH) and entropy changes (DS) depending on the variations of the stability constants with temperature [2]:", "The Kc can also be expressed as the following relationship:", "that can be pictorially described as:", "in which there is a complexation with D (the substrate or drug in this case) and the CD. The above represents an AL-type complex which is first order with respect to the CD and the drug (D).", "A-type phase-solubility profiles are defined by the solubility of the substrate (drug) increasing with increasing ligand (cyclodextrin) concentration. When the complex is first order relative to the ligand and first or higher order with respect to substrate then AL-type phase-solubility profiles are obtained. If the complex is first order with respect to the substrate but second or higher order with respect to ligand, AP-types are obtained. AN-type phase-solubility profiles are difficult to interpret. B-type phase- solubility profiles indicate formation of complexes with limited solubility in the aqueous medium. The water-soluble cyclodextrin derivatives form A-type phase- solubility profiles while less soluble cyclodextrins form B-type profiles. A number of drug/cyclodextrin complexes form inclusion complexes, butcyclodextrins form non- inclusion complexes and aggregates that dissolve drugs through micelle-like structures. The phase-solubility profiles do not verify inclusion complexes, but only describe how increasing cyclodextrin concentration influences drug solubility. As we already discussed, the most common type of cyclodextrin complexes are the 1:1 where one drug molecule (D) forms a complex with one cyclodextrin molecule (CD). In an AL-type phasesolubility diagram where the slope is less than unity, the stability constant (K1:1) of the complex can be calculated from the slope and the intrinsic solubility (S0) of the drug in the aqueous media (i.e., drug solubility when no cyclodextrin is present):", "The value of K1:1 is typically 50 < 2000 M-1 with a mean value of 129, 490, and 355 M-1 for \u03b1-, \u03b2- and \u03b3- cyclodextrin, respectively [3].", "Advances in drug development such as high throughput have increased the total and variety of drug candidates whose clinical usefulness is principally limited to a great degree by the following:", "Cyclodextrins alleviate many of these issues. As evidence, there are currently around 30 different cyclodextrin pharmaceutical products on the market that include different types of pills, capsules, parenteral solutions, nasal sprays, suppositories, eye drops, and skin products. Cyclodextrins tend to replace organic solvents, enhance oral bioavailability, reduce gastrointestinal irritation, and increase dermal availability. In addition, animal and human studies have demonstrated that cyclodextrins improve drug delivery.", "Addition of cyclodextrins to existing formulations will seldom result in acceptable outcome. We still lack deep knowledge of the physical factors involved in complex formation. Cyclodextrins form both inclusion and non-inclusion complexes in aqueous solutions. It has also been shown that cyclodextrins form aggregates that are able to solubilize in a micellar-like fashion; their exact structures are not known, nor is the way they influence drug delivery", "Further Reading", "\u201cWhat has one voice, and is four-footed in the morning, two-footed in the afternoon and three- footed at night\u201d?", "-The Sphinx (Oedipus)", "In any reaction, a transformation from a starting material to a final product is the basis. In other words, a budding green chemist such as yourself will investigate how a chemical will undergo one or more treatments to produce a needed product in a manner consistent with the dogmas of GC. Typically, any chemist is chiefly interested in the concepts of yield and specificity, namely, how efficiently is the conversion done based on a theoretical yield and how exactingly is it done (with respect to a series of products). These latter terms have long been the \u201cmantras\u201d of organic, synthetic, and biochemical studies. The secret to any successful transformation is ensuring that we get high yield and maximum specificity no matter what else is generated. A successful chemical transformation for a green chemist, however, must go beyond these staid concepts and introduce the concepts of safety, waste, energy, and number of steps (which are reflected in the first three terms).", "The history of chemistry has been one of neglecting such concepts because of the lack of environmental consciousness, low regard for safety, and lack of understanding of economics or life cycle. When we approach the riddle of doing chemistry, we have not done so with an eye to mimicking nature. We have always approached it anthropomorphically, that is to say, with the resolute conviction that we can do it better, but we fail.", "Reaction types are significant to all fields of chemistry because they are what characterize any transformation from starting materials to products. In the pantheon of reactions, we tend to focus on functional group creation and atom transformation, both of which can be accomplished through the menu of reaction types shown below:", "The above six (6) general reaction categories simplify the panoply of reactivity paradigms in the discipline of chemistry. We can nearly list every pertinent reaction within one or more of the listings shown. Indeed, even acid/base chemistry can fall under Addition or Elimination reactions based on their precise reactivity patterns. We will delve deeply into each type in the following sections.", "A rearrangement reaction covers a broad swath of chemistry which is principally characterized by the rearrangement of the skeletal configuration of a molecular system to yield a structural isomer (a swapped-out form of the original structure while retaining the original atoms). Oftentimes, a substituent moves from one backbone atom to another backbone atom. In the classical organic chemistry example shown below, we witness the Wagner-Meerwein RAR.", "A rearrangement is not exactly well depicted by discrete electron transfers shown by curly arrows. The actual mechanism of alkyl groups moving in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{1}\\) involves a fluid transfer of the alkyl group along a bond that is not described by simple ionic bond-breaking and reformation. Explanation by orbital interactions provides a better approximation although it is possible to draw the curved arrows for a sequence of discrete electron transfers to give the same result as a RAR reaction.", "There are other types of RARs besides the chemically induced one shown above: we can have thermal or photo-induced as well. In these latter cases, heat or light can act as the triggers to actuate the transformation.", "Thermal RARs", "The isomerization of unsubstituted azulene to naphthalene was the first reported and hence most studied thermal transformation for an aromatic hydrocarbon. Many mechanisms have been suggested, yet not a one has been unequivocally confirmed.", "Five mechanisms were proposed: reversible ring-closure, shown above, a norcaradiene- vinylidene, diradical, methylene walk, and a spiran mechanism. The reversible ring- closure mechanism is inaccurate despite its overall scientific appeal and evidence, and as such, multiple reaction pathways were deemed occurring simultaneously. This idea was widely accepted. It was thought that at high temperatures one mechanism would be energetically favored although energetic studies displayed similar activation energies for all mechanisms [1].", "Four mechanisms for thermal isomerizations are warranted: dyotropic, diradical, and two benzene ring contractions. A 1,2-carbon shift to a carbene preceding a 1,2-hydrogen shift, and a 1-2- hydrogen shift to a carbene followed by a 1,2-carbon shift. The dyotropic mechanism shows the 1,2-shift displayed in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{2}\\) .", "Photoinduced RARs", "The mechanisms of organic photochemical reactions are a treasure trove for photochemists and physicists because they provide tremendous insight into fundamental electronic behavior as a function of energy-matter interactions. The absorption of ultraviolet light by organics may lead to a number of reactions. Over the last century, an immense quantity of photochemical reactions have become unearthed; it has been found that reactions that are unlikely in ground-states are accessible in electronic excited-state configurations. One of the earliest photochemical studies was on the natural product santonin. Ciamician (1857-1922) observed that under sunlight exposure, santonin gave several photoproducts. The structure of santonin (molecule on left in Figure 6-3) was first described by Clemo and Hayworth in 1929 whose initial photoproduct is lumisantonin. As depicted, the photoreaction involves a C-3 carbonyl group movement to C-2, the C-4 methyl has moved to C-1, and the C-10 carbon has been inverted.", "Beckmann RAR", "This reaction is named after the German chemist Ernst Otto Beckmann (1853\u20131923). It is representative of an acid-catalyzed rearrangement of an oxime to an amide (when the oximes are cyclic, they yield \u201clactams\u201d).", "Caprolactam, in this example, is a very important chemical because it is the feedstock in the production of Nylon 6, a material used extensively in the manufacture of textiles, clothes, carpets, cushions, bulletproof vests, etc. The reaction includes acetic acid, hydrochloric acid, sulfuric acid, and acetic anhydride, to catalyze the rearrangement. Sulfuric acid is the most commonly used acid for commercial lactam production because it forms ammonium sulfate (a common agricultural fertilizer) as a by-product when neutralized with ammonia.", "In general, rearrangements tend to have no waste of atoms because they are a type of isomerization. They are hence very atom economical and hence very efficient modes of chemical transformations. At this point, we will delve into a series of rearrangements to further illustrate the point.", "This type of reaction occurs when in general two molecules covalently bind to form a larger one referred to as the adduct. These reactions are limited to chemical compounds that have multiple bonds, such as molecules with carbon\u2013carbon double bonds (alkenes), triple bonds (alkynes) hetero double bonds like carbonyl (C=O) groups, or imine (C=N) groups. An addition reaction is typically the reverse of an elimination reaction. For example, the hydration of an alkene to an alcohol is the reverse of dehydration which leads to an oxidative product (alkene). Electrophilic and nucleophilic additions are the main types of polar addition. The non-polar additions can be free radical and cycloaddition.", "In general, addition reactions are very common because they are simple, very powerful, robust, and preserve/conserve atom economy during the reaction sequence (think of the mathematical operation of addition \u2013 all numbers sum!). Thus, in general, no additional by-products are generated allowing for a clean and straight forward reaction scheme that in the final analysis may require little to no purification steps.", "These types of reactions are also known as single displacement reaction or single substitution reaction). One functional group is replaced by a more reactive functional group or else it would not happen (the reverse would be faster or more thermodynamically stable). Substitution reactions are classified either electrophilic or nucleophilic depending upon the reagents. A good example of a substitution reaction is halogenation. When chlorine gas (Cl-Cl) is irradiated with the appropriate light energy, several of the molecules photolyze into two chlorine radicals (Cl\u00b7) whose electrons are very nucleophilic. In Figure 6-6, one of radicals can rupture (homolytically) a C-H bond through abstraction of one of the equivalent protons on methane to form electrically neutral H-Cl. The other radical reforms a covalent bond with the CH3 . to form CH3Cl.", "An elimination reaction typically involves the removal of two substituents a substrate in either a one or two-step mechanism. The one-step mechanism is the E2 reaction, and the two-step mechanism is the E1 reaction. The numbering scheme relates to the kinetics of the reaction, i.e., bimolecular and unimolecular, respectively.", "Elimination reactions are important because they are among a very few set of useful reactions that generate unsaturation within organic molecules. They are the opposite of addition reactions and involve homolytic or heterolytic dissociation of molecular groups on adjacent (vicinal) atoms leading to increased bond order on these vicinal atoms.", "For example,RCH2CH2OH \u2192 R-CH=CH2 +H2O.This latter reaction requires the expulsion of a water to lead to one degree of unsaturation. The presence of a leaving group is a pre-requisite for these types of reactions.", "In Figure \\(\\PageIndex{8}\\) , the opportunity to retain a hydrogen on the final structure is an unusual mechanistic phenomenon. The conversion relies on a strict orbitally conserved concerted mechanism in which the degree of unsaturation (terminal vinyl group) is generated in tandem with the abstraction of the proton by the lactonic ring oxygen. Such a sigmatropic shift would be over 3 atoms (hence, an unusual 1,3-hydride shift).", "A pericyclic reaction (Figure \\(\\PageIndex{9}\\) ) is a reaction in which the transition state of the molecule has a cyclic geometry and progresses in a concerted manner. They are typically rearrangement reactions. The major classes of pericyclic reactions are electrocyclic, cycloaddition, sigmatropic, group transfer, cheletropic, and dyotropic, all of which are considered to be equilibrium processes.", "These types of reactions are governed by Frontier Molecular Orbital (FMO) Theory. Frontier molecular orbitals for a molecule are so called because the orbitals are the \u201cfrontier\u201d or vanguard (leaders) of electron occupation. These are known classically as the highest-energy occupied (HOMO) and lowest-energy unoccupied (LUMO) molecular orbitals. The HOMO is characterized by nucleophilic or electron donation, whereas the LUMO is the opposite. Chemical reactions and resonance are very successfully described by the overlap between a filled HOMO and an empty LUMO.", "Acidity and basicity are terms used in FMO Theory very broadly. Acidity refers to a ligand, metal center, or orbital ability to accept electron density (from electron sources that include Br\u00f8nsted bases). Basicity refers to a ligand, metal center, or orbital ability to donate electrons (to electron sinks that include Br\u00f8nsted acids). The theory distinguishes among \u03c3-acids, \u03c3-bases, \u03c0-acids, and \u03c0-bases. The first two, \u03c3-X, accept or donate electrons in a \u03c3 manner, aligned head on with another orbital, whereas the latter two, \u03c0-X, accept or donate electrons in a \u03c0 manner, aligned side by side with another orbital.", "A pericyclic reaction typically is unimolecular and zero order with respect to kinetics. As shown below, the bicyclic on the left is highly strained because of the 1,2 bridging and undergoes an electrocyclic RAR to relieve the steric stress associated with the heterocyclic cyclopropanoid moiety.", "Diels-Alder", "This is a [4+2] cycloaddition as already mentioned that occurs between a conjugated diene and a substituted alkene known as a dienophile to form a substituted cyclohexene. It was first described by Otto Diels and Kurt Adler in 1928 that lead to the Nobel Prize in Chemistry in 1950. It is a reliable method for forming 6- membered systems with good regio- and stereochemical control. The concept has been applied to other \u03c0-systems to provide the corresponding heterocycles (hetero-Diels\u2013Alder reaction).", "1,3-Dipolar Cycloaddition", "This reaction occurs between a 1,3-dipole and a dipolarophile to form a five-membered ring (Figure \\(\\PageIndex{10}\\) ). The reaction is sometimes referred to as the Huisgen cycloaddition which specifically describes the 1,3-dipolar cycloaddition between an organic azide and an alkyne to generate 1,2,3-triazole. Currently, this reaction is an important route to the region- and stereospecific synthesis of fivemembered heterocycles.", "Cope Rearrangement (RAR)", "The Cope RAR is an extensively studied [3,3]-sigmatropic RAR of 1,5-dienes developed by Arthur Cope. For example, 3-methyl-1,5-hexadiene heated to 300 \u00b0C yields 1,5- heptadiene (see Figure \\(\\PageIndex{11}\\) ).", "The term \u201credox\u201d, short for reduction\u2013oxidation reaction, is used to describe the complete set of chemical reactions occurring for electron transfers leading to changes in oxidation states. Redox reactions require a reduction and complementary oxidation processes. The chemical species (reductant) where the electron is removed is oxidized, while the counter species (oxidant) to where it is added is reduced:", "As an example, in an electrolytic cell (shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{12}\\) ), a complete redox (cycle) is shown.", "In the example, zinc is being oxidized from Zn0 \u2192 Zn+2 which is a net loss of two electrons per atom. The oxidized zinc solubilizes in the anodic solution and proceeds to pull over an anion from the cathodic solution through the electromotive force of the two electrons that it lost. In other words, the zinc cation is balanced by the anions (likely two chloride anions) in the cathodic solution. Simultaneously, copper sulfate cations (cupric cations) are reduced by the net influx of the two electrons. A redox reaction can occur relatively slowly, for example, in the case of rust, or more rapidly, as in fires.", "Green chemistry is all about increasing the overall efficiency of a reaction in terms of numerous criteria. In general, we try to mimic biological reactions because they are among the most efficient, low energy, and atom conserving reactions at our disposal. In terms of the \u201cperfect\u201d chemical reaction, we are talking about:", "Let\u2019s give an excellent intuitive example from the Khan Academy (https://www.khanacademy.org/science/...-percent-yield): Let\u2019s assume you have five hot dogs and four hot dog buns. Obviously, you will have one hot dog in excess.", "In terms of chemical reactions, the hot dog buns are the limiting reagent and the leftover single hot dog is the excess reagent; thus, four complete hot dogs are the theoretical yield, assuming the hot dogs and buns combine in a one-to-one ratio (you\u2019ve got to balance the reaction first). In any chemical reaction, the limiting reagent is the reactant that determines how much of the products can be made. The other reactant(s) is/are in excess.", "How do we measure yield more efficiently?", "Typically, chemical yield focuses on a part of the reaction, i.e., our desired product based on the complete reaction of the limiting reagent. However, in many cases, the overall efficiency from a green chemical perspective is compromised despite high chemical yields. Consider the \u201cGabriel Synthesis\u201d:", "The reaction transforms primary alkyl halides into primary amines. In Figure \\(\\PageIndex{13}\\) , only the latter half of the reaction/synthesis is shown! Traditionally, the reaction uses potassium phthalimide (an \u2013NH2 synthon) to homologate the alkyl which is later coupled to the amine. In the Gabriel Synthesis, the phthalimide anion is employed as a surrogate of H2N\u2212. The entirety of the reaction is shown in Figure \\(\\PageIndex{14}\\) :", "In chemical yield methodologies, we do NOT account for the stream of by-products that amass during a reaction or set of reactions. In the above case, we have the following waste products: potassium halide (K-X), potassium chloride (KCl), and phthalhydrazide (see Figure \\(\\PageIndex{13}\\) for the structure \u2013 the aromatic compound, second from right). Unbelievably, this array (especially the hydrazide) make up a huge fraction of wasted atoms that do not contribute in any way to the efficiency of the reaction. Because of the incredible \u201catomic\u201d waste, we have a reaction with a very poor \u201catom economy\u201d.", "This is a concept that was first formalized by Trost. 1 Atom economy (atom efficiency) is the conversion efficiency of a chemical process in terms of all atoms and the desired product(s). It is one of the most singularly powerful definitions for understanding the \u201cgreenness\u201d of a reaction and its potential usefulness.", "Atom economy can be written as:", "As we already alluded, in an ideal chemical process, the amount of starting materials equals the amount of all products generated and no atom is wasted. If this is not the case, this is a genuine concern for raw materials that have a high cost or due to economic and environmental costs of disposal of the waste.", "In addition to high-yielding process such as the Gabriel Synthesis that result in substantial byproducts, we also have the Cannizzaro Reaction2 where 50% of the reactant aldehyde becomes the other oxidation state of the target and the Wittig3, where high-mass phosphorus reagents are used but become waste.", "A Diels-Alder reaction is an example of a very atom efficient reaction that also can be chemo-, regio-, diastereo- and enantioselective. Catalytic hydrogenation comes closest to being an ideal reaction that is extensively practiced both industrially and academically.4Poor atom economy is common in drug (pharmaceutical) synthesis, and in research. For example, during the synthesis of an alcohol by reduction of an ester with lithium aluminum hydride, the reaction produces a huge amount of aluminum salts. The cost can be considerable.", "Experimental atom economy", "In this derivative calculation of atom economy, we account for the actual quantities of reagents used in a ratio of theoretical yield of product total mass of reactants used as a percentage. Or equivalently, we can calculate the mass of reactants utilized in the desired product divided by the total mass of all reactants as a percentage", "Percentage yield x experimental atom economy", "This is considered the ultimate measure of the efficiency of a reaction. In this case, you multiply the chemical yield of the product by the experimental atom economy to obtain a true measure of the atom efficiency of the reaction", "In this final chapter, we became very familiar with the concepts of reaction efficiency and design from a green chemistry perspective. We more or less employed the totality of the green chemistry principles to understanding what goes into maximizing the environmental, social, and economic benefits associated with scientific enterprises. We thoroughly explored the nature of the various types of reactions done in both fundamental and applied settings and how to evaluate them using very useful mathematical constructs. This chapter serves to cement the concepts we learned in this magnificent discipline and to provide a platform for understanding how to best approach the chemistry, chemical engineering, and the biological transformations of reactions and processes.", "1. Indicate by drawings what the addition products are for the following reaction and what type of reaction it is:", "2. Please indicate what the products are of the reaction of 2-phenyl isopropyl iodide with sodium methoxide.", "3. Does the non-salt product in (2) retain its stereochemical configuration? Why?", "4. Please explain how the minor product is formed in the E2 reaction below and why it is minor?", "5. Using the Diels-Alder Reaction shown below, draw the transition state that will lead to the adduct.", "6. Using the redox diagram below, indicate why the process cannot go on forever", "7. Define the following terms", "a. atom economy", "b. percent atom economy", "c. percent yield", "d. percent experimental atom economy", "e. percent atom economy x experimental atom economy", "8. Which of the terms in question 7 are only meaningful with experimental results? What experimental result is necessary to make these terms meaningful?", "9. Consider the following four (4) reactions shown below:", "a. Label each reaction as a substitution, elimination, addition or rearrangement.", "b. Rewrite each reaction making sure that the reaction is balanced. Show all the reactant atoms that are incorporated into the desired product, and the atoms of the desired product in green, and all other atoms in brown.", "c. Set up a table of atom economy whose headings are: formula, formula weight, number of utilized atoms, weight of utilized atoms, unutilized atoms, and weight of unutilized atoms.", "d. Calculate the %-atom economy of each reaction", "10. In the Further Reading section (#3), Roger Sheldon has developed a term very similar to the %-atom economy termed % atom utilization. The % atom utilization can be calculated according to the following equation: % Atom Utilization = (MW of desired product/MW of all products) X 100", "a. Compare and contrast this with the %-atom economy", "b. What concept that you learned in freshman chemistry makes the actual percentages calculated for the % atom utilization, and % atom economy equal (in most circumstances). Prove this by calculating the % atom utilization for each of the reactions in questions 9\u201413 and comparing your results to the %-atom economy that you calculated in question 9.", "Further Reading"]